Giovanni Arrighi
NLBThe Geometry of
Imperialism
The Limits of
Hobson’s Paradigm
Translated by Patrick Camiller© NLB, 1978
NLB, 7 Carlisle Street, London W.1
Filmset by Servis Filmsetting Ltd, Manchester
Designed by Ruth Prentice
Printed by Lowe & Brydone Printers Limited, Thetford, NorfolkContents
Introduction
1
The Coordinates
Nationalism and Imperialism: . .
The Premises of Hobson’s Defimtlon
The Articulation
Structure and Genesis
of English Imperialism
The Reduplication
Trajectories of US and
German Imperialism
The Dissolution
From Finance Capital .
to Multinational Enterprlses
Concluding Remarks
Bibliography
Index
35
49
80
112
149
156
159Acknowledgments
The central themes of this book represent the precipitate of
seven years’ reflection on the misunderstandings that haunt
theoretical debate on imperialism. During that time, I have
periodically compared my views on international economics
and politics with those of Brian Van Arkadie and André
Gunder Frank, which have often differed from mine. Their con-
tribution to the ideas set out here is certainly greater than they
themselves think. Another, but no less profound influence has
been Romano Madero, who made me conscious, in daily political
practice prior even to theoretical discussions, of the divergences
between the rules of political and of scientific work. It was above
all Gianni Massironi, Cristina Piva and Daniel Gabay (who
suggested the idea of diagrammatic representation to me) who
finally persuaded me to bring my long efforts to develop an un-
ambiguous critique of the theory of imperialism to a conclu-
sion. If I have succeeded in improving that critique, I owe it to
those who have had the patience to read and comment on the
original version of the manuscript, and in particular to Samir
Amin, Perry Anderson, Francesco Fenghi, Laura Fiocco,
Alberto Martinelli and Salvatore Veca. IfI have not succeeded,
the responsibility lies exclusively with me and with those few —
Giorgio, Sisa and Ombretta — whose ironic insistence has com-
pelled me to close this work.
Cosenza, September 1977 Giovanni ArrighiWhat we have to mention in order to explain the
significance, I mean the importance, of a concept,
are often extremely general facts of nature: such
facts as are hardly ever mentioned because of
their great generality.
Ludwig WittgensteinIntroduction
The purpose of this essay is to contribute towards a resolution
of the confusion, as much or more terminological as conceptual,
on which the renewal of theoretical debate on imperialism has
tended to run aground. Until some concrete steps are taken in
this direction, real communication between exponents of
diverse theories will continue to be precluded: debate will, at
the very most, clarify for each participant his own point of view,
but it will be unable to establish communication between
different points of view.
This problem was demonstrated at the seminar organized in
Oxford in 1969—70, the aim of which was to 'start a discussion
on the theoretical aspects of imperialism between Marxists and
non-Marxists, and among Marxists with rather varied ap-
proaches’.1 According to one of the two organizers, the seminar
‘ Bob Sutcliffe, 'Conclusion’ to Studies in the Theory of Imperialism, London
1972, p. 313. The importance of this seminar as a turning-point in the theoretical
debate on imperialism has been underlined by Michael Barratt Brown: 'Ten
years ago an attempt by this writer to call together a seminar of economists and
historians, to consider the problems of imperialism led to a meeting of just four
people. A renewed attempt at Oxford in 1969 produced several gatherings of
over a hundred social scientists and more than a score of papers, several of
them subsequently collected together in one volume.’ (The Economics of
Imperialism, London 1974, p. 17.) At one of these gatherings, I presented a
paper in which I argued that, after the Second World War, imperialism assumed
characteristics radically different from those that Hobson and Lenin had
attributed to it. During the discussion, someone asked me whether I did not
think that, by dint of filling 'old bottles’ (the theory of imperialism) with 'new
wine’ (the novel content being lent to the theory), we would end up no longer
knowing what was being discussed. I very rapidly perceived the significance of
this remark, and thus began the process of reflection that led to this essay.
.910
‘succeeded to the extent that many of the participants felt
clearer about their own views at the end than they had been at
the beginning. But in other ways it failed; on many occasions
discussions of some vehemence were conducted at what were
obviously cross purposes’.2
Both Sutcliffe and Owen put this lack of communication
down to the 'profound ambiguity’ of the term imperialism. In
particular, Sutcliffe observes that:
Marxists since Lenin have in fact fluctuated in their use of the term
imperialism. Very often it is used to describe the whole capitalist
system; just as often it refers to the relations between advanced and
backward countries within the system. Sometimes it is used in both
senses simultaneously, either with, or more often without, an
acknowledgement of the ambiguity involved. On the whole when
Marxist writers in the last two or three decades have written about
the theory of imperialism, they have been writing about under-
development and the international aspects of capitalism. This
ambiguity, therefore, lies at the roots of misunderstandings among
Marxists and between Marxists and non-Marxists; and it leads to
the failure to effect a marriage between Lenin’s writing on im-
perialism and contemporary Marxist writing about underdevelop-
ment. It is, therefore, much more than a semantic question.3
Accepting these premises, I resolved to attempt a reconstruction
of the theory of imperialism. This would, I hoped, make it
possible to dissipate some of the major ambiguities currently
surrounding the theory, and thus to provide new foundations
for the resumption of debate on it.
The first difficulty I encountered was to know what exact
significance to attach to Lenin’s famous definition of im-
perialism as 'the monopoly stage of capitalism’ — a stage which
is at the same time characterized as 'the last’ or 'the highest’.
This formulation may in fact be interpreted in two quite dis-
tinct ways: as a statement of fact and as a postulate of identity.
2 Sutcliffe, op. cit., p. 313.
3113101., p. 314.Introduction 11
In the former case, ‘imperialism’ and 'monopoly stage of
capitalism’ refer to different ensembles of phenomena which the
definition brings into inter-relationship without identifying the
one with the other. The precise character of these ensembles
and of the relation which unites them have then to be deter-
mined by reference to other, as yet implicit, definitions, which
must be inferred from the context in which the statement was
formulated. But, at any event, this reading implies that the
definition is submitted to some kind of empirical verification.
If it is instead regarded as a postulate of identity, then 'im-
perialism’ or ”monopoly stage of capitalism’ designate the
same ensemble of phenomena, and the definition escapes all
empirical control. We may well ask what is the utility of
designating the same object — that is, the same ensemble of
phenomena - by different terms; and we shall later attempt an
answer. But it would make no sense to ask whether the propo-
sition is true or false.
The problem arises because Lenin’s writings permit either
reading of the definition. Since it is generally interpreted as a
postulate of identity, we shall seek first of all to demonstrate
that Lenin’s arguments can on the contrary warrant us to read
it as a statement of fact.
Shortly before formulating his famous definition, Lenin
observed that: 'Colonial policy and imperialism existed before
the latest stage of capitalism, and even before capitalism. Rome,
founded on slavery, pursued a colonial policy and practised
imperialism. But "general” disquisitions on imperialism, which
ignore, or put in the background, the fundamental difference
between socio-economic formations, inevitably turn into the
most vapid banality and bragging, like the comparison:
"Greater Rome and Greater Britain”. Even the capitalist
colonial policy of previous stages of capitalism is essentially
different from the colonial policy of finance capital.’4 It would
appear, then, that for Lenin, imperialism is not the same thing
as capitalism or one of its stages — even though, in order to
4 V. I. Lenin, 'Imperialism: The Highest Stage of Capitalism, in Selected
Works, Vol. 1, Moscow 1970, p. 731. Emphasis in the original.12
avoid 'banalities’ which distract attention from the concrete
forms assumed by the phenomenon in different epochs, he
defines imperialism by its relation to the 'socio-economic for-
mation’ with which it co-exists at a given historical moment.
In other words, definition of imperialism must be historically
determinate: its validity must be continually checked against
the events and tendencies observable at a particular moment
or in a given situation. It is not by chance that, just when he
was formulating his definition, Lenin felt the need to warn that
no definition 'can [ever] embrace all the concatenations of a
phenomenon in its full development’ or possess more than 'a
conditional and relative value’.5
But if imperialism was not, for/Lenin, the same thing as the
monopoly stage of capitalism, although it had to be defined in
relation to it, what then did he designate by the term? The
answer does not lie in an explicit definition. For, as we have
just seen, what is the object of our enquiry was probably regar-
ded by Lenin as too obvious and banal to require explicit treat-
ment. The solution should rather be sought in the meaning,
that is the purpose, of the text in which his initial formulation
was to be found.
From this point of view, it is enough simply to leaf through
Imperialism: The Highest Stage of Capitalism in order to
realize that Lenin’s aim was to demolish Kautsky’s theses on
'ultra-imperialism’, or the theoretical and practical possibility
of a return to a relatively peaceful capitalism. This polemic
provides the context in which we should seek the significance
attached by Lenin not only to the term 'imperialism’, but also
to the principle that definitions ought to be historically deter-
minate. In fact, Lenin attacked the very manner in which
Kautsky posed the problem:
'From the purely economic point of view,’ writes Kautsky, 'it is not
impossible that capitalism will yet go through a new phase, that of
the extension of the policy of the cartels to foreign policy, the phase
of ultra-imperialism’, i.e., of a super-imperialism, of a union of the
imperialisms-of the whole world and not struggles among th'em, a
phase of 'the joint exploitation of the world by internationally
5 Ibid.. p. 737.Introduction 13
united finance capital’. . . .
If the purely economic point of view is meant to be a. 'pure’
abstraction, then all that can be said reduces itself to the following
proposition: development is proceeding towards monopolies, hence,
towards a single world monopoly, towards a single world trust. This
is indisputable, but it is also completely meaningless, as is the
statement that 'development is proceeding’ towards the manufac-
ture of foodstuffs in laboratories. In this sense the 'theory’ of ultra-
imperialism is no less absurd than a 'theory of ultra-agriculture’
would be. If, however, we are discussing the 'purely economic’ con-
ditions of the epoch of finance capital as a historically concrete
epoch which began at the turn of the twentieth century, then the
best reply that one can make to the lifeless abstractions of 'ultra-
imperialism’ . . . is to contrast them with the concrete economic
realities of the present-day world economy.6 '
For Lenin, then, the imperative that definitions be historically
determinate was an obligation to anchor his own polemic with
Kautsky in the concrete, observable realities of the world
economy at a given historical moment. The character of these
realities is set out a little later when Lenin, basing himself on
the thesis of 'uneven development’, perhaps his most original
contribution to the theory of imperialism, maintains that the
tendency towards war between imperialist states has become a
permanent and definitive feature of the world capitalist system:
Finance capital and the trusts do not diminish but increase the
differences in the rate of growth of the various parts of the world
economy. . . . Capitalism is growing with the greatest rapidity in the
colonies and in the overseas countries. Among the latter, new
imperialist powers are emerging (e.g. Japan). The struggle among
the world imperialisms is becoming more acute. The tribute levied
by finance capital on the most profitable colonial and overseas
enterprises is increasing. In the division of this booty, an excep-
tionally large part goes to countries which do not always stand at
the top of the list in the rapidity of the development of their produc-
tive forces . . . The question is: what means other than war could
there be under capitalism to overcome the disparity between the
development of productive forces and the accumulation of capital
on the one side, and the division of colonies and spheres of influence
for finance capital on the other?7
: Ibid., DP. 740—1.
Ibid., pp. 743—4. Emphasis in the original.14
The question is evidently a rhetorical one. But in order to avoid
ambiguity, Lenin reiterates with yet greater force in the con-
cluding pages of the pamphlet:
The only conceivable basis under capitalism for the division of
spheres of influence, interests, colonies, etc. is a calculation of the
strength of those participating, their general economic, financial,
military strength, etc. The strength of these participants in the
division does not change to an equal degree. for the even develop-
ment of' different undertakings, trusts, branches .of industry, or.
countries is impossible under capitalism . . . Therefore, in the
realities of the capitalist system . . . 'inter-imperialist’ or 'ultra-
imperialist’ alliances, no matter what form they may assume,
whether of one imperialist coalition against another, or of a general
alliance embracing all the imperialist powers, are inevitably noth-
ing more than a 'truce’ in periods between wars.8
These citations make it clear that 'at the bottom’ of Lenin’s
discourse on imperialism, even when he was speaking of mono-
poly or finance capital, of the export of capital, parasitism or
other aspects, lay the constancy of the tendency to war between
rival capitalist countries — the tendency which specifically
characterized the historical moment in which he was writing.
When he employed the term 'imperialism’, he was referring to
this tendency, which he defined in relation to 'monopoly
capital’. The reference must have seemed to him too evident and
commonplace to call for explicit treatment. Exploration of it
would, moreover, have carried him onto the terrain of 'general
disquisitions’, where his divergences with Kautsky risked being
overshadowed. For us, however, the reference is essential, if
we wish to read Lenin’s definition of imperialism not as a
simple postulate of identity, but as a statement of fact. The
definition could then be expressed thus: imperialism, or the
tendency to war between capitalist countries, is a necessary
consequence of the transformation of capitalism into monopoly
or finance capital. Since this transformation is in turn charac-
terized as an irreversible trend — and on this point, at least,
there was no difference between Lenin and Kautsky — the
8 Ibid., p. 761. Emphasis in the original.Introduction 15
corollary follows: monopoly capital as well as its necessary
consequence (the tendency to war between rival capitalist
countries) represent the final or the highest stage of capitalism.
This vision could not find a better synthesis than in the con-
cluding passage of Lenin’s preface to Bukha'rin’s Imperialism
and World Economy:
There is no doubt that the development is going in the direction of
a single world trust that will swallow up all enterprises and all
states without exception. But the development in this direction is
proceeding under such stress, with such a tempo, with such contra-
dictions, conflicts, and convulsions — not only economical, but also
political, national, etc., etc. — that before a single world trust will
be reached. before the respective national finance capitals will have
formed a world union of 'ultra-imperialism’, imperialism will in-
evitably explode, capitalism will turn into its opposite.9
If we now put this vision into a historical perspective, two
things must strike us at once: its consistency with the charac-
teristic scenario of the thirty years that followed its formula-
tion; and its growing irrelevance to the situation which has
gradually emerged in the thirty years since the Second World
War.
An observer of the world politico-economic system of the 30’s
and the first half of the 40’s could not fail to have been impressed
by the predictive capacity of Lenin’s 'model’. It is true that
some of the more attentive witnesses had already noticed the
emergence of a number of anomalies, above all those concern-
ing the concept of 'finance capital’ (cf. §§22—23).10 But on the
whole, Lenin’s estimate of a progressive decline in capitalist
market competition, accompanied by accentuated rivalry
between capitalist states on the politico-military level, was
fully confirmed by the near-complete breakdown of the world
market in the 30’s and the concomitant tendency to armed
conflict between capitalist countries which later issued in the
Second World War. Even the Soviet revolution could appear as
9 V. I. Lenin, ’Introduction’ to N. Bukharin. Imperialism and World Economy,
London 1972, p. 14.
'0 Unless otherwise indicated, section and chapter references apply to the
following essay.16'
a practical confirmation of the validity of this vision, as well as
a first partial verification of the judgment that 'imperialism
must inevitably explode, and capitalism turn into its opposite’.
However, the events of the next thirty years demonstrate that
even the most felicitous definition has a 'relative and condi-
tional value’ and can never ”embrace all the concatenations of
a phenomenon in its full development’ — as Lenin himself had
warned in formulating his definition of imperialism. In fact, the
unity of the world market was re-established and once again
became the typical, though not exclusive, ’site’ of capitalist
competition. At the same time, rivalry between capitalist coun-
tries on the politico-military level has ceased to play a role of
any prominence; while instead of a fresh division of the world
among the states of these countries, the post-war epoch has
witnessed their return to their own national boundaries. Con-
comitantly with this reversal of the trend that marked the
capitalist world during the previous thirty years, the Soviet
Union has for many ceased to appear as the embryo of a new
world - the 'opposite’ into which capitalism should have trans-
formed itself —.— and become ever more like the centre of a new
empire, not in the sense which the term had meanwhile acquired
in Marxist theory, but in the traditional acceptation of a
'hierarchical order among states’.
These assertions will be explained and qualified in the course
of the essay that follows (particularly in Chapter 3). They are
made at this point solely in order to stress the fact that major
events and trends since the end of the Second World War
constitute macroscopic anomalies with regard to Lenin’s theory
of imperialism; and that the inability of Marxists to grasp them
as such is perhaps the principal cause of the ambiguities and
misunderstandings on which the theoretical debate of the
60’s and 70’s has run aground. Faced with the emergence of
these anomalies, most Marxists failed to heed Lenin’s warning
of the relative and conditional value of every definition — all
more cogent in the case of a definition that was avowedly his-
torically determinate — and refused to abandon Lenin’s charac-
terization of imperialism. The predominant response was
instead to preserve the definition by withdrawing it fromIntroduction 1 7
empirical verification; that is to say, by re-interpreting it as a
'historically indeterminate’ postulate of identity. '
'Imperialism’ and 'monopoly stage of capitalism’ have in
effect been converted into synonyms. Since Marxists have been
unable or unwilling to admit that imperialism, the monopoly
stage of capitalism, was not after all the highest stage of
capitalism, they have progressively extended the meaning of
the two synonyms so as to make them comprehend the whole
range of phenomena which have characterized capitalism in
the post-war period. Consequently, not only have diverse
terms (imperialism, monopoly capital, finance capital, etc.)
come to designate different, and even antithetical, phenomena:
war and peace, suppression and reactivation of market com-
petition, portfolio and direct investment, and so on. The very
expression 'uneven development’, by which Lenin referred to
the reversal of the relative positions of advanced and backward
countries, has come to assume the opposite significance of a
widening gulf between such positions.
It is no wonder, then, that by the end of the 60’s, what had
once been ‘the pride’ of Marxism — the theory of imperialism11
— had become a ”Tower of Babel’, in which not even Marxists
knew any longer how to find their way. The truly surprising
thing is that even those scholars who were most alert to the
changing pattern of international capitalist relations, felt
obliged to pay a tribute to Lenin where none was due, compound-
ing the confusion.12
” According to Sutclifi'e, for example, practically 'all discussions of imperial-
ism at a theoretical level assign importance to the Marxist theory — either as an
explanation which is satisfactory or one which is erroneous but requiring
challenge . . . Hardly any non-Marxist economist gives serious consideration
to the Marxist theory of value, for instance; but very few historians on the
question fail to acknowledge what they conceive to be the Marxist theory of
imperialism.’ Op. cit., p. 312.
12I am referring especially to the works of Harry Magdofi' (The Age of
Imperialism, New York and London 1970) and James O’Connor ('The Economic
Meaning of Imperialism’. in R. I. Rhodes (ed.), Imperialism and Underdevelop-
ment: A Reader, New York 1970. While providing an extremely accurate
analysis of post-war American imperialism, they seem to argue that Lenin’s
theses are not only still valid, but are even more so than when they were
initially formulated.18
Such attachment to Lenin’s paradigm13 was not in itself
without a certain justification, even from a strictly scientific
point of view. In the natural sciences, too, 'once it has achieved
the status of paradigm, a scientific theory is declared invalid
only if an alternate candidate is available to take its place. No
process yet disclosed by the historical study of scientific
development at all resembles the methodological stereotype of
falsification by direct comparison with nature. . . . The act of
judgment that leads scientists to reject a previously accepted
theory is always based upon more than a comparison of that
theory with the world. The decision to reject one paradigm is
always simultaneously the decision to accept another, and the
judgment leading to that decision involves the comparison of
both paradigms with nature and with each other.’14
From this second point of view, the confrontation did not
give much ground for comfort. In practice, abandonment of
Lenin’s paradigm was generally associated with the thesis of '
'the end of imperialism’, which stood in evident contrast to the
'imperial’ role assumed by the United States on a world scale
after the Second World War. Moreover, the criticisms levelled
against Lenin’s theory were often based on manifest distor-
tions of the spirit and the letter of his writings, and, as a rule,
attacked him at his strongest point or his fidelity to the sce-
nario of the first half of the 20th century.15 Thus, if Marxists
are to be reproached, it is not because they failed to abandon
Lenin’s paradigm as soon as the first anomalies for it arose, but
‘3 Thomas Kuhn defines 'paradigms’ as 'universally recognized scientific
achievements that for a time provide model problems and solutions to a com-
munity of practicioners’. (The Structure of Scientific Revolutions, Chicago 1962,
p. x.) The acquisition of a paradigm, and of the more sophisticated type of scien-
tific research that it allows, is a sign of maturity in a scientific discipline. With-
out it, the latter is marked by continual competition between various schools,
differentiated by 'their incommensurable ways of seeing the world and of prac-
tising science in it’. (Ibid., p. 4.) Whatever one may say, the social and political
sciences are still immature in this sense, and use of the term 'paradigm’ with
reference to their field of study is inappropriate. IfI employ the term when
discussing the theories of Lenin and Hobson, it is simply to emphasize their
location within a given field of study and a particular school (that of Marxism).
‘4 Kuhn, op. cit., p. 77.
’5 The thesis of 'the end of imperialism’ is associated in particular with John
Strachey (The End of Empire, London 1959). Criticism of Lenin’s theory as aIntroduction 19
because they never developed a sufficiently precise and articu-
lated conceptual apparatus to alert them to the appearance of
such anomalies. Novelty, in fact, 'ordinarily emerges only for
the man who, knowing with precision what he should expect, is
able to recognize that something has gone wrong. Anomaly
appears only against the background provided by the para-
digm. The more precise and far-reaching that paradigm is, the
more sensitive an indicator it provides of anomaly and hence
of an occasion for paradigm change’.16
Apart from certain isolated cases,17 the efforts of Marxists,
during the period when Lenin’s conception of imperialism
corresponded most closely to reality, were directed not so much
towards refinement of his conceptual apparatus, as to mechani-
cal and ritualistic repetition of his pronouncements. Lacking a
sufficiently precise conceptual structure, they then found
themselves unprepared to tackle even such macroscopic ano-
malies as those which became manifest after the Second
World War. Instead of isolating and ordering these, to see to
what their effective consequences for the paradigm were,
Marxists took the course described above — displacement of
anomalies from the field of analysis into ever increasing ambi-
guities and imprecisions of language.
* * *
The argument we have developed so far may have given the
impression that our projected reconstruction of the theory of
imperialism could be based on a 'retum to Lenin’ which would

representation of the imperialism of his epoch has been advanced principally
by J. Gallagher and R. Robinson ('The Imperialism of Free Trade’, in Economic
History Review, Vol. 6, No. 1, 1953) and by D._K. Fieldhouse (”'Imperialism”:
An Historiographical Revision’, Economic History Review, Vol. 14, No. 2, 1961);
their positions have recently been taken over by a number of Marxists, such as
A. Emmanuel ('White Settler Colonialism and the Myth of Investment Imperial-
ism’, New Left Review, No. 73, May—June 1972).
”I Kuhn, op. cit., p. 65.
_ ‘ ' I am referring especially to Maurice Dobb (Political Economy and Capital-
lsm, London 1940, ch. 7) and Paul Sweezy (The Theory of Capitalist DeveIOp-
ment, London 1946, pt. 4).20
circumvent the ambiguities of the 'Marxists since Lenin’. In
reality, as we have already stressed, Lenin’s Imperialism is
itself not free from ambiguity. If we have found sufficient
grounds for reading his definition of imperialism as a statement
of fact, we may find just as many for taking it as a postulate of
identity. The terms 'imperialism’, ’monopoly stage of capital-
ism’, 'finance capital’ are employed in that text interchangeably.
as if they designated the same ensemble of phenomena. This
linguistic imprecision, itself already symptomatic of the non-
scientific limits of the pamphlet, is the more serious in that the
empirical and relativist position of its author continually
tends to pass into a dogmatic and rigidly deterministic stand-
point. The very passages quoted above, by excluding the possi-
bility of future developments other than those envisaged by
Lenin, indicate a degree of assurance which is in marked
contradiction both with his warning of the relative and con-
ditional value of all definitions, and with his prescription to
keep to historically determinate definitions.
In effect, the terminological ambiguity is integral to Lenin’s
paradigm and, I think, stems from a confusion of the rules of
scientific work with those of political activity. Some Marxists,
of course, will reject the very idea of a distinction between
political and scientific labour, contending that only revolu-
tionary practice can produce political science and only politics
based on a scientific analysis of reality can be revolutionary.
But leaving aside the fact that, in the present crisis of the
paradigm, it is difficult if not impossible for these same Marx-
ists to agree upon the meaning of this proposition, any militant
who has reflected upon his own political practice must accept
that, in political activity, 'theory’ does not serve solely as a
guide to action. Indeed, this can sometimes be a secondary role,
in cases where it performs a number of other functions which
are in varying degrees incompatible with the most elementary
rules of scientific work.
In such instances, theory functions above all to reassure
adherents of the success of their political action. Consequently,
any relativistic and conditional approach, if it is accepted for
the purposes of defining the present in relation to the past, isIntroduction 2]
put to one side when it becomes a question of defining the future
in relation to the present. That is ultimately what Lenin’s own
procedure is in Imperialism: The Highest Stage of Capitalism.
He first asserts that the definition of imperialism must be his-
torically determinate if it is not to fall into the 'Greater Rome
and Greater Britain’ type of banality; then he effectively main-
tains that his own characterization, while determinate with
regard to a particular historical conjuncture. will remain valid
until the final goal is reached — that of making imperialism
'explode’ and transforming capitalism into its 'opposite’.
Typically, this function of theory is often closely connected
to another — reproduction and expansion of the consensus with
which a given party or political group pursues its objectives.
From this point of view, the ambiguity of the terms in which
theory is expressed, and of the concepts which comprise it, is
- not a disadvantage but an advantage. A theory which is too
precise and too clearly articulated does not normally exhibit
great mobilizing power: its distinctive features foster sec-
tarianism and lead to the paralysis of action. Terminological
and conceptual ambiguities leave room for forms of political
mediation — for example, mobilization of social groups with
diverse ideological representations around a single objective;
or use of a given ideological representation as a lever for
mobilizing a particular social group around objectives which
it does not immediately grasp as its own. Thus, the real meaning
of the postulate of an identity between 'imperialism’ and
'monopoly stage of capitalism’ may be an attempt to unify three
diverse ideological representations: that of the oppressed
nations of the world (to whom the expression 'imperialism’
relates); that of the working class (to whom the expression
'capitalism’ relates); and that of the peasant or artisanal petty
bourgeoisie (to whom the expression 'monopoly’ and/or
'finance’ relates).
Even more important, perhaps, is a potential third function.
Once adopted by a political organization, a theory will often
tend to form part of its general ideological representations, on
the basis of which its members distinguish, in daily political
work, their own positions from the sometimes similar ones of22 Introduction
rival organizations. In these cases, theory becomes a kind of
charter or statute defining the positions of various political
groups and parties, and the distances or boundaries which de-
limit them from one another. Since ideological representations
change only slowly and with difficulty, mutations at the level of
'theory’ may have far from minor organizational repercussions,
especially on those organizations which, like Marxist parties,
attach great weight to theory. However, what enters into these
ideological representations is not so much the 'signified’ as the
'signifiers’ in which the 'theory’ is expressed. The appearance
of anomalies will then as a rule inspire changes, not in the
terms or signifiers of the theory, but rather in the signified.
These observations point towards what might be called an
anthropology of politics,18 which is beyond the scope of the
present investigation. If they are introduced here, it is solely in
order to demonstrate that what appears senseless from the
point of view of scientific work — for instance, the tendency to
transfer anomalies from the plane of analysis to that of lan-
guage — may not necessarily be so from the perspective of a
more or less conscious political logic. The incapacity of
Marxists to specify and articulate the Leninist theory of im-
perialism to alert them to the emergence of anomalies, may
therefore be ascribed not to accidental factors, including
possible 'subjective’ deficiencies, but to one of the fundamental
characteristics of Lenin’s paradigm itself— namely, a subordi-
nation of scientific exigencies to those of political activity.
Dissolution of the ambiguities of the term 'imperialism’ pre-
supposes a reversal of this relationship, so that the anomalies
are returned from the plane of language to that of analysis.
From this point of view, a 'retum to Lenin’ offers no solution:
it would lead us to a rediscovery in nuce of all the ambiguities
that have affected 'Marxists since Lenin’. I have thus en-
” The reference to anthropology rests upon the apparent similarities between
certain functions that are often assigned to 'theory’ and those attributed by
anthropologists to the 'myth’. Of course, whatever the functional relationships
of theory to politics in a given epoch or conjuncture, these are not immutable.
They should on the contrary be put in a historical perspective to trace the
changes in them, and the greater or lesser degree of variance between them and
the exigencies of scientific work.Introduction 23
deavoured to go ‘beyond’ Lenin, or to go back to the sources of
his scientific thinking on imperialism, leaving for a later date
analysis of the transformation of that thought into a political
doctrine.19
In the present study, Hobson is treated essentially as a 'source’
of Lenin’s scientific thinking on imperialism. Many will pro-
bably dissent from this assessment of the relationship between
the two. Sutcliffe, for example, argues that the idea of a theory of
imperialism common to 'Hobson and Lenin’ is a myth invented
by non-Marxist historians and economists: 'As is well-known,
Lenin was greatly indebted to Hobson for the evidence he pro-
duced of the relations between British imperial policy and capi-
tal exports. But Lenin owed scarcely anything to Hobson from
a theoretical point of View. . . . To speak of a "Hobson-Lenin
theory”, therefore, is greatly to exaggerate the theoretical
proximity of the two. Lenin explicitly repudiated Hobson’s
theoretical perspective.’20
It seems to me that this standpoint conflicts both with Lenin’s
explicit acknowledgment, in the preface to his work,21 of his
scientific debt to Hobson and Hilferding, and with Lenin’s
continual references to the theses or hypotheses of Hobson
which he had made his own and placed at the centre of his
analysis. I have in mind not only, nor even primarily, the
hypothesis of a link between export of capital and territorial
expansion (here even Sutclifi’e concedes Lenin’s debt), nor yet
the associated hypothesis of a tendency to parasitism in the
imperialist countries. I am referring above all to the fact that
’9 I originally intended to examine both Hobson’s work on imperialism and
Hilferding’s analysis of finance capital — the two scientific sources to which
Lenin referred. This examination was in turn to be only the foundation for an
investigation of Lenin’s 'theory’ as a form of reduction of incommensurable
scientific theories to a political doctrine. As my research proceeded, however,
Hobson’s thought proved to be so analytically stimulating that it absorbed all
my energies and forced me to leave for another occasion the study of both
Hilferding and Lenin.
:0 Sutclifi‘e, op. cit., p. 315.
’ Lenin, op. cit. (1970), p. 671.24
Lenin himself praised Hobson as the first writer to have for-
mulated a definition of imperialism determinate to the con-
crete historical conditions of their epoch:
Kautsky, while claiming that he continues to advocate Marxism,
as a matter of fact takes a step backward compared with the social-
liberal Hobson, who more correctly takes into account two 'historic-
ally concrete’ (Kautsky’s definition is a mockery of historical
concreteness!) features of modern imperialism: (1) the competition
between several imperialisms, and (2) the predominance of the
financier over the merchant.22
Lenin’s concurrence with this definition strengthens our claim
that the question of war between rival capitalist countries was
'at the basis’ of his discourse on imperialism. At the same time,
it demonstrates that Lenin shared not just a few isolated
hypotheses, but the very mode in which Hobson had outlined
his diagnosis of imperialism. With regard to this diagnosis, the
differences between Lenin and Hobson were essentially two-
fold and derived entirely from the distinct 'spatio-temporal’
positions from which they observed the phenomena of im-
perialism. I
In the first place, Hobson had been writing ten years before
the outbreak of the Great War, and his principal concern was
precisely to point to those tendencies which seemed to him to
be leading towards such an event (cf. Chapter 3). Lenin, on the
other hand, was writing after the outbreak of the First World
War, and he was mainly preoccupied with demonstrating the
precariousness of any peace that would follow it — hence his
most original contribution in comparison with Hobson, namely,
the thesis that 'uneven development’ would rekindle the con-
flict among capitalist countries for a fresh redivision of the
world (cf. Chapter 3). Secondly, Hobson’s theory referred
especially to late 19th century England. Even though, as Lenin
put it, this was the country 'richest in colonies, in finance
capital, and in imperialist experience’,23 it was also the nation
where concentration of the- productive apparatus had fallen
22 Ibid., p. 739. Emphasis in the original.
23 Ibid., p. 747.Introduction 25
furthest behind the levels attained on the European continent,
particularly in Germany, which was at the centre of Hilferding’s
analysis - that other scientific source of Lenin’s work. This
explains why, in the latter’s account, capitalist concentration
plays such a decisive role in furthering the rise of monopoly
capital and imperialism, whereas this phenomenon is virtually
absent from Hobson’s account.
However, this second difference does not. as it may seem at
first, redound entirely to Lenin’s advantage. His analysis
remains undecided between two diverse and incommensurable
conceptions of 'finance capital’. The sense in which Hobson’s
conception was incommensurable with that of Hilferding will
be explained in our conclusion, when at least one of the two
will be defined. For the moment, it is enough to mention the fact
that, for Hobson, the expression 'finance capital’ (or analogous
terms be employed) designated a supranational entity which had
almost no links with any productive apparatus; whereas for
Hilferding, it referred to an entity of a national character whose
ties with the productive apparatus tended to be extremely close.
Lenin continually oscillated between these two notions, with-
out ever differentiating between them in a clear and explicit
manner. Indeed, he leaves the unmistakable impression that he
draws no distinction between the two, consciously or un-
consciously employing a single term 'finance capital’ to
designate quite distinct ensembles of phenomena.
If we disregard these two differences, Lenin does not seem to
have diverged a great deal, at the diagnostic level, from Hob-
son’s theoretical positions. In fact, what Lenin explicitly
refuted was not so much Hobson’s theoretical construction as
the political conclusions which he drew from his diagnosis. It
is in the latter respect that Hobson, who is normally counter-
posed to Kautsky, is finally equated with him: 'This is also the
main attitude taken by Hobson in his critique of imperialism.
Hobson anticipated Kautsky in protesting against the ‘in-
evitability of imperialism’ argument, and in urging the neces-
sity of 'increasing the consuming capacity’ of the people (under
capitalism!).’24
2“ Ibid. p. 754.26'
Even in this case, it is not Hobson’s diagnosis of a tendency
to underconsumption (or to overproduction, if the reader
prefers) which is rejected by Lenin. As Ferrari Bravo has
observed: 'The schema used to explain the relationship between
centralization and export of capital is rigidly under-consump-
tionist and repeats point for point that adopted by Hobson:
"the inevitable poverty of the masses” and the necessary rela-
tive backwardness of agriculture restrict domestic investment
outlets, as the rate of profit declines and the possibility of
obtaining super-profits from speculative or non-speculative
operations on international markets contracts.’25 What Lenin
denied was the view that the tendency to underconsumption
could be reversed in a capitalist regime — a view which, as we
shall see (§§22—24), has proved to be correct in the long-run.
Having said this, however, there remains a sense in which it
is true that Lenin rejected Hobson’s theoretical construction.
For if we understand by such a rejection the subordination of
the rules of scientific method to those of political action, then
this was a stance that Lenin certainly adopted. The opening
passage of Hobson’s Imperialism: A Study — with which I
intentionally begin the following essay — shows that, from the
standpoint which interests us here, Lenin and Hobson were
moving in opposite directions. Lenin used the results of his own
and others’ scientific research within a political logic which
led him to 'expand and distort’ the meaning of the terms in
which the theory was expressed; whereas Hobson set out to
define the concept of imperialism as univocally as possible and
in direct counterposition to the tendency of politicians to
expand or distort its meaning.
It should be clear by now that Hobson represents neither the
genuine or peculiar object of the present investigation (which is
evidently not concerned with the history of political or econo-
mic thought), nor a simple pretext for the introduction of a new
theory of imperialism. The reconstruction which I have
25 L. Ferrari Bravo, 'Vecchie e nuove questioni nella teoria dell’imperial-
ismo’, Introduction to idem. (ed.) Imperialismo e Classe Operaia Multinazionale,
Milan 1975, pp. 11—12. Emphasis in the original.Introduction 27
attempted is in fact intended neither as a simple reproduction
of the thought of this or that theoretician — a procedure which
would leave us with an aggregation of incommensurable points
of view — nor as a new production claiming to start from an
object (imperialism) which can only be seized within the
scientific or ideological representations that are given of it.
Hobson represents rather the filter by means of which I have
examined the presuppositions of the theory of imperialism in
order to explicate, specify and delimit them. The result of this
investigation resembles a Weberian construction of ideal
types, in which, as is well known, certain elements are isolated
from the multiplicity of empirical data so that they may then
be co-ordinated in a conceptual framework. This framework
differs from reality, with which it is not interchangeable, but
empirical data must be referred to it in order to acquire
meaning.26
Our construction proceeds by stages. In Chapter 1, under the
guidance of the analysis developed by Hobson in the first pages
of his study, four elements are isolated: colonialism, formal
empire, informal empire or internationalism, and imperialism
in the strict and specific sense of the term. On the basis of these
will stand the whole of the successive construction. These four
primary elements are themselves ideal types of 'expansionism’
or 'imperialism’ in the broad sense. Their significations are,
however, defined in relation to one another through a series of
distinctions and oppositions which allow them to be conceived
2" For Weber, an ideal type is 'formed by the one-sided accentuation of one or
more points of view and by the synthesis of a great many diffuse, discrete, more
or less present and occasionally absent concrete individual phenomena, which
are arranged according to those one-sidedly emphasized viewpoints into a
unified analytical construct (Gedankenbild ). In its conceptual purity, this
mental construct (Gedankenbild) cannot be found anywhere in reality. It is a
utopia. Historical research faces the task of determining in each individual
case, the extent to which this ideal-construct approximates to or diverges from
reality.’ (0n the Methodology of the Social Sciences, New York 1949, p. 90.) I have
Said that the construction expounded in this essay is 'similar’, rather than
'ldentical’, to a Weberian ideo-typical construction. There are two main reasons
for this: the ambiguity of the term 'utopia’ which Weber himself uses to define
Ideo-typical constructions; and the absence in his ideal types of any 'structural’
character in the sense explained in the following pages.28
as co-ordinates of a topological or structural space.” The con-
struction thus comes to resemble not only Weber’s ideal-
typical constructions, but also those of the French structural-
ists. It might be situated 'half-way’ between the two, and in this
sense, may perhaps be called an ideo-typical structure.28
This structure is completed in Chapters 2 and 3, where the
four primary ideal types are articulated in four compound ideal
types, to which correspond an equal number of historically
determinate definitions of imperialism: nationalist, formal, in-
formal, and imperialism tout court. The aim of this operation is
to demonstrate that every historically determinate definition
presupposes the determination of a grid (or conceptual frame-
work, or ideo-typical structure), from which the definition is
so to speak cut away, while the rest of the structure is put on
one side or relegated to the shade. To reconstruct a theory is
precisely to bring to light again what disappeared into the
shade in a given structure, in such a way as to exhibit the rela-
tive or conditional character of that which was given promi-
nence by a particular definition (in this case, Hobson’s defini-
tion). .
_ The elaboration of the ideo-typical structure presupposed by
Hobson’s definition proceeds both by reference to the im-
perialism of the power hegemonic in Hobson’s day, namely
England (Chapter 2), and by reference to the imperialism of the
powers which were emerging at the beginning of the 20th
century and which subsequently conquered world hegemony:
Germany in the 30’s, and the United States after the Second
World War (Chapter 3). This dual reference allows us to show
27 G. Deleuze, 'Par quoi se reconnait le structuralisme ?’ in F. Chatelet, (ed.)
Histoire de la philosophie, Vol. 8, Le XX siecle, Paris 1973.
2” Caution is needed here since the structuralists themselves do not seem to
agree on what may be considered a ‘structuralist construction’. In general, it
would appear that the procedure in this essay satisfies both those criteria
formulated by Deleuze (op. cit.) and the quite distinct set advanced by Piaget
(Le Structuralisme, Paris 1968) even though, in the case of some of them, the
correspondence is highly obscure and/or partial. For example, the self-
regulation to which Piaget attaches so much importance is present in this essay
only up to the point where (in Chapter 4) the introduction of a third dimension
dissolves the closure and consistency of the two-dimensional structure.Introduction 2.9
how the four primary types of expansionism‘, which Hobson
isolated in the empirical data of the imperialism of his epoch,
define not only a synchronic, but also a diachronic order; how,
in other words, the ideo-typical structure is at the same time an
ideo-typical genesis, and how the latter possesses a cyclical and
repetitive character. Thus, two features become simultaneously
apparent: the diachronic and synchronic relativity of that con-
cept of imperialism which Hobson demarcated as the specific
object of his study; and the capacity of Hobson’s ideo-typical
structure to order historico-empirical material which he him-
self did not, or could not, take into consideration.
Since the idea-typical structure may assume a genetic form,
and since reference will continually be made to historico-
empirical material, it is perhaps opportune to recall Weber’s
admonition that 'ideal-typical developmental constructs and
history are to be sharply distinguished from each other. . . . The
maintenance of this distinction in all its rigour often becomes
uncommonly difficult in practice due to a certain circumstance.
In the interest of the concrete demonstration of an ideal type or
of an ideal-typical developmental sequence, one seeks to make
it clear by the use of concrete illustrative material drawn from
empirical-historical reality. The danger of this procedure,
which in itself is entirely legitimate, lies in the fact that his-
torical knowledge here appears as a servant of theory instead
of the opposite role. It is a great temptation for the theorist to
regard this relationship either as the normal one, or, far worse,
to mix theory with history and indeed to confuse them with
each other. This occurs in an extreme way when an ideal con-
struct of a developmental sequence and a conceptual classifica-
tion of the ideal-types of certain cultural structures . . . are
integrated into a genetic classification. The series of types
which results from the selected conceptual criteria appears
then as an historical sequence unrolling with the necessity of
a law. The logical classification of analytical concepts on the
one hand and the empirical arrangements of the events thus
conceptualized in space, time, and causal relationship, on the
other, appear to be so bound up together that there is an almost
irresistible temptation to do violence to reality in order to30
prove the real validity of the construct.’29
The risks of 'doing violence to reality’ are indeed numerous,
often even unavoidable, but it is as well to understand what
they involve. There is first of all an original and unavoidable
act of 'violence’, without which social science could not even
exist. Thus, the initial choice of any pair of 'opposites’ (the
primary types) on the basis of which historico-empirical
material is ordered and structured, is imposed on this material
from without by the adoption of position towards it, which
expresses what Weber called at once an individual 'sentiment’
and 'will’, and a given 'view of the world’.30 There is no innate
characteristic in things themselves which allows us to isolate
one of their parts; 'A chaos of "existential judgments” about
countless individual events would be the only result of a serious
attempt to analyse reality "without presuppositions”. . . . Order
is brought into this chaos only on the condition that in every
case only a part of concrete reality is interesting and significant
to us, because only it is related to the cultural values with which
we approach reality.’31
Thus the initial choice by which the object of study is con-
stituted unfailingly ‘does violence to reality’, by imposing on it
a structure which is not 'its own’, but which derives from 'our’
world-view and our 'concrete’ will and sensation. This original
violence is evident in the illustrative use of historico-empirical
material to be found in Chapter 1 of this essay, where reference
to empirical data predominantly serves to exemplify the sig-
nificance of the four primary ideal types which are being isola-
ted within the empirical data themselves.
I said ‘predominantly’, because the scientific use of historico-
empirical material is never reducible, even in this initial phase,
to the simple function of exemplifying ideal types imposed on
reality. After all, ‘our’ world-view and 'our’ concrete will and
sensation, which determine the position we take towards
reality, are themselves part of reality, and their configuration
2" Weber, op. cit., pp. 102—3. Emphasis in the original.
30 Ibid., p. 165.
3‘ Ibid., p. 78. Emphasis in the original.Introduction 31
is directly or indirectly influenced by those same events which
constitute the historico-empirical material, or at least by some
of them. A war, a peace, a massacre, a famine, a revolt, a scienti-
fic discovery will normally come to form part, albeit chaotically
and often unconsciously, of the representations of our imagina-
tion, influencing the way in which we look at and see things.
In effect, the adoption of a definite position towards the chaos
of empirical data must include a position towards the chaos of
our imaginative representations of those data. An ideo-typical
construction, in other words, must be able to order, in an
univocal conceptual framework, those great events which are
generally considered in a particular epoch to be relevant to the
phenomenon under investigation. Reference to empirical data,
then, always has a significance over and above mere illustra-
tion of ideo-typical constructions — namely, verification of their
relevance and univocality. At the same time it should be
stressed that the object of verification is not a hypothesis, since
'[the ideo-typical concept] is no hypothesis, but it offers gui-
dance to the construction of hypotheses. It is not a description
of reality but it aims to give unambiguous means of expression
to such a description?”2 What calls for verification is whether
and to what extent a given ideo-typical structure can generate
a univocal order of relevant hypotheses.
The main difficulty which I had to resolve in Chapters 2 and 3
was then precisely the following: how to 'integrate’ an univocal
representation of what are generally considered as the major
events of the last 300 years of great-power imperialism, with an
ideo-typical structure whose primary elements were already
defined by Hobson. It is here that the problem of 'not doing
violence to reality’ arises. For while we try to articulate and
specify the ideo-typical structure in such a way as to maxi-
mize its conformity with certain privileged factual data, we
must not confuse such a structure with 'the real’, nor claim
that it includes more than it is able or seeks to embrace.
Essential to this task of integration was the production of a
topological space — constituted as an order of proximity of
32 Ibid., p. 90. The final emphasis is added.32 Introduction
primary and compound ideal types — capable of a univocal
representation* of Hobson’s ideo-typical structure as it was
progressively explicated. The fact that the topological space
thereby produced thus remains pre-mathematical — in the sense
that known theorems do not apply to it — does not diminish its
importance. For without reference to a symbolic order, there
would be a continual risk of relapse into the chaos of empirical
data on the one hand. and the disorder of our imaginative and
ideological representations on the other. Weber’s justification
of the reduction of historical individuals and their elements to
ideal types is also valid mutatis mutandis for the reduction of
the ideal type to a pure sign, that is, to a 'position’ in a struc-
tural space; 'The discursive nature of our knowledge, i.e., the
fact that we comprehend reality only through a chain of
intellectual modifications, postulates such a conceptual short-
hand. Our imagination can often dispense with explicit con-
ceptual formulations as a means of investigation. But as regards
exposition, to the extent that it wishes to be unambiguous, the
use of precise formulations in the sphere of cultural analysis is
in many cases absolutely necessary.’33
* 'k *
In Chapters 2 and 3 of this essay, then, I have sought to demon-
strate the relative and conditional character of Hiobson’s
definition of imperialism, while at the same time emphasizing
the stability of the ideo-typical structure presupposed by such
a definition. In the fourth and final chapter, however, I have
tried to show that this same structure is unstable and transitory.
To this end I have introduced a third co-ordinate — defined by a
new pair of antithetical ideal types (finance capital — multi-
national capital) — which, so to speak, 'divides’ and ultimately
* Tr. Note. The term 'univocal representation’, used throughout The Geometry
of Imperialism, is taken from the epistemology of Galvano Della Volpe, as is
'historically determinate definition’. For an account of the meaning of 'uni-
vocal’ here, see Galvano Della Volpe, Critique of Taste, NLB, London 1978.
Chapter Two.
33 Ibid., p. 94. Emphasis in the original.Introduction 33
'dissolves’ the two-dimensional structure within which our
reasoning had hitherto proceeded.
I do not need to anticipate here an argument which is ex-
pressed in the following essay in a manner that is perhaps
already too compressed. But it may be useful to explain why
‘capitalism’ appears so late on the scene — almost at the end of
the performance. After all, Hobson’s theory is famous precisely
for the connection that it established between 'imperialism’
and 'capitalism’; and this link is indeed its peculiar and original
feature. As the reader will already have realized, however, the
problem lies in the fact that the re-construction of a theory is an
operation which is in a certain sense the inverse of its con-
struction.
To construct a theory is to leave in the shade either its pre-
suppositions (in order to illuminate its specific object) or the
definition of that object itself (in order to illuminate the con-
nections, whether causal or less direct, which link its com-
ponents to one another and to the components of other en-
sembles). This procedure is justified when either the definition
of the object of study or its own presuppositions may be
discounted; when it is enough to expound the theory for its
interlocutors to know or intuit the subject and the purpose of
the discussion. The problem of the re-construction of a theory
arises when neither of these two conditions is satisfied — when,
as is the case in the present theoretical debate on imperialism,
no one is quite sure any more what is being discussed and why
it is being discussed. It is then necessary to adopt a procedure
that is the inverse of that normally followed in the construction
of a theory: we have to bring to light again the presuppositions
of the theory and to concentrate on defining its object.
This is the principal reason why two-thirds of the essay which
follows intentionally leaves on one side the concept of capital-
ism. It was first of all essential to explicate something that was
perfectly obvious and banal for participants in the debate at the
beginning of the century, but which contributors to the new
debate have lost from sight: that is to say, we had to define in as
precise a manner as possible that ensemble of tendencies
designated by the term 'imperialism’ which was brought into34
relation with the ensemble designated by the term 'capitalism’.
The change of perspective does not diminish the importance of
this relation. Indeed, it is only when the dimension of 'capital-
ism' is introduced that the first links of sufficient causation can
be glimpsed — only then does a predominantly static structure
begin to acquire dynamic force. It is true, however, that the
relation between capitalism and imperialism emerges with
altered dimensions, in the sense that it is located within a
broader conceptual framework, which the original formulation
had left in the shade.
This change of perspective is responsible for some of the
omissions and schematic features of the following analysis.
Others should be put down to our abstention, motivated above,
from attempting to include within a given ideo-typical struc-
ture more than it can, or is intended to, cover. Yet others,
perhaps the most important, are due to the simple necessity to
keep the puzzle within the limits of my ability to solve it. Thus
only nation-states that have conquered world hegemony are
made the object of representation; the social dimension is not
introduced, and, consequently, neither classes nor'the class
struggle are explicitly treated - an omission that also marks
many other theories of imperialism; nor, finally, does the essay
go on, as originally planned, to examine other ideo-typical
structures, above all that presupposed by Hilferding’s theory of
finance capital.
In reality, as we shall remark in our conclusion, this work is
no more than a first step into a territory that is still completely
unexplored. There is naturally no guarantee that it will not
open up a 'false track’. If such were the case, then Bacon’s
maxim34 could be our motto: 'Truth will sooner come out from
error than from confusion.’
3“ 'Second Book of Aphorisms’, Bacon: Selections, New York 1928, p. 415.' l.
The Coordinates
Nationalism and Imperialism:
The Premises of Hobson’s Definition
It is no easy task to define the concept of imperialism. The same
term is customarily used to designate diverse, and in certain
respects antithetical, concepts. Indeed, theoretical controversy
is often based on nothing more than a failure to grasp what is
the object of reference.
J. A. Hobson was well aware of these problems when he made
the first attempt to put a study of the phenomenon on a scientific
footing:
Amid the welter of vague political abstractions, to lay one’s finger
accurately upon any ‘ism’ so as to pin it down and mark it out by
definition seems impossible. Where meanings shift, so quickly and
so subtly, not only following changes of thought, but often mani-
pulated artificially by political practicioners so as to obscure,
expand or distort, it is idle to demand the same rigour as is expected
in the exact sciences. A certain broad consistency in its relations to
other kindred terms is the nearest approach to definition which
such a term as imperialism admits. Nationalism, internationalism,
colonialism, its three closest congeners, are equally elusive, equally
shifty, and the changeful overlapping of all four demands the closest
vigilance of students of modern politics.1
In this essay, I propose to elaborate freely the definition of im-
perialism which Hobson develops from these premises. My
DUrpose is to derive a conceptual order that will assist com-
munication among those who claim to stand on scientific
ground in dealing with these questions.
' J. A. Hobson, Imperialism: A Study. London 1968, p. 3.
3536‘
1. Writing at the beginning of the 20th century, Hobson uses
the term 'imperialism’ to refer to a historically determinate
event: the transformation of Nationalism, which had domina-
ted the international arena for more than a century, into a
general tendency of states to expand beyond their national
boundaries.
The impact of Nationalism on pre-existent territorial-
political entities had in some cases been to increase their
cohesion, in others to lead to their disintegration. But its
general result was the formation of political units (States) of a
relatively well-defined ethnic and cultural composition
(Nations).2 Towards the end of the 19th century, however,
these Nation-States had exhibited a tendency to ‘overflow their
natural banks’, thereby giving rise to those expansionist
phenomena which Hobson specified by the term 'Imperialism’.
2. In using this expression, Hobson sought to distinguish the
expansionism of his own time from the process, commonly
designated by the term Colonialism, which had characterized
previous epochs. Colonialism, in fact, had denoted the transfer
of part of a nation to other territories with a low p0pulation
density — a territorial expansion, therefore, of its own 'stock’,
language and institutions.3
It mattered little that such expansion had normally involved
the physical and cultural extermination of the indigenous
populations of the newly occupied territories (as had occurred
in the Americas and Australasia).4 Indeed, the antagonistic
2 Hobson defines the image of nation or nationality by means of a quotation
from John Stuart Mill’s Representative Government: 'A portion of mankind
may be said to constitute a nation if they are united among themselves by
common sympathies which do not exist between them and others. This feeling
of nationality may have been generated by various causes. Sometimes it is the
effect of identity of race and descent. Community of language and community
of religion greatly contribute to it. Geographical limits are one of the causes.
But the strongest of all is identity of political antecedents, the possession of a
national history and consequent community of recollections, collective pride
and humiliation, pleasure and regret, connected with the same incidents in the
past.’ Representative Government, in Three Essays, Oxford 1975, p. 380.
3 Hobson, op. cit., pp. 6—7.
4 Ibid., pp. 252-3.The Coordinates 37
and exclusivist character of the enterprise merely strengthened
the image of colonialism as the effective expansion of a
nationality.
On the other hand, the peculiar historical experience of a
new natural-social environment, combined with the great
spatial distance from the mother-country, thereafter tended to
shape the settlers into distinct nations. Hobson essentially
shared the physiocratic image of the colonies as fruits which,
once ripe, would drop off the tree that had born them — an
image considerably reinforced by the experience of North and
South America between the 1770’s and the 1820’s.
3. At the time when Hobson was writing, the term Colonialism
still conveyed this dual image of (antagonistic) expansion of a
single nation and filiation of new nationalities. But the expan-
sionist phenomena which had become generalized in the last
decades of the 19th century, while continuing to be generically
designated as 'colonialist’, in reality corresponded to neither
of these two images.
For what was above all now occurring was not the territorial
expansion of the nation, but the extension of its political power
to territories, far or near, of peoples 'too foreign to be absorbed
and too compact to be permanently crushed’. Thus, within the
couplet Nation-State, it was the State and not the Nation that
was now expanding.
Of course, exercise of this political power required the trans-
fer abroad as functionaries of a number of citizens of the
expansionist Nation-State, while others were attracted to the
colonies by the privileges which that power would confer upon
them. But the settlers’ very position as a small privileged caste
altered their original national character and prevented the
latter from taking any root in the subject lands:
The best services which white civilization might be capable of ren-
dering, by examples of normal, healthy, white communities
practising the best arts of Western life, are precluded by climatic
and other physical conditions in almost every case: the presence of
a scattering of white officials, missionaries, traders, mining or
plantation overseers, a dominant male caste with little knowledge38
of or sympathy for the institutions of the people, is ill-calculated to
give to those lower races even such gains as Western civilization
might be capable of giving.5
Thus, the new expansionist wave generated what Hobson
described as a 'spurious’ type of nationalism. Its main charac-
teristic was dictatorial political rule, all the more unrestrained
the greater the cultural distance between the 'colonial’ peoples
and the expansionist nation. Yet even this political and dicta-
torial expansionism, which Hobson designated by the term
Imperialism in order to distinguish it from traditional Colonial-
ism, had generated, and continued to generate, phenomena of
a nationalist type, while accentuating their exclusivism or
xenophobia:
From this aspect aggressive Imperialism is an artificial stimulation
of nationalism in peoples too foreign to be absorbed and too com-
pact to be permanently crushed. We welded Afrikanerdom into just
such a dangerous nationalism, and we joined with other nations in
creating a resentful nationalism until then unknown in China. The
injury to nationalism in both cases consists in converting a co-
hesive, pacific internal force into an exclusive, hostile force, a
perversion of the true power and use of nationality.6
4. Once he had introduced the term Imperialism to distinguish
contemporary expansionist phenomena from those of previous
epochs, Hobson found himself faced with another problem. For
his chosen expression called to mind still more remote epochs
by means of images which were in some respects not only dis-
tinct from, but even antithetical to, those he wished to evoke.
In fact, the very idea of empire was traditionally associated with
a hierarchical order of states guaranteeing universal peace, in
which the imperial power appeared as one state raised above
others. Originating in the so-called pax Romana, this image
had over the centuries inspired not only political philosophers
from Dante to Machiavelli, and from Vico to Kant, but also the
policies of the dynastic states of continental Europe.
5 Ibid., p. 282.
6 Ibid., p. 11.The Coordinates 39
However, the ascent of Nationalism had sealedthe decline of
those imperial States which still overlaid newly-emerging
nationalities. Attempts to realize the ideal of Empire were in-
creasingly partial or abortive — indeed served ultimately to
reinforce and diffuse existing nationalist currents. In fact, such
attempts could in general succeed only when they were them-
selves grounded in growing national sentiments. But in the
long run, imperial states with a weak national base (such as the
Habsburg Empire) were debilitated by confrontations with
autonomous nationalist forces emerging within their domain;
whereas those which possessed a strong national base (such as
the Napoleonic Empire) came in the end to propagate or in-
tensify nationalist tendencies, both at home and abroad.
In a certain sense, the Napoleonic experience represented
the watershed between the 'internationalist’ imperialism of the
ancient and medieval world and the nationalist imperialism
that was to dominate the world arena a century later. At the
end of the eighteenth century, however, a policy calling itself
imperialist could still evoke the image of an internationalism,
albeit hierarchical, which served to maintain peace among
nations.
In his Study, Hobson tried to dispel just this image. He showed
how, in the historical conditions of a world governed by
Nationalism (those before his eyes), projection of the State
beyond its national borders, even when inspired by the inter-
nationalist idea of Empire, could mean only anarchy in inter-
state relations, tending towards universal war.
According to Hobson, imperialist expansionism provoked °
reactions politically homogeneous with itself, not only among
peoples of a well-defined national identity (cf. §3), but above all
among the stronger nation-states, driving them in an exclusi-
vist and chauvinist direction:
The older nationalism was primarily an inclusive sentiment; its
natural relation to the same sentiment in another people was lack
of sympathy, not open hostility. . . . While co-existent nationalities
are capable of mutual aid involving no direct antagonism of
interests, co-existent empires following each its own imperial cor-
ner of territorial and industrial aggrandizement are natural40
necessary enemies. . . . The scramble for Africa and Asia virtually
recast the policy of all European nations, evoked alliances which
cross all natural lines of sympathy and historical association, drove
every continental nation to consume an ever growing share of its
material and resources upon military and naval equipment, drew
the great new power of the United States from its isolation into the
full tide of competition; and by the multitude, the magnitude, and
the suddenness of the issues it had thrown on to the stage of politics,
became a constant agent of menace and of perturbation to the peace
and progress of mankind.7
5. For Hobson, in a world dominated by Nationalism, Inter-
nationalism could signify only an informal order among free
and independent nations, assuring their harmony of interests
through peaceful interchange of goods and ideas. Without
idealizing the so-called pax Britannica, which towards the
middle of the 19th century seemed partially to have realized an
order of that type, Hobson glimpsed in the policy of Free Trade
that internationalist spirit which he could not discover in the
'imperial’ politicians of his time:
The politicians of Free Trade had some foundation for their dream
of a quick growth of effective, informal internationalism by peace-
ful, profitable intercommunication of goods and ideas among
nations recognizing a just harmony of interest in free peoples.8
Just in proportion as the substitution of true national govern-
ment for the existing oligarchies or sham democracies becomes
possible will the apparent conflicts of national interests disappear,
and the fundamental cooperation upon which nineteenth-century
Free Trade prematurely relied manifest itself.9
We shall employ the term Informal Empire to designate this
image of internationalism. We thereby intend to emphasize, on
the one hand, the 'pacific’ quality of the image which it shares
with the idea of Empire, and on the other hand, the 'impersonal’
and formally egalitarian characteristics which mark it off from
the hierarchical inter-state order typical of the latter.
7 Ibid., pp. 11—12.
3 Ibid., p. 12.
9 Ibid., p. 363.The Coordinates 41
Like Imperialism, the Informal Empire of F reeZTrade repre-
sented a relationship of international competition. At least in
principle, however, two quite distinct types of rivalry were in-
volved. In the case of Imperialism, rivalry affected political
relations among states and was expressed in the arms race and
the drive to territorial expansion; whereas in the case of
Informal Empire, it concerned economic relations among in-
dividuals of different nationality and was expressed in the inter-
national division of labour. Thus Imperialism signified political
conflict among nations, Informal Empire economic interdepen-
dence between them.
Peaceful interchange of goods and ideas betokened a type of
development of diverse nationalities antithetical to that of
Colonialism: instead of territorial aggrandizement and elimina-
tion of entire populations, it led to 'crossing’ among them:
A true test of efficiency of nations [demands] that the conflict of
nations should take place not by the more primitive forms of fight
and the ruder weapons in which nations are less differentiated, but
by the higher forms of fight and the more complex intellectual and
moral weapons which express the highest degree of national
differentiation. The higher struggle, conducted through reason, is
none the less a national struggle for existence, because in it ideas
and institutions which are worsted die, and not human organisms. . .
The notion of the world as a cock-pit of nations in which round
after round shall eliminate feebler fighters and leave in the end one
nation, the most efficient, to lord it upon the dunghill . . . [pays
exclusive attention to] the simpler form of struggle, the direct con-
flict of individuals and species, to the exclusion of the most impor-
tant part played by 'crossing’ as a means of progress throughout
organic life. i
The law of the fertility of 'crosses’ as applied to civilization or
'social efficiency’ alike on the physical and physiological plane
requires, as a condition of effective operation, internationalism.10
_ The antithesis between Informal Empire (Internationalism,
}n Hobson’s terminology) and Colonialism becomes yet clearer
if we consider the significance of migration in either case. In
‘0 Ibid., pp. 188—90..42
Colonialism, as we noted above (§3), emigration is the necessary
means of expansion of one national culture to the exclusion of
an older local culture. In Informal Empire, however, migrations
have an inclusivist function: they enlarge not the national cul-
ture of the emigrants, but rather that of the country in which
they settle. European emigration to the Americas provides a
good illustration of these two contrasting processes — on the
one hand, expansion of Iberian and Anglo-Saxon cultures
through extermination or marginalization of indigenous
societies, resulting in the formation of new nationalities; on
the other hand, enrichment of these new nationalities (espe-
cially the North American) by inclusion of individuals and
groups originating in the most diverse cultures. In the first
form, emigration expressed a relationship of a colonialist type,
in the second, one of an 'internationalist’ type.
One last point should be made clear. Informal Empire, like
Imperialism and unlike Formal Empire and Colonialism, repre-
sented for Hobson a stable form of expansion of nationalities,
that is one which tended to create a homogeneous environment:
To ascribe finality to nationalism upon the ground that members of
different nations lack 'the common experience necessary to found
a common life’ is a very arbitrary reading of modern history . . .
Direct intercommunication of persons, goods and information is so
widely extended and so rapidly advancing that this growth of the
'common experience necessary to found a common life’ beyond the
area of nationality is surely the most mark-worthy feature of the
age . . .
Surely there is a third alternative to the policy of national
independence on the one hand, and of the right of conquest by which
the more efficient nation absorbs the less efficient on the other, the
alternative of experimental and progressive federation, which,
proceeding on the line of greatest common experience, grows wider,
until an effective political federation is established, comprising the
whole of the civilized world.”
In other words, peaceful interchange of persons, goods and
ideas heightens the homogeneity and interdependence of
” Ibid.. pp. 168—9.The Coordinates 43
nations to the point where their existence as separate and
exclusive realities can be overcome. Colonialism and Formal
Empire are unstable expansionist tendencies, destined in the
final analysis to strengthen nationalist phenomena. National-
ism in turn permits of two alternative outcomes: either Im-
perialism, that is, anarchy in inter-state relations which tends
in the short term to the oppression of weak nations by strong,
and in the long term to universal war; or Internationalism
(Informal Empire), that is to say, free circulation of men, goods
and ideas, which tends to increase the interdependence and
homogeneity of nations.
6. We are now in a position to synthesize the series of distinc-
tions and oppositions through which Hobson attempted to
define and convey his conception of Imperialism. We shall have
to schematize to some degree the wealth of his images, but a
certain ‘impoverishment’ of language will probably assist us to
understand more precisely the real object of Hobson’s Study.
In Fig. 1, Hobson’s image of Imperialism is designated by the
segment NS—S+, distinct from the images of Colonialism
Fig. 1 "N4”
wsneguoloo
Formal Imperialism
8- Empire N s s
+JL—
31!de
leuqu44
(NS—N+) and Informal Empire (NS—N"), and counterposed
to the image of Formal Empire (NS—S’ ). Whereas Imperialism
is distinguished from Colonialism and Formal Empire as ex-
pansion of the State and not of the Nation (§3), it is counter-
posed to Formal Empire by virtue of that anarchy of its inter-
state relations which tends towards universal war (9'4).
Colonialism and Informal Empire are themselves distin-
guished from each other as the exclusive and inclusive (or
antagonistic and non-antagonistic) forms of expansion of
nationality (§5). Finally, the point where the two axes of State
expansion (8' .—S—S+) and National expansion (N‘ —N—N+ )12
coincide, designates the Nation State (NS) as the 'origin’ in an
analytical sense of the four expansionist phenomena taken as a
totality.13 .
Nevertheless, we have already seen that Hobson does not
confine himself to distinction and opposition of various images
of expansionism in order to 'pin down and mark out’ the con-
cept of imperialism; he ventures at the same time a judgment on
the stability of such phenomena in an epoch dominated by
Nationalism. He considered that the tendency to form sovereign
and independent political units (States), on the basis of entities
relatively integrated from an ethnic, cultural and territorial
point of view (Nations), had made of Colonialism and Formal
‘2 The symbols which appear in Fig. l have been selected in order to help the
reader remember their designation. Thus it should be kept in mind that S and N
(whether with a plusor minus) refer to forms of expansion of the State (Formal
Empire and Imperialism) and the Nation (Colonialism and Informal Empire)
respectively. The‘signs + and ‘ refer respectively to the antagonistic (exclusive)
and non-antagonistic (inclusive) character which each of these two types of
expansionism may assume. It is thus possible to distinguish Imperialism
(NS—8+) from Formal Empire (NS—S') and Colonialism (NS—N”) from
Informal Empire (NS , ~-N‘ ).
'3 From a historical point of view, the Nation-State evidently does not
represent the origin of either Colonialism or Formal Empire — or even of
Informal Empire, if 17th-century Dutch imperialism is to be included in this
category. It will become clear as we proceed that the grid which we are con-
structing has a limited historical validity; and that, in particular, it has no
meaning before the Nation-State has become the primary structure of the
international system. Its function is purely analytical — that is to say, it defines
an object which has no empirical correlates before the second half of the 17th
century and which is not fully visible until the end of the 19th century (cf. §18).The Coordinates 45
Empire 'unstable’ forms of expansionism, which inevitably
resulted in the diffusion and reinforcement of Nationalism
itself (§§2 and 4). For Hobson, Nationalism could spread in only
two directions: towards Imperialism and towards Inter-
nationalism (Informal Empire) — the only relatively 'stable’
forms of expansionism, in that they generated tendencies
homogeneous to themselves (§§3 and 5).
We may depict this assessment of the relative stability of the
respective forms of expansionism by assigning a direction to
the segments represented in Fig. 1. In this manner, we obtain
the four directional (or arrowed) segments of Fig. 2, which
define not only the meaning attributed by Hobson to the term
Imperialism (NS —+ S' ), but also a conceptual 'grid’ capable of
ordering various tendencies observable on the international
arena.
Fig. 2 N +


VN-
Let us now take this arena towards the end of the. 19th cen-
tury. On a synchronic reading, the arrow N“ —> NS would
designate the nationalist tendencies developing in the 'colonial’
world (in the restricted sense which Hobson gave to the term).
Such tendencies had been revealed most dramatically during46‘
the Boer War, and indeed it was this event which inspired
Hobson’s Study; but they could be discerned in other, apparently
quite dissimilar areas, such as those of the 'white’ colonies of
Australasia and Canada, whose formal subordination to Eng-
land could be reproduced only at the price of ever more sub-
stantive concessions to their independence. The arrow
S" —+ NS, on the other hand, would designate the nationalist
tendencies growing in the centre and the periphery of the old
formal empires — such as they still existed. The disintegration
of the Habsburg and Ottoman Empires were the clearest in-
stances of this, but a similar process was discernible in Russia,
Japan and China, where the imperial organization of the state
remained formally intact.
The arrows NS —+ N’ and NS —+ S+ would, by contrast,
designate the fact that Nationalism was going beyond simple
dissolution of the 'vestiges’ of a colonial and imperial past to
transform itself into Internationalism and Imperialism (again,
in Hobson’s restricted sense of the terms). To a varying degree,
both these trends were present in all recently formed Nation-
States, even if the former — the tendency to surpass enclosure
into separate and exclusive realities and to open out in peaceful
interchange of goods and ideas with other nations — was
starting to be more typical of countries with a colonial past like
the United States, while the latter tendency was starting to
predominate in countries with an imperial past, like Germany
(cf. §13).
This distinction will prove useful for a diachronic reading of
Fig. 2 as a totality of successive phases. Thus, taken together,
the four arrows express the 'scissors’ movement of nationalist
phenomena between the end of the 18th century and the end of
the 19th. In a first period, represented by the convergence at
NS of N+ —» NS and S" —> NS, Nationalism restructures the
world into Nation-States; in a second phase, depicted by the
divergence of NS —> N’ and NS —> 8*, the world-wide aflirma-
tion of Nationalism. poses the alternative: Internationalism
(Informal Empire) or Imperialism.
Taken separately, however, the two axes N+ —> NS —* N-
and S— —* NS —» 3+ designate the distinct trajectories followedThe Coordinates 47
by Nationalism in two specific situations — those of the United
States and Germany, to be precise. In the USA, after nearly a
century of inwardly concentrated effort to forge a single nation
out of a multiplicity of colonial societies, Nationalism turned
outwards at the end of the 19th century towards the external
world, or rather towards an integration of that world within an
Informal Empire. In Germany, on the contrary, after a century
dominated by the drive to reunify the German 'nation’ in a
single State at the expense of neighbouring Formal Empires,
Nationalism now set out on the road of militarism and terri-
torial expansion, abandoning, among other things, the Prussian
tradition of free trade.
We shall explore these designations further in the course of
our analysis. For the moment, their interest is merely one of
exemplification. However I hope that,.in this respect at least,
the reader may begin to glimpse the utility of the conceptual
grid (represented in Fig. 2) as a means both of organizing in a
synchronic-diachronic order the expansionist waves of the 19th
century, and of conveying the particular images of imperialism
which agitated Hobson’s mind.
That the grid has certain limits is self-evident: if it had none,
it would not be a grid at all, that is, an instrument capable of
retaining (fixing) one set of images, while allowing through
(obscuring) another set. It is no less obvious that these limits
are intimately connected with the system of values or the
‘vision of the world’ in which Hobson was steeped. However,
as Stretton has pointed out in answer to historiographical
criticisms of Hobson:
'Complete’ explanation would in principle be coextensive with
much of human history in much of its detail; so voluminous as
merely to pose the problems of selection all over again. Meanwhile
in all common sense there are enough very obvious patterns in
reality, and enough values shared by investigators of the most
diverse politics, to make sure that a lot of knowledge gathered in
different interests will prove useful to everybody. . . . [What we
need] is to know more, skilfully; not to know all, neutrally.l4
‘4 H. Stretton, The Political Sciences, London 1969, p. 140.48
In the course of the next section, we shall attempt to circumvent
some of the more striking limitations of the schema so far
adopted, making clear its contours and content. But even when
all these points have been specified, the grid will remain a grid
— one, moreover, that is woven rather loosely. Its utility depends
not on the quantity of images which it fixes, but rather on their
quality. In other words, it is a function of the goals which
Hobson set himself in his study of imperialism and which we set
ourselves in our study of Hobson.2.
The Articulation
Structure and Genesis of English Imperialism
7. The most evident limitation of the conceptual grid set out in
the last chapter and schematized in Fig. 2 is its inability to fix
the concrete image of imperialism of which Hobson actually
speaks once he has defined its concept. In fact, he deals only
marginally and far from rigorously with the expansionism of
the newly-emerging powers of his epoch (Germany and the
United States) — a phenomenon which we have designated, in
a passable approximation, by means of the trajectories
S" —> NS —> S+ and N+ —> NS —+ N'. Hobson is almost exclu-
sively concerned with English expansionism, to which none of
the tendencies represented in Fig. 2 corresponds unam-
' biguously.
As is well known, despite the protectionist wave that swept
across Europe from the 1880’s onwards, England did_not for-
mally abandon free-trade policies until after the First World
War. It could thus still appear, at the turn of the century
(according to the terminology we have derived from Hobson)
as a power at once 'imperialist’ and 'internationalist’. More—
over, its expansionism was composed of various elements
which gave it a specific aspect in different regions of the world:
colonial in Canada and Australasia, imperial in India, informal
in China, and hybrid in Southern Africa.
It has thus not been difficult for historiographical criticism
to demonstrate, with the support of empirical data, both that
the diverse characteristics which Hobson tried to distinguish
and isolate co-existed in English foreign policy at the end of the
19th century, and that there had been a general continuity in
4950
that policy throughout the century:
The conventional view of Victorian imperial history leaves us with
a series of awkward questions. In the age of 'anti-imperialism’ why
were all colonies retained? Why were so many more obtained?
Why were so many new spheres of influence set up? Or again, in
the age of 'imperialism’ . . . why was there such reluctance to annex
further territories? Why did decentralization, begun under the
impetus of anti-imperialism. continue? In the age of laisser-faire
why was the Indian economy developed by the state?
These paradoxes are too radical to explain as merely exceptions
which prove the rule or by concluding that imperial policy was
largely irrational and inconsistent, the product of a series of acci-
dents and chances. The contradictions, it may be suspected, arise
not from the historical reality but from the historians’ approach to
it. A hypothesis which fits more the facts might be that of a funda-
mental continuity in British expansion throughout the nineteenth
century.15
This picture of the coexistence/continuity of the expansionist
features of 19th-century English foreign policy may be designa-
ted, in the terms defined in the last chapter, by means of a circle
connecting the four segments of Fig. 1. We thus obtain the
diagram of Fig. 3, in which the images of expansionism dis-
tinguished by Hobson are combined in a unified totality as
non-directional components of a single (and generic) pheno-
menon of imperialism. For Gallagher and Robinson, in fact,
imperialism may assume the most diverse characters (colonial,
formal, informal, pacifist or militarist) according to the general
or particular circumstances encountered by a given power in
the assertion of its hegemony over the international system.
If the concept of imperialism is identified in this way with the
image of hegemony, there undoubtedly appears to be a funda-
mental continuity in English foreign policy — not only, as
Gallagher and Robinson argue, throughout the 19th century,
but, as we shall see shortly, during the two hundred and fifty
years between the mid-17th century and the beginning of the
19th. In conceding this, we need not renounce the attempt to
identify, within the drive for hegemony pursued by a given
'5 Gallagher and Robinson, op. cit., p. 5.The Articylation 51


Fig. 3 "N +
s1 N s sfi+
-N‘
power, either the overall direction of alterations or accentua-
tions of its components in different periods, or, above all, the
diverse meanings which the same policy may acquire according
to the concrete situation.
It is from this latter point of view that we may derive from
Hobson certain indications which are ultimately more valid
than those of his critics. As a matter of fact, Hobson was not
unaware of the coexistence/continuity of diverse expansionist
forms in English' foreign policy. But he left them in the shade in
order to focus light on the elements of discontinuity and
specificity in the English imperialism of his epoch.
He stressed in particular two intimately connected tenden-52
cies. The first of these, which he considered to be symptomatic
of, and supplementary to, the 'New Imperialism’, was the ten-
dency of England to elevate the imperial aspect above the
strictly colonial one, above all in its relations with the non-
European world:
With the exception of a couple of experiments in India, the tendency
everywhere has been towards a closer and more drastic imperial
control over the territories that have been annexed, transforming
protectorates, company rule, and spheres of influence into definite
British States of the Crown colony order.16
In a single word, the New Imperialism has increased the area of
British despotism, far outbalancing the progress in population and
in practical freedom attained by our few democratic colonies.l7
This despotism undoubtedly remained a factor for peace within
the confines of the'empire:
The one real and indisputable success of our rule in India, as indeed
generally through our Empire, is in the maintenance of order upon
a large scale, the prevention of internecine war, riot, or organised
violence.18
This should not, however, create any illusions about the long-
term stability of the imperial regime:
Some of the formal virtues of our laws and methods which seem to
us most excellent may work out quite otherwise in practice . . .
Corrupt as the practice of Eastern tax-gatherers has ever been,
tyrannical as has been the power of the usurer, public opinion,
expediency, and some personal consideration have always qualified
their tyranny; the mechanical rigour of British law is one of the
greatest sources of unpopularity of our government in India, and is
probably a grave source of actual injury.19
In other words, the formalization of English domination of the
i ._ non-European world did not escape from the general tendency
1" Hobson, op. cit., p. 26.
'7 Ibid., p. 124.
'8 Ibid., p. 297.
'9 Ibid.The Articulation 53
to instability of formal empires in a world dominated by
nationalism: what could appear to the metropolitan nation as
a virtue of its own imperial domination (i.e., peace and order)
could in reality precisely provoke nationalist or proto-
nationalist resentment among the subject peoples.
We shall designate this tendency of England as a hegemonic
power to elevate the (political) formal aspects of its domination
above the (cultural) colonial ones, by means of a directional
arc N+ —’ S" linking the arrows N+ —+ NS and S’ —+ NS (Fig. 4).

Fig.4 N+
V
V >
s— N S

LN—
8+54
This representation suggests the unstable, in a certain sense
auxiliary and subordinate, character of this first tendency by
which Hobson demarcated the English imperialism of his epoch.
For in practice this trend was unleashed by the nationalist ten-
dencies mentioned (§6), which were steadily developing in the
settler colonies (N+ —) NS); and in its turn, it tended to detonate
others (8’ —» NS) of an imperial matrix. In the last analysis,
then, it reinforced and diffused nationalist tendencies, and it is
perhaps for this reason that Hobson, while dealing with it as a
symptom of the general politicization of international rela-
tions, did not place it at the centre of his study.
It seems to me that the specific object of Imperialism: A Study
is not this first tendency at all, but another — namely, the
‘substitution for ambition of a single growing empire the theory
and the practice of competing empires’.20 This competition was
not only in itself a token of the 'novelty’ of late 19th-century
imperialism. By threatening to convert peace among the sub
ject peoples of a single empire into war among peoples subject
to different empires, it shifted the entire significance of im-
perial policies in the non-European world:
The expansion of our Empire under the new Imperialism has been
compassed by setting the 'lower races’ at one another’s throats . . .
That we do not stand alone in this ignominious policy does not
make it better, rather worse, offering terrible prophetic glimpses
into a not distant future, when the horrors of our eighteenth cen-
tury struggle with France in North America and India may be
revived upon a gigantic scale, and Africa and Asia may furnish
huge cock-pits for the struggles of black and yellow armies repre-
senting the imperialist rivalries of Christendom. The present ten-
dencies of Imperialism plainly make in this direction, involving in
their recoil a degradation of Western States and a possible .débacle
of Western civilization.“
The danger of war among the great powers was becoming ever
more real: 'Where thirty years ago there existed one sensitive
spot in our relations with France, or Germany, or Russia, there
are a dozen now.’22 The immediate result of great power rivalry,
20 Ibid.. p. 304.
2‘ Ibid., p. 138.
22 Ibid., pp. 126—7.The Articulation 55
however, was not war but militarism — a phenomenon which,
apart from fuelling antagonisms between peoples, swelled
public spending and precipitated the abandonment of free trade.
It was utopian to imagine that huge expenditures, determined
by the behaviour of rival powers and the new techniques of
scientific war, could continue to be financed out of direct taxa-
tion. Sooner or later, even England would be forced to follow
the states of continental Europe into a policy of indirect taxa-
tion, which would more or less openly involve discrimination
in favour of domestic industries. Indeed, the abandonment of
free trade could be imposed by exigencies of a strategic order,
such as the goal of becoming self-sufficient in relation to rival
empires, even before it was necessitated by financial con-
siderations.23
Beyond certain limits, then, there was a fundamental in-
compatibility between free international circulation of goods and
ideas and the development of politico-military rivalry among
states. Even if England was still formally a free-trade power, its
growing propensity to territorial expansion and politicization
of international relations was now — just because of its hege-
monic position — decisive for a general shift in competition
from the plane of economic relations between individuals of
different nationalities to that of political relations between
States.
We may designate this tendency by means of the arc N‘ —+ 8*,
linking the arrows NS —> N“ and NS —» 8" (Fig. 4). This traces
the fact that the policy of the hegemonic power, by fuelling
rivalry between states, tended to transform the Informal
Empire of free trade into international rivalry leading in the
direction of universal war. Whereas Nationalism left un-
decided the alternative of Imperialism and Internationalism
(an indeterminacy represented by the scissors movement of the
diagram of Fig. 2) the expansionism of the hegemonic power
would decide the alternative in favour of Imperialism (an out-
come designated by the ‘closing’ of the scissors in the diagram
of Fig. 4).
23 Ibid., pp. 100—4.56
8. The introduction of the imagery of hegemony, designated by
means of the arcs linking the arrows of Fig. 2, has thus made it
possible for us to fix unambiguously the concrete image of the
imperialism with which Hobson was concerned. The repre-
sentation given of this image (Fig. 4) has the merit that it shows
the coexistence of diverse forms of expansionism within the
same policy of hegemony, yet at the same time indicates the
direction of that policy‘— that is to say, the bent of its alteration
in a given historical situation. The representation is neverthe-
less incomplete. In particular, it does not define the trajectory
of the continuity discernible in the struggle of the English
Nation-State for the conquest and preservation of its world
hegemony.
In order to complete the representation — leaving for later a
specification of its contours and contents — we shall subject this
hegemony to a diachronic analysis. We shall take as a starting-
point the passage quoted above (§7), in which Hobson prophe-
sied for a not too distant future a resurgence of the 'horrors’ of
the 18th-century struggle between France and England in
America and India. It was in this period that England con-
quered the global hegemony which it would retain until the
beginning of the 19th century, when Hobson diagnosed its
decline. Which tendencies, then, characterized that century, or,
to be more precise, the hundred years stretching from the wars
against Holland (1652—74) to the defeat of France in the Seven
Years’ War (1756—63)? How may we designate these tendencies
in the terms defined by the conceptual grid schematized in
Fig. 2?
First of all, what seems to have been the original and domi-
nant character of this period was a tendency which we may
designate by means of the arrow NS —> 8*. The Navigation
Acts of 1651 and 1660, by subordinating the colonies to the
authority of the English parliament and by bestowing upon the
English fleet the monopoly of trade with these colonies, in
effect inaugurated a policy of expansion of the English State
beyond its national boundaries — a policy which precipitated the
international system into a period of world-wide anarchy and
war. During this period, England defeated rival powers oneThe Articulation 57
after the other, attaining a position of almost total hegemony
over the non-European world. The Navigation Acts directly led
England into war with Holland (the prior hegemonic power of
the epoch) whose informal empire was effectively reduced to a
protectorate of England. The same fate befell the Portuguese
colonial empire, even though arms were not necessary in that
instance to impose the real relationship of forces between the
old power in decline and the new' power in ascent. From the
positions of relative hegemony which it thereby acquired,
England had little difficulty in eliminating the rivalry of Spain
and France: participation in the War of the Spanish Succession
gave it undisputed control over the seas, while the Seven Years’
War brought to an end the secular conflict with France, the
other rising power of the epoch, which was definitively swept
out of India and North America.
However, the above characterization neglects the 'colonial-
ist’ element in English expansionism during this period.-
Already before the Cromwellian revolution, such expansionism
had been distinguished by active encouragement of colonial
settlement:
Although they could not match the Dutch in financial acumen and
in the size or efficiency of their merchant fleet, the English believed
in founding settlement colonies and not just ports of call en route
to the Indies. . '. . Besides joint-stock or chartered companies the
English developed such expedients for colonization as the pro-
prietory colony analogous to the Portuguese captaincies in Brazil,
and Crown colonies nominally under direct royal control. What
English colonies in America lacked in natural resources and uni-
formity they made up for in the number and industriousness of the
colonists themselves.24
This effective territorial expansion of the English nation
beyond its state boundaries could not, however, be fully reali-
zed until the Navigation Acts, and the aggressive policy which
they initiated, opened up abundant space (political and
economic) for British emigration to the New World. England
2‘ G. H. Nadel and P. Curtis, 'Introduction’ to idem. (eds.) Imperialism and
Colonialism, New York 1964, pp. 9-10.58
was a 'late-comer’ in relation to the traditional colonialist
natiOns Spain and Portugal; and only its conquest of world
hegemony allowed it to pursue the territorial expansion of its
own nationality which was actually accomplished in the hun-
dred years following the wars with Holland. It is also true, how-
ever, that without the emigration and dispersal of British
settlements in North America, the English state would have
found it much harder to gain such a complete victory over rival
powers.
The rise of England to the position of hegemonic power may
be designated by means of a trajectory within the space jointly
defined by the co-ordinates NS——S+ (imperialism tout court)
and NS—N+ (colonialism). If the colonialist component is
regarded as a simple consequence of antagonistic state expan-
sion (useful in the consolidation of hegemony once it had been
attained rather than in its actual conquest) then it should be
designated by means of the arc S+ —» N+ traced in Fig. 5. This
would then express the fact that 17th and 18th century English
imperialism tended to pass into effective territorial expansion
of the nationality, the purpose of which was to ‘consolidate a
hegemonic position already achieved by the different path
NS —+ 8“. But it seems to me more correct to consider the two
components as inseparably linked, since effective territorial
expansion of the nation was ab initio an integral part of the
expansionist policy of the English state, and since the latter
Fig. 5 N +\\\\
\
\
\
\The Articulation 59
would have had great difficulty in attaining its hegemonic
world position without the contribution of the American
colonies. If we View matters in this light, the English path to
hegemony should be designated by means of an arc NS —v N+,
as is dotted in Fig. 5.25
Whichever designation is adopted (NS —’ S+ —> N“ or
NS —» N“) it signifies that a hegemonic position (N+ ), un-
attainable through expansionism of a purely colonial kind, has
nevertheless been achieved through a combination of the latter
with expansionism of a strictly imperialist type, which so to
speak institutionalizes a real shift in the relationship of forces
between rival powers. This possibility of attaining N”r does not,
therefore, contradict the earlier thesis of the instability of
colonialist tendencies (see §6), which is designated in Fig. 5, as
in previous diagrams, by the direction of the arrow N+ —> NS.
On the contrary, confirmation of this thesis is essential if we
are to complete our definition of the first phase of English
imperialism. It allows us, in fact, to comprehend the arc
S+ —> N+ as signifying not only the tendency of imperialist
policy, in the strict sense, to pass into effective territorial
expansion of the nationality, but also the tendency of armed
conflict between metropolitan states to be transformed into
nationalism in the colonies.
This second tendency became manifest only after the Seven
Years’ War. It represented in a sense a watershed between the
first and second phases of English imperialism (§9). Its relation-
ship to the other tendencies analysed so far seems quite evident.
The secular struggle with France had driven England to utilize
25 In this figure and later ones, dotted inscriptions refer to real historical
trajectories, whether proposed or actually pursued; while unbroken arcs and
arrows represent idea-typical trajectories. Thus, in Fig. 5, which as we shall see
defines the concept of nationalist imperialism, the ideal type is represented by
the ensemble constituted by the arc S+ —» N+ and the arrows NS —» S” and
N+ —v NS; whereas the historical type (that is, the first phase of English
imperialism) is defined by the arc NS —’ N“, which, it should be noted, has a
significance only with reference to the ideal type within which it is drawn.
On the other hand, Fig. 9 (9'12) illustrates the distinction between a historical
trajectory that has actually been completed and one that is simply pursued: it
will become clear later that the arc S+ —* NS represents the former type, and
N‘ —+ NS the latter type.60
the North American colonies as allies on a plane of relative
equality, rather than as mere dependencies. This policy bore
fruit during the Seven Years’ War, when the American colonies
showed that they had become an autonomous, and perhaps
decisive, force in the definitive defeat of French overseas
expansionism. But once this objective had been attained,
English attempts to restore a relationship of subordination
between colonies and mother-country could'not but inflame
nationalist sentiments of revolt:
Anglo-American relations were disrupted because the imperial
government clung to its antiquated behaviour and the parting of
the ways became inevitable. The emotional driving forces were
imperial arrogance on the British side, national sentiment on the
American. There was no insurmountable clash of interest, but
rather a political quarrel exacerbated by the British government’s
failure to take American patriotism seriously.26
Of course, the conflicts which set the metropolitan powers
against one another favoured even more directly the success of
nationalist movements of a colonial character. On this point, it
is enough to recall the role played by the Franco-American
alliance in consolidating American independence of England,
and the subsequent role of the Napoleonic cataclysm in EurOpe
in breaking the ties of subordination between the Latin-
American colonies and Spain and Portugal.
The birth of nationalism in the colonial world brings to an
end the first phase of English imperialism, which we shall term ’
nationalist imperialism. Its signification (II) is thus defined
conjointly by the three tendencies, NS —+ S“, 8* —> N", and
N” —+ NS (Fig. 5). These trace the antagonistic expansion of the
State beyond its national boundaries, in the direction of an
effective expansion of the home nationality, but then ultimately
tending to unleash nationalism in the colonial world.
9. As is well known, 1776 was the year not only of the American
Declaration of Independence, but also of the publication of The
26 G. Lichtheim, Imperialism, London 1974, p. 54.The Articulation 61
Wealth of Nations — a work in which Adam Smith sharply
attacked, among other things, the traditional methods of
governing the colonies. This coincidence has helped to spread
the view that the rebellion of the North-American colonies
occurred simultaneously with the onset of a progressive liberal-
ization of English colonial policy. In reality, however, there
was no trace of such a change for at least another fifty years:
That the revolt of the American colonists taught the imperial ruling
groups in England a lesson in how to govern colonies wisely is
nothing but a legend. Constitutionally and politically, imperial
rule was not relaxed but tightened. The rebellious Americans . . .
had enjoyed a great deal of freedom in the political respect. Hence,
when these colonies revolted while Canada remained loyal, it
seemed to the majority of the metropolitan ruling group that this
large amount of political freedom had fostered a spirit of democracy
and independence which, in turn, had caused the revolution. It was
for this reason that the government, determined to keep what was
left of the Empire, now embarked upon a reactionary course and
imposed upon its old and new colonies a system of centralized super-
vision and control that was to be maintained for more than half a
century.”
In other words, the loss of the North American colonies
strengthened the tendency of England to formalize its domina-
tion of the non-European world and to relegate to a secondary
position the informal methods of government typical of
colonialism, in the strict sense of the term. Integral to this
tendency was the new geo-political orientation adopted by
English expansionism at the end of the 18th century: although
fresh outlets were found in Australasia after the partial closure
of North America, its centre of gravity decisively shifted
towards the Indian sub-continent, where there was no room
for colonial settlement and imperial methods of government
naturally imposed themselves.
We shall designate this tendency of Colonialism to pass into
Formal Empire by means of an arc N“ ——+' 8‘ connecting the
arrow N+ -—> NS to S" —+ NS (Fig. 6). The division of S+ —> N+
27 K.E. Knorr, British Colonial Theories: 1570—1850. Toronto 1944, pp. 112—3,62
Fig. 6 -N+
'2 Y '1


s- ’ N s ' s +
into N+ —+ S— and N+ —+ NS thus represents that parting of the
ways of England and the North American colonies of which
Lichtheim speaks in the passage just cited. It may be objected
that this designation stresses only one of the two aspects of
English imperialism at the close of the 18th century, namely
the relations which it had come to establish in the non-European
world; and that it does not bring into relief the continuing
anarchy of relations among the great powers. Inde'ed, much of
the period in question was occupied by the Napoleonic Wars,
which clearly do not conform to the image of peace and order
proper to formal empire.
However, if we examine these wars in a broader perspective
than that of a Eurocentric history, then the discrepancy of
images tends to vanish. It should above all be remembered that ’
the struggle for world hegemony between France and England
had been definitively resolved in favour of the latter by the
Seven Years’ War. France’s later success alongside the new
United States of America was a purely Pyrrhic victory: when,
following Cornwallis’s surrender at Yorktown in 1782, Rodney
defeated the French fleet in the Battle of the Saints, the English
reaffirmed their uncontested supremacy at sea and, conse-
quently, their global hegemony. Nor was that all. the costs of
war had been so excessive for France that it was thrown into a
period of internal crises that issued, six years later, in the
Revolution.The Articulation 63
Thus the situation of world-wide anarchy and war had come
to an end, together with the struggle'among various powers for
control of the seas. The Napoleonic Wars had an altogether
different significance. They represented an attempt by France
to counterpose to the English world empire of the seas, a French
territorial empire of the European continent. This project
brought it into direct conflict with the old formal empires still
dominating the continent, whereas the contest with England
tended to assume an indirect, almost 'cold war’ character, in-
volving naval blockades and sporadic armed clashes. In other
words, the Pax Britannica was strengthened at a world level,
while war came to be localized, and intensified, in Europe.
then in Europe, however, there prevailed a tendency to
restore, under British hegemony, an imperial organization
bringing with it universal peace — a peace that was then effec-
tively realized with the final defeat of Napoleon. Of course, it
was quite another question whether the balance of empires
laid down by the Peace of Vienna was a stable one; as we know,
the restoration ended in an explosion of nationalist tendencies,
which, latent throughout this period, led from the 1830’s on-
wards to the progressive disintegration (or transformation in a
nationalist direction) of the formal empires of continental
Europe.
The emergence of these tendencies, designated by S’ —» NS
in Fig. 6, marked the passage to a new phase of English im-
perialism. We shall refer to the phase now concluded (designa-
ted conjointly by the three movements N+ —’ NS, N+ —> S‘,
and S' —> NS) as that of formal imperialism, thereby laying
stress on the formal character which British hegemony tended
to assume in reaction to the revolt of the American colonies.
Even in this case, however, the principal effect was ultimately
not containment of nationalist tendencies, but their reinforce-
ment and diffusion within those very formal empires of con-
tinental Europe that England had tactically supported in an
attempt to consolidate its own world hegemony.
10. The paths of England and of the dynastic empires of con-
tinental Europe very soon began to diverge. The first skir-64
mishes in England’s drive to convert its world hegemony into
an informal empire appeared in the years immediately follow-
ingthe Peace of Vienna:
In 1823, the majority of the countries of Latin America were already
independent. Nevertheless, although republican arms had trium-
phed decisively on the field of battle, the new nations still had to
consolidate their independence, obtain formal recognition, and
achieve cohesiveness. . . . England quickly understood what the
birth of independent Latin American republics meant for Europe.
Aware that the old and anachronistic system of colonial relations
would crumble, it saw an excellent opportunity to profit by estab-
lishing commercial relations with the newly independent countries.
Consequently, between 1815 and 1823 England countered the
colonialist [or imperial, according to the terminology we have
adopted — G.A.] design of the Holy Alliance by asserting the prin-
ciple of non-intervention in Latin America. The Prime Minister,
George Canning, emphasized the importance of trade with the new
countries in his statement, 'England will be a workshop and Latin
America its farm’. In order to ensure this business for the English
fleet — but at the same time fearful lest the United States and France
launch a policy of territorial expansion in Latin America — Mr.
Canning proposed an agreement with these two governments that
would guarantee the peace and tranquillity of the continent.”3
Of course, it was not yet a question of breaking the recently
established imperial equilibrium, but rather of its clarification
by the hegemonic power. England’s purpose was to limit the)
operation of the Holy Alliance to the sphere of continental
Europe and to reserve for itself the role of guarantor of the
world order. Nevertheless, the very pursuit of this goal im-
pelled England to draw closer to the two nation-states which
had the most obstructed its imperial designs and to oppose the
dynastic empires on which it had relied in their achievement.
From the 1830’s onwards, this turn became more evident.
Methods of informal integration, tested out in Latin America,
were gradually-extended to other regions of the non-European
world by means of bilateral treaties of friendship and free trade;
23 A. Aguilar, Pan-Americanism from Monroe to the Present, New York 1968,
p. 23.The Articulation 65
the widest-ranging were those signed with Persia (1836 and
1857), Turkey (1838 and 1861) and Japan (1858). Where a free-
trade agreement was not sufficient to integrate the 'peripheral
zone’ into the informal empire, England did not shrink from the
use of arms — as it did in the Opium Wars of 1840 and 1857. But
even then, the outcome was the extension, not of the formal
British Empire, but of the informaLempire of free trade.
This free-trade image of England was only partially obscured
by the colonialist and imperial tendencies which continued to
characterize its expansionism during these decades. The
colonial expansion which was pursued without interruption in
Canada, Australasia and Southern Africa led, betWeen 1840
and 1870, to the occupation or annexation of vast territories —
New Zealand, Queensland, British Columbia, Natal, Transvaal,
and so on. But however many square miles they covered, these
acquisitions were 'of secondary significance for the extension
of English world domination, secured through the policy of
free trade. Moreover, this process of territorial expansion was
accompanied by liberalization of metropolitan political control
over the colonies (it was in this period that Canada was granted
so-called responsible government), so that the tendency of
formal empire to change into informal empire could be observed
within the colonial processes themselves.
By contrast, nothing of this kind was visible in India:
[India was] the only part of the British Empire to which laissez-
faire never applied. Its most enthusiastic champions in Britain
became bureaucratic planners when they went there, and the most
committed opponents of political colonization rarely, and then
never seriously, suggested the liquidation of British rule. And the
'formal’ British Empire expanded in India even when no other part
of it did.”
It should be clear from the previous discussion, however, that
the case of India does not contradict the informal character of
English expansionism between the years 1830 and 1870. In fact,
the peculiar tendencies of any period 'rest upon’ those which
29 E. J. Hobsbawm, Industry and Empire, London 1968, p. 123.66'
characterized preceding epochs and are, so to speak, conserved
within newly-emerging tendencies. As the typical features of
nationalist imperialism were preserved within the phase of
formal imperialism when circumstances required, so did the
typical institutions of formal imperialism continue to be utili-
zed in India, precisely because of its strategic military and
economic position in the construction of an informal empire in
the rest of the world.
The rule, that is the tendency towards free trade, was on the
other hand even more visible in England’s relations with the
metropolitan countries and its former colony, the United States,
than in its links with the non-European world. Decisive in this
respect was the unilateral repeal of the Corn Laws (1848) and of
the Navigation Acts (1849) — measures which placed England
at the centre of a tight web of commercial exchanges:
English ports were opened to the products of the whole world.
Apparently, not far short of one third of the exports of the rest of
the world found their way into the United Kingdom in the 18503
and 18603. . . . Little of this came from the empire, less than a quarter
in fact. Our largest single trading-partner was the United States,
accounting 'for nearly a quarter of all imports and of all exports.
Another quarter was accounted for by the countries of Europe,
which were beginning, like the USA, to industrialize themselves
with British equipment and ideas.30
This structure of commercial intercourse was accompanied by
m0vements of persons and capital which later gave .an ‘inter-
nationalist’ quality to the informal British empire. Between
1830 and 1870, emigration from Great Britain was perhaps more
intense than it had ever been; its main outlet, however, was no
longer the colonies or provinces of the formal empire, but
independent countries, and first of all the United States of
America. It thus involved not antagonistic expansion of the
English nation, but a general growth of nations through what
Hobson called 'crossing’ of nationalities (§5).
Analogous processes were observable in capital movements,
which grew markedly more intense between 1855 and 1870 and
3° M. Barratt Brown, After Imperialism, London 1963, p. 63.The Articulation 67
were oriented predominantly towards the industrializing coun-
tries of America and continental Europe. The international
system thus tended to move towards something very close to
Hobson’s image of internationalism: 'An all-embracing world
system of virtually unrestricted flows of capital, labour and
goods never actually existed, but between 1860 and 1875 some-
thing not too far removed from it came into being.’31
The Fox Britannica was thereby transformed into an infor-
mal empire of free trade, which allowed England to extend its
hegemony to peoples and nations which had escaped, or never
been Subject to, its formal empire. Towards the middle of the
19th century, in fact, free trade doctrines became the dominant
ideology not only of the young Latin American republics, but
also of the principal nuclei of European nation-states, such as
Prussia and Piedmont. With the Anglo-French commercial
treaty of 1860, France itself entered the orbit of free trade,
which became in those years the general rule in relations
between nations.
The USA was only a partial exception to the rule. Even there,
free-trade ideology had dominated the first stage of the struggle
against the restrictions on freedom of commerce and enterprise
which the mother-country claimed the right to impose on the
colonies. But in 1816 the Northern states began to introduce
customs tariffs to protect their developing industry; and
despite the fact that between 1832 and 1875 the general free-
trade tendency involved a reduction of such tariffs, they were
abruptly raised again on the occasion of the Civil War (1860—
65).
On the whole, even during the golden years of free trade, the
United States remained a protectionist nation. Still, as we have
said, it also became during this period the main pole of attrac-
tion for English commodities, labour and capital. American
protectionism was thus a stimulus, rather than an obstacle, to
the growth of international trade, demonstrating that within
certain limits protectionism and free trade, like nationalism
and internationalism, were not necessarily in contradiction
3‘ Hobsbawm, op. cit., p. 115.Fig. 7 -N +
I1

'3 V

N-
with each other.32
In conclusion, we can say that, towards the middle of the
19th century, all forms of nationalism, including the nationalist
protectionism of the USA, tended to merge with the hegemonic
power’s policy of peaceful interchange of goods and ideas, as
the regulating principle and practice of international relations.
This tendency is represented in Fig. 7 by the convergence at N“
of the arrow NS -—r N‘ and the arc S’ —-> N". Taken as a whole,
the three tendencies S“ -> NS, 8' —» N and NS —+ N thus
32 John Stuart Mill was well aware of this fact. As is well known, he viewed
in a positive light the protection of developing or 'infant’ industries.The Articulcition 69
define a third phase (I3) of English imperialism, which we shall
term informal imperialism in order to stress the mediating role
of impersonal market forces in the consolidation and expanded
reproduction of England’s world hegemOny.
11. Whatever 'intemationalist’ content there may have been
in England’s mid-century informal empire began to dissolve in
the 1870’s. As we have seen (§7), it was this process which con-
stituted the specific object of Hobson’s study. It may be syn-
thetically designated by the arc N” —> S”, joining NS —> N' to
NS —* 8* (Figs. 3 and 8). On this point there is little to add. to
what we have said in the first section of this chapter: we should
Fig. 8 -N+



I370
simply make a diachronic specification of the characterization
we drew from Hobson. In particular, we need to show the con-
nection between the tendency to full realization of an informal
free-trade. :empire (designated by the convergence at N of
S’ —-> N' and NS —» N‘) and the tendency of the English in-
formal empire to pass into "new’ imperialism or imperialism
tout court.
Of ‘ those tendencies which Hobson enumerated in his
characterization of the change, the first to manifest itself was
the strengthening of political and economic ties between
mother-country and colonies in the strict sense — the so-called
settler dominions. This objective dominated 'imperialist’ think-
ing in the 1870’s, although little of substance was achieved. At
the end “of the decade, however, there'began that spectacular
territorial expansion of the English formal empire which is
generally held to open a new epoch and which was to be a
characteristic feature of the next twenty years. As the reader
will recall, this tendency is designated, in the extended repre-
sentation of the ‘new’ imperialism (Fig. 4), by means of the arc
N+ —’ S‘; we may interpret this as the tendency of the ghost
of a past epoch to be 'resurrected’. We have already seen that
the tendency in question was the dominant characteristic of
the second phase of English expansionism, in which inter-
national relations, after a century of anarchy and war, started
moving towards the creation of a formal-hierarchic peace. The
resumption of English formal-imperial expansionism at the end
of the 19th century could still evoke the image of such a pacifica-
tion, and the imperialist propaganda of Hobson’s time relied on
just this possibility. But even though the tendency to expansion
of the English formal empire had in itself exhibited identical
characteristics in the late 18th and 19th centuries, the inter-
national context in which it was situated was radically different
in the two periods. Hence the significance of the phenomenon
was also different: if, in the late 18th century, it had represented
a tendency to hierarchical order guaranteeing universal peace
(N+ —> S’ ), at the end of the 19th century, it rather expressed a
tendency to universal anarchy and war (N' —+ S“ ). It is in this
sense that the English imperialism of Hobson’s time represen-The Articula'tion 71
ted only the 'ghost’ and not the ‘reality’ of formal imperialism —
its reality was something quite different, namely 'the theory
and the practice of competing empires’. That this was the
dominant feature of the epoch is revealed by the sharp rise in
English military expenditure: according to data provided by
Hobson,33 this grew from £27.9m in 1884 to £69.8m in 1900
and, after a leap during the Boer War, to £100.8m in 1903. The
public debt soared at the same pace, throwing into crisis the
whole edifice of free trade:
Government loans for direct enterprise largely connected with
armament and communications rose from zero before 1870 to
around £50 million just before the First World War. It was this
rather than the negligible expenditure on social welfare (other
than education) which made the old policy of cheap and inactive
government impossible.34
The policy of free trade was frequently called into question in
government circles, but Chamberlain’s electoral defeat in 1908
kept it formally alive for another decade. At the same time,
however, territorial expansionism and militarism had irrever-
sibly exacerbated inter-state relations, producing that situa-
tion of anarchy which would very soon result in the First
World War and the subsequent abandonment of free trade for
ever.
This configuration of events, in which international rivalry
was progressively transposed from the plane of relations
between individuals of different nationalities to that of inter-
state relations, had its roots in the near-complete informal
empire of free trade, which, as we have seen, was established
towards the end of the 1860’s. For free circulation of commodi-
ties, labour and capital had stimulated a shift in the inter-
national division of labour, tending to divest England of its
'naturally’ hegemonic position as the 'workshop of the world’:
In the literal sense Britain was perhaps never the 'workshop of the
world', but her industrial dominance was such in the middle of the
3" Hobson, op. cit., p. 65.
3‘ Hobsbawm, op. cit., p. 202.72
nineteenth century that the phrase is legitimate. . . . The chief rival
state, even then, was the USA — or rather the northern states of
the USA - with France, the German Confederation and Belgium.
All these, except in part little Belgium, lagged behind British
industrialization, but it was already clear that if they and others
continued to industrialize, Britain’s advantage would inevitably
shrink. And so it did. . . . [By] 1870 the ’workshop of the world’
possessed only between one quarter and one fifth of the world’s
steam power, and produced much less than half its steel. By the end
of the 1880s the relative decline was visible even in the formerly
dominant branches of production. By the early 1890s the USA and
Germany both passed Britain in the production of the crucial
commodity of industrialization, steel. From then on Britain was
one of a group of great industrial powers, but not the leader of
industrialization. Indeed, among the industrial powers it was the
most sluggish and the one which showed most obvious signs of
relative decline.35
From 1873 onwards, the decline of England’s 'natural’ mono-
poly proceeded in a context of acute international rivalry,
which provoked a long and precipitate fall inthe prices ob-
tained by English exports: although their volume increased,
their value stagnated for nearly twenty years, producing a
sharp and growing balance-of-payments deficit. In this situa-
tion, England’s adherence to free trade came more and more to
depend on its ability to close the trade gap with revenue of
another kind. Of primary importance in this respect were the
returns on investment abroad. But here too, the industrializa-
tion of other c0untries was beginning to make itself felt
continental EurOpe and the USA, which in the 1860’s had ab-
sorbed more than a half of English foreign investment, attrac-
ted in the 1880’s less than a third.
Thus, in order to maintain its own free-trade policy, England
came increasingly to depend on the proceeds of investment in
less developed areas, which, while geographically more exten-
sive, were economically more restricted. Latin America, and
above all the Dominions, replaced Europe and the United
States as the privileged sites of English investment, absorbing
nearly a half of the total in the 1880’s, as against less than a
35 Ibid., p. 110.The Articulation 73
quarter in the 1860’s. However, by itself, and thus in the long
term, this 'base’ could not support the weight of a growing trade
deficit as well as provide a surplus for new investment. Either
these regions would undergo efi'ective development, in which
case the outlets for English foreign investment would shrink
still further; or else they would not develop, and it would be-
conie difficult to recover the money invested in them.
As we know, the former tendency was to prevail in the
Dominions, the latter in the ‘honorary’ Dominions of Latin
America. In either case, towards the end of the century the onus
of correcting the English trade deficit and providing an excess
for new investment was gradually shifted from foreign invest-
ment income to the tribute drawn from the provinces of the
formal empire, above all India:
The surplus in India’s trade with the rest of the world rose in the
latter half of the century from £4 million to £50 million. This
second surplus was earned not with Britain, but with the USA,
Western Europe and Japan from sales of cotton and jute, and later
of textile manufactures also. At the same time, Britain continued
to export more to India than she imported from India. British
exporters found a market in India for textiles, sheet steel and other
products that were being challenged in other markets. In addition
to the direct-trade balance, Britain’s balance of payments with
India was augmented by receipts from the 'Home Charges’ — for the
British administration - and from interest on the Indian Govern-
ment debt (which rose from £70 million to £225 million in the last
quarter of the century). The reSulting surplus had risen by 1910 to
over £60 million. Thus not only the funds for investment in India
itself but a large part of the total investment-income from overseas,
that gave Britain her balance of payments surplus in the last quarter
of the nineteenth century, was provided by India.36
To conclude, the decline of England’s 'natural’ monopoly as
'workshop of the world’ reinforced the role played by India as
”the exception which proved the rule’ of free trade (§10). But the
exception also tended to become the rule: we should not be
deceived by the fact that expansion of the English State beyond
its national boundaries took place in the name of free trade.
3‘ Barratt Brown, op. cit. (1963), pp. 84—5.74
Here too, the characteristic tendencies of the preceding epoch
were subsumed under the newly-emerging tendencies, without
however determining their significance. This was defined by
the convergence of English expansionist policy (N’ —> 8*) with
that of other rising powers (NS —+ S+ ), leading towards a new
situation of anarchy and universal war.
.12. We have now succeeded in locating with some precision the
object of Hobson’s discourse. In the opening pages of his Study,
he sought to determine the significance (i.e., the importance) of
the concept of imperialism of his time, by drawing a number of
distinctions and oppositions. These have allowed us to define a
conceptual grid (§6) capable of ordering, synchronically and
diachronically, the multiplicity of events and tendencies that
can be ranged under the generic denomination of imperialism.
In the process, we have identified four distinct, and in some
respects antithetical, meanings which may be attributed to the
term or signifier in question, indeed which were in practice
assumed by it during the two- and- -a half centuries of English
world hegemony.
In other wOrds, the meaning of the concept of imperialism has
repeatedly changed. It is precisely the capacity of Hobson’ s
grid (represented in Fig. 8) to define the direction of these
changes which makes it scientifically more valid than that
represented by Fig. 3 and implicit in the conventional historio-
graphical critique of his positions. The contrast between these
two representations is a token of the poverty of historiography
when it claims to invalidate the propositions of a theory
merely by pointing to facts which the theory cannot and does
not seek to embrace.
The essential correctness of Hobson’s judgment was very
soon demonstrated by the outbreak of the First World War,
which led to England’s first open break with the principles and
the practice of free trade. In order to finance the war effort, the
English government introduced in 1915 a series of duties, later
retained' as protective customs, on durable consumer goods. It
is true that in the 1920’s a last vain attempt was made to restore
at least the semblance of the informal empire of free trade, butThe Articulation 75
it had no other effect than to make even more dramatic the
definitive breakdown of the 1930’s.
In the early thirties, change set in with abruptness. Its landmarks
were the abandonment of the gold standard by Great Britain; the
Five-Year Plans in Russia; the launching of the New Deal; the
National Socialist Revolution in Germany; the collapse of the.
League in favour of autarchist empires. While at the end of the
Great War nineteenth century ideals were paramount, and their
influence dominated the following decade, by 1940 every vestige of
the international system had disappeared and, apart from a few
enclaves, the nations were living in an entirely new international
setting.37
The collapse of the gold standard was the central event of this
process. International trade was deprived of a universally
accepted means of payment and took on barter-like forms, sub-
ject to detailed state mediation. Economic competition between
individuals and firms of different nationalities became a
phenomenon wholly internal to political rivalry among their
respective states — a rivalry which progressively rose until it
overflowed in the Second World War.
In this situation, England appeared at the mercy of events:
not a trace remained of its hegemonic position, of its capacity
to impose a code of conduct on the international system. Even
when it formally abandoned free-trade policies, it suffered
rather than determined the actions of others:
It was not until the slump of 1931 finally destroyed the single web
of world trading and financial transactions whose centre was
London and the pound sterling, that Free Trade went. Even then it
was not Britain that abandoned it. It was the world that abandoned
London.38
The only recourse left was to cultivate tighter relations with
the Dominions and with the provinces of a formal empire that
had grown enormously in the last phase of England’s hegemony.
37 K. Polanyi, The Great Transformation, Boston 1944, p. 23.
3“ Hobsbawm, op. cit., p. 207.76'
At the Ottawa Conference in 1932, a system of customs duties
was elaborated, the so-called imperial preferences, which dis-
criminated in favour of exchanges within the empire, thereby
accentuating the developing trend of ‘vertical’ trade flows
(between centre and periphery of opposed empires) to the detri-
ment of 'horizontal’ exchange (between sovereign and indepen-
dent nation-states), which was ever more rigidly regulated by
bilateral agreements.
Analogous tendencies manifested themselves in the move-
ment of men and capital. England’s indebtedness during the
First World War had already compelled it to liquidate the
greater part of its investments in the United States. Then, in the
inter-war period, English investments in Latin America were
progressively supplanted by American capital, while in general
recuperation of capital invested outside the borders of the
empire became more and more problematic. This ‘resulted in a
dramatic fall in English foreign investment (from 9.30/() of
national income in the period 1910—13, to 1.6% in 1925—29, and
—1.3% in 1935—39) and a sharp rise in such investment within
the safe confines of the empire (590/0 in 1930 against 470;, in
1913). The grbwing restrictions imposed on the international
movement of labour in this period, and the corresponding
reinforcement of economic links between centre and periphery
of the empires, also restructured the flow of migration along
vertical lines. The closely-woven net of informal ties, which had
connected the nations to one another about the middle of the
19th century, facilitating their expansion through mutual
'crossing’, disintegrated. National economies became relatively
watertight compartments.
The British empire was the most extensive of these compart:
ments; but it was now a reality in contraction. England seemed
to be retracing the path on which it had entered in the second
half of the 17th century, when its rise to world hegemony had
begun. The last act of its retreat was played out after the
Second World War, when England’s second 'colonial’ empire
disintegrated and the English State returned within its national
boundaries.
This withdrawal may be represented, in the conceptual spaceThe Articulation 77
Fig. 9



defined in previous sections, by means of an arc S+ —* NS, such
as that now dotted in Fig. 9. The position of this arc within the
space 11 is justified by the fact that, as we shall see in the next
chapter, imperialism assumed a fresh 'nationalist’ significance
in the first half of this century. For the moment, however, we
are concerned only to contrast this course with the'alternative
that Hobson indicated for England. In' fact, he offered no
alternative to the decline of English hegemony — only an alter-
native form of decline: a conscious and voluntary abandon-
ment of the country’s role as a great power. Only in this way
would it be possible to realize 'the fundamental conception
upon which nineteenth-century Free Trade prematurely
relied’:78
If there is one condition precedent to effective internationalism or
to establishment of any reliable relations between States, it is the
existence of strong, secure, well-developed, and responsible nations.
Internationalism can never be subserved by the suppression or
forcible adoption of nations.39
If other states were not prepared to co-operate peacefully and
entered the road of territorial expansion, then no advantage
would be derived from competing with them in the attempt to
keep the 'doors’ of the world open to one’s own commodities
and capital. Only further political weakening and a threat to
world peace would result from that course:
The 'open door’ is an advantage to our trafie, but not a necessity. If
we have to spend vast sums and incur vast risks in keeping 'doors
Open’ against the wishes of our best customers, it is moreprofitable
to let them close these doors and take our gain by the more indirect
but equally certain process of roundabout trade. . . . These con-
siderations ought to make us willing that other nations should do
their share of expansion and development, well contented to await
the profit which must accrue to us from every increase of world-
wealth through ordinary processes of exchange. . . . Since these
other nations are not only eager to do their share, but by th’eir
jealousy at our undertaking their work continually threaten to
wreck the peace of Europe, it seems sheer madness for Great Britain
to weaken herself politically by further process of expansion.40
The alternative to expanding the State beyond its national
boundaries was, for Hobson, a policy of intensive development
of human and natural resources within the nation, as a neces-
sary premise of effective internationalism:
Everywhere the issue of quantitative versus qualitative growth
comes up. This is the entire issue of empire. . . . A nation may either,
following the example of Denmark or Switzerland, put brains into
agriculture, develop a finely varied system of public education,
general and technical, apply the ripest science to its special manu-
facturing industries, and so support in progressive comfort and
Character a considerable population upon a strictly limited area;
3" Hobson, op. cit., pp. 362—3.
‘0 Ibid., pp. 68—70.The Articulation 79
or it may, like Great Britain, neglect its agriculture, allowing its
lands to go out of cultivation and its population to grow up in
towns, fall behind other nations in its methods of education and in
its capacity of adapting to its uses the latest scientific knowledge,
in order that it may squander its pecuniary and military resources
in forcing bad markets and finding speculative fields of investment
in distant corners of the earth, adding millions of square miles and
of unassimilable population to the area of the Empire.41
In other words, Hobson was proposing that England should
anticipate the time of its inevitable decline as a great power, to
avoid exacerbating politico-military rivalry between states by
defence of its own hegemonic position, and to prepare the con-
ditions of effective internationalism within its own national
boundaries. This alternative path may be designated by an are
N’ —> NS, such as that just dotted in Fig. 9. Its ‘terminus’ is thus
the same as that of the arc N’ —> S+ —> NS, which designates
the path actually travelled by England. But the conceptual
space separating the two corresponds to the half-century of
international anarchy manifested in, among other things, two
World Wars — precisely the events that Hobson feared. It is this
difference that, in the last analysis, shows us the significance
(that is, the importance) of Hobson’s concept of imperialism.
4' Ibid., pp. 92—3.3.
The Reduplication
Trajectories of US and German Imperialism
13. The outbreak of the First World War and the events of the
next thirty years revealed all the importance of Hobson’s con-
cept of imperialism. Precisely for that reason they could no
longer be understood within its framework. In the terms
defined in Figs. 8 and 9, once the tendencies. designated by
NS -> S+ manifested themselves, imperialism lost its signifi-
cance I4 to assume another. In this chapter, I shall attempt to
demonstrate in what sense and to what extent the succession,
nationalist imperialism (II), formal imperialism (12), informal
. . . . . J
imperialism (I3), Imperialism tout court (14), which characterized
the two-and-a-half centuries of English world hegemony, has
been repeated — or reduplicated — from the beginning of the
20th century up to this day.
Before we proceed, however, this is a good point at which to
explain how the. various powers involved in the struggle for
world hegemony were already 'bearers’ of diverse significa-
tions of imperialism at the end of the last century. Hobson left
the latter in the shade in order to illuminate the particular
image which interested him. But today we can and must bring
them into focus.
In particularly sharp relief stands the 'nationalist’ character
of German imperialism, which was in certain respects the
direct and immediate projection of the Prussian expansionism
that led to the political unification of Germany. As in the case
of 17th-century English imperialism, it would have been diffi-
cult, without the benefit of hindsight, to say where nationalism
ended and imperialism began: for instance, Cromwell’s bloody
80The Reduplication 81
reconquest of Ireland, which served as a prelude to the Naviga-
tion Acts and the wars with Holland — was that still nationalism
or already imperialism? Similarly, what was the nature of the
Prussian conquest of Alsace-Lorraine in 1871? Like England
two-and-a-half centuries earlier, late 19th century Germany
was a 'late-comer’, aspiring to a redivision of the world which
would create the 'living space’ (Lebensraum) necessary for the
expansion of its own nationality:
Having no significant overseas possessions . . . and feeling hemmed
in at home, [the Germans] came to rest their hopes on the idea of
Central European hegemony. From there it was only a step to the
idea of 'colonizing’ the Slavs: the Ukraine was to be their Africa.
in this respect, Hitler was merely the executor of a Pan-German
programme which had begun to take shape in the 1890s.42
(
This strategic vision called for control of the Balkans and the
Middle East, in opposition to the expansionist goals of Russia.
By the end of the 1890’s, moreover, Germany was in a position
to challenge British naval supremacy, and thus to end its
reliance on England’s good-will for the realization of its plans
of continental hegemony: 'Without naval power Germany’s
position in the world resembles that of a shell-fish without a
shell,’ wrote Tirpitz, the initiator of the German naval pro-
gramme adopted at the beginning of this century.
In other words, Germany set out to retread the militarist and
colonialist path which had carried England to world hegemony
in the second half of the 17th century; and just as the earlier
attempt had brought England into conflict with Holland, so did
Germany enter into direct contradiction with England.
Quite different was the significance of the imperialism borne
by the other great rising power of the late 19th century: the
United States. Although it too was a late-comer, the USA had
already solved its Lebensraum problem in the first half of the
19th century — a problem which had loomed large in the ideo-
logy of the North American colonists before Independence.
Thus, Franklin 'predicted that the population of the colonies
‘2 Lichtheim, op. cit., p. 67.82
would double every quarter century and admonished the
British Government to secure additional living space for these
newcomers, on the grounds that a prince who "acquires new
Territory, if he finds it vacant, or removes the Natives to give
his own People Room” deserves the gratitude of posterity’. 43
Freed from English imperial control, the young United States
threw itself into almost boundless territorial growth at the
expense of the native populations and the other colonial
peoples of America (French and Spanish). To the north, the
conquest of Canada was blocked by the English in 1812; but to
the south and east, expansion seemed to have no limits: between
1803 and 1853, the USA acquired or con’quered from the de-
clining colonial powers (France and Spain) or from newly-
emerging Latin American nations about 2.3 million square
miles — as much again as it possessed at the beginning of the
period. The limits to expansion were more internal than ex-
ternal: once they had reached the Caribbean coast, the Southern
states were in favour of annexing Cuba as a new slave territory.
But they encountered the firm opposition of the Northern
states, which feared a change in the relationship of forces
between the free states and the slave states.
This was one aspect of the growing internal conflict which
would very soon result in the Civil War (1860—65). The victory
of the North marked the end of territorial expansion. Thus
when in the second half of the 19th century a race for territorial
annexation began between the other powers, the United States
had already completed one. As Stedman Jones has noted:
American historians who speak complacently of the absence of the
settler-type colonialism characteristic of European powers merely
conceal the fact that the whole internal history of United States
imperialism was one vast process of territorial seizure and occupa-
tion. The absence of territorialism ‘abroad’ was founded on an
unprecedented territorialism 'at home’.44
43 Ibid., p. 58.
‘4 G. Stedman Jones, The History of US Imperialism, in R. Blackburn (ed )
Ideology m Social Science, London 1972, pp. 216—7. Emphasis in the original.The Reduplication 83
This 'internalization’ of imperialism also manifested itself at an
ideological level. The idea of 'empire’ had in fact dominated
American political thought since the Very beginning, and the
goal of the War of Independence itself 'had been to form an
empire which would allow greater autonomy to the American
colonies:
To both of the political parties — Federalists and Republicans - the
new federal union was an empire. The two terms were equivalents
in the vocabularies of Washington, Adams, Hamilton, and Jeffer-
son.45
After the Civil War, the term empire was avoided and replaced
by 'nation’. No doubt this reflected a concern to take a distance
from the connotations of decadence which the term was
assuming in Europe. But it expressed perhaps still more the
fact that a North American continental empire had already
been created with the subordination of the Southern states, and
that the principal objective now was to forge it into a single
nation.
At any event, American expansionism changed course
decisively in the three decades following the Civil War. Inter-
nally, 'colonization’ of the acquired territories proceeded at an
intense pace (the railway systems were completed, and far-
mers, cattle-breeders and speculators occupied more land in
these thirty years than had been occupied in the three previous
centuries). Externally, the United States embarked upon a path
of informal-type expansionism. This is not to say that no fur-
ther annexations occurred. In fact, Alaska was acquired in
1867; and although Secretary of State Seward was prevented by
a Senate veto from taking concrete steps to incorporate the
Hawaian Islands, he managed all the same to annex the Mid-
way Islands, 1,200 miles further to the east. After the integra-
tion of Alaska (which sandwiched British Columbia between
American territories) there were even plans to step up the
pressure on Canada to become part of the United States. But
‘5 R. W. Van Alstyne, The American Empire: Its Historical Pattern and
Evolution, Routledge 1960, p. 10.84
the importance of these annexations, and of others such as
Panama which were starting to be prospected, no longer con-
sisted in the geographical extent of colonization. They were
rather inserted in a strategy of informal domination of the
Pacific, protected in the north by Alaska, in the centre by
Hawaii and California, and in the south by control of Panama,
to guarantee the free circulation of American commodities and
capital.46
In the closing decades of the 19th century, the United States
came more and more to complement, and in part to replace,
England as the centre of the informal empire of free trade. We
shall see later (§16) that in important respects the American
'open-door’ policy always differed from that of the English — for
instance, the United States never became? free-trade power in
the sense that England had been one. For the moment, how-
ever, we are concerned simply to register the fact the United
States became only marginally an imperialist power, in the
sense exhibited by the principal European States at the turn of
the century.
This judgment would seem to conflict with the evidence of a
sharp rise in American naval expenditure in the 1890’s, the
war against Spain at the end of the decade and of the subse-
quent occupation of the Panama Canal Zone. Of course, there
is no reason to deny that these events were an integral part of
the general tendency of the epoch to greater political rivalry
among states. But in this case, not only were they so circum-
scribed in time that they assumed an almost episodic character,
but they were also almost totally homogeneous with the policy
of territorial expansion of the previous thirty years. In fact, the
Spanish-American war and the occupation of the Panama
Canal did no more than realize Seward’s strategic project of
thirty-five years earlier: the Hawaii Islands were annexed as
the base necessary for domination of the Pacific and trade
penetration of the Far East; even in the Philippines, all that
was initially sought was a suitable naval base — it was the
I
0
4° W. A. Williams, The Contours of American History, New York 1961,
pp. 318 ff.The Reduplication 85
rebellion against American occupation that rendered annexa-
tion an ‘unfortunate necessity’."’7
In any case, the significance of these acquisitions and of the
policy of Pacific domination was rapidly clarified by US actions
in China. Unlike the English 'open-door’ policy, which ack-
nowledged the existence of privileged spheres of interest, the
US counterpart specified absolute equality of treatment for the
various poWers, as well as acceptance of the territorial and
administrative integrity of China. This course therefore in-
volved resistance to tendencies which broke up the unity of the
world market, and formal support for the nationalist tenden-
cies then beginning to take shape in the non-European world.
It was in evidence above all under Wilson, whose political
philosophy was in a number of crucial respects similar to that
of Hobson. In particular, Wilson’s idea of universal peace was
inextricably linked to the concept of an informal order, which,
while not rigidly free-tradist, was yet based on the freest
international circulation of commodities and capital prac-
ticable. '
The imperialism of the powers emerging at the end of the
19th century thus had a different significance from the English
phenomenon we examined in sections 7 and 11. In the terms
defined in the last chapter, the imperialism of the newly-
emerging powers may be represented by means of the diagram
of Fig. 10, where 11 designates the nationalist imperialism of
Germany, and 1;, the informal imperialism of the United States.48
More precisely, NS —> S+ designates German imperialism as
a projection of the Prussian expansionism which resulted in the
unification of Germany; and 8+ —* N+ refers to the tendency of
‘7 Stedman Jones, op. cit., p. 227.
43 The definition I am about to give of the imperialism of the newly-emerging
powers differs from, but does not contradict, that formulated at the end of the
first chapter, when I designated the trajectories of German nationalism by
means of S— -> NS —r S+ and that of American nationalism by means of
N+ —> NS -+ N” (§6). There, I was abstracting them from the concept of hege-
mony, which has since allowed me to articulate these two co-ordinates in a
single representation capable of univocally defining the imperialism of the
hegemonic power. The imperialism of the emerging powers is thus now to be
re-defined in accordance with this possibility of articulation.86
this imperialism to create 'living space’ for the expansion of the
young German nation. 8‘ -+ NS and S" —> N‘, for their part,
designate jointly the divergence of imperialism and national-
ism which came to characterize American expansionism after
the Civil War: on the one hand, the tendency to forge the North
American continental empire into a nation (8' —> NS); on the
other hand, the tendency to transform continent-wide formal
imperialism into informal imperialism of a universal character
(S- —» N—).
The reader will notice that the diagram of Fig. 10 is the
complement of that of Fig. 4. Superimposing the one on the
other, we obtain the diagram of Fig. 8, which then permits at
Fig. 10 -N+ “

l3 vThe Reduplication 87
once a synchronic and diachronic reading. The quadrants II,
12, I3, and L can, that is, just as well designate the series of
meanings which English imperialism gradually assumed in its
two-and-a-half centuries of world hegemony, as they do the
diverse significances simultaneously assumed by imperialism
when English hegemony was in decline.
At first sight, the diagram of Fig. 10 indicates that even the
imperialism of the newly-emerging powers was not univocal in
character — since it could assume opposite meanings (I, and
13). But as the significance of the imperialism of the declining
power was in the last analysis determined by N‘ —> S+ and not
by N+ —> S’ (§7), so Fig. 10 focuses the fact that Hobson’s grid
defines S’ —v N’ rather than S+ —> N" as the tendency which
ultimately decided the significance of the imperialism of the
newly-emerging powers. In effect, the convergence at N of the
ensembles 11 and I3 is less immediate and linear than the con-
vergence at S"' of the ensembles I; and L. Unlike the sub-
ensemble 1;, the sub-ensemble 11 does not really imply
straightforward convergence at NS, but rather signals a
tendency to circularity among nationalist and immrialist
phenomena - a tendency represented precisely by the con-
catenation NS —> S+ —> N+ —+ NS. . . . We shall see in a moment
what historical significance may be attached to this tendency
to circularity of nationalist imperialism. But we may already
conclude that it can only weaken or delay, and not block, the
convergence at N” .49
Hobson’s concept of imperialism thus emerges with a yet
greater precision. The conscious and voluntary abandonment
of a great power role — the trajectory N‘ —» NS in Fig. 9 which
Hobson proposed for England as an alternative to inevitable
and tragic disintegration of its hegemony (N’ —> 8* ——> NS) —
would not have resulted in a political vacuum, but would have
strengthened the pacifist component of the imperialism of the
rising powers. Peaceful replacement of British by US hege-
mony was, moreover, the substance of American foreign policy
‘9 If the reader wishes to interpret Fig. 10 as a digraph, then N” could be
regarded as its 'well’.88
thinking at the end of the 19th and the beginning of the 20th
century. While this vision did not adequately take into account
the other — nationalist — component of the immrialism of the
rising powers, it is nevertheless also true that territorial ex-
pansion of the English state during these years decisively
shifted the compass-needle away from peaceful interchange of
goods and ideas between firms and individuals of different
nationality towards politico-military rivalry among states.
Hobson’s vision was not, after all, completely lacking in politi-
cal realism.
14. The path of nationalist imperialism did not lead Germany
to a lasting hegemonic position, of the kind that England had
captured two hundred years earlier. Such a road to hegemony
was largely blocked, both because others had already travelled
it, and because the international system had, in the intervening
period, been more rigidly structured into nation-states. Ger-
many’s quest for hegemony thus ended by unifying old and new
powers in a rival bloc against it. England and the United States
were alike endangered by Germany’s aspirations to domination
of the seas; while its drive to continental hegemony constituted
a threat to both France and Russia.
As is well known, defeat in the First World War did not
change the dimensional structure of German nationalist im-
perialism, but led to its radicalization. The ideology of 'living
space’ passed into the doctrine of the grossdeutsches Reich — a
Kind of Germanic 'Monroe Doctrine’ which inspired the ex-
pansionism and racism of the Nazi State. This radicalization
was accompanied by a ‘perverse’ capacity to exasperate the
anarchic tendencies latent in the international system:
Germany, once defeated, was in a position to recognize the hidden
shortcomings of the nineteenth-century order, and to employ this
knowledge to speed the destruction of that order. A kind of sinister
intellectual superiority accrued to those of her statesmen in the
thirties who turned their minds to this task of disruption, which
often extended to the development of new methods of finance, trade,
war, and social organisation, in the course of their attempt to force
matters into the trend of their policies.50
5° Polanyi, op. cit., p. 23.The Reduplication 89
Germany thus came to enjoy momentary hegemony over the
international system — a position which secured it, among other
things, the alliance of other late-comers affected by problems
of 'living space’ (Japan and Italy).51 This hegemony did not last
long. Grouped together in an alliance, the expansionist ten-
dencies which had developed independently within the three
Axis nation-states reinforced one another, driving great powers
whose own aspirations to hegemony were threatened and
nation-states whose very survival was in jeopardy, into a
common front against them.
In other words, ,German nationalist imperialism of the first
half of this century, instead of representing the first phase of a
new hegemony, as had been the case with English nationalist
imperialism in the 17th and 18th centuries, tended to chase its
own tail, so to speak, unleashing a vicious circle of nationalism
and imperialism. These two routes, expressed within the con-
ceptual space which we have defined as 'nationalist imperial-
ism’, are represented in Fig. 11 by means of an arc NS —-> N" and
a circle inscribed in the quadrant II, respectively. As we saw in
section 8, the former designates the path which brought
England to lasting world hegemony in the 18th century; the
latter designates the vicious circle in which Germany became
caught when, in the first half of the 20th century, it attempted
to retread this path in a radically changed geo-political
situation.
Beyond these two differences, however, there is an evident
analogy between the two phases of nationalist imperialism: not
only from the point of view of their 'origin’ (the process of
formation of a nation-state) and their ‘function’ (the creation of
space for expanding the nationality), but also from that of their
'outcomes’, or rather, of the conditions under which they were
superseded. Thus, the new period of world-wide anarchy and
5‘ The level of abstraction involved in the present investigation allows of no
differentiation among the imperialisms of the three Axis powers, in particular
Germany and Japan, which pursued the path of nationalist imperialism with
greatest success, however temporarily. Despite the profound differences
between the socio-political structures of these two countries (cf. K. Hayashi,
'Japan and Germany in the Interwar Period’ in J. W. Morley, ed., Dilemmas of
Growth in Prewar Japan, Princeton 1971) the two imperialisms can be repre-
sented in an identical way within our grid.3+
war also ended by generating nationalist tendencies in the
colonial world, as 'a result of which nationalist imperialism
was superseded as the dominant form of international relations.
In this case too there is a clear link between the mobilization
of the colonies and provinces of the rival empires for war, and
the development within them of national liberation move-
ments. Just as the mobilization of the North American colonies
had fostered their nationalist sentiments, so did the Second
World War mark a dramatic turn in the affirmation of national-
ism within the new colonial world:
By the end of the war a number of indestructible realities had been
created. The most significant of these was not the reversal of the
relationship between debtors and creditors, nor even the Atlantic
and UN Charters and other events and agreements which ratified
and set the seal upon national sovereignty, nor the abolition of
treaties of capitulation, extra-territorial rights and racial discrimi-
nation. In most cases, all these things could be, and would be,
renounced and annulled. . . . Of greater importance was the fact
that the colonial peoples were taking up arms against the aggres-
sors, having already done their duty for the common victory as
regular soldiers and sailors, as workers in the arms and transport
industries, and as fighters in the national liberation armies.52
The analogy should nevertheless be treated with some caution,
since, with only a few exceptions (e.g., South Africa) it was not
52 W. Markov, Sistemi Coloniali e Movimenti di Liberazione, Rome 1961, p. 69.The Reduplication 91
the settlers but the colonized peoples who broke away from the
metropolis to form new nation-states. In effect, so far as rela-
tions between colonized and colonizers are concerned, the use
of a single term 'colonial revolution’ conceals realities which
differ radically according to whether the former or the latter
are its subject. But the ‘colonial revolution’ interests us here
exclusively from the point of View of its impact upon nation-
states struggling for world hegemony; and in this sense, it is
perfectly legitimate to employ a single designation (N+ —-> NS)
both for the nationalist tendencies in the colonial arenas of the
late 18th century and for those of the mid-20th century.
Moreover, this was the standpoint adopted by Lenin when he
included Boer nationalism within the anti-imperialist move-
ments of the colonial world. Indeed, it seems to me that the
ensemble I, was precisely the object of which Lenin was speak-
ing. For him, as for Hobson, imperialism was above all a ten-
dency to universal war resulting from the expansion of states
beyond their national boundaries (NS —’ 8*). However, al-
though he adopted Hobson’s definition of imperialism as
’anarchy and war’ in opposition to the traditional connotation
of 'hierarchy and peace’, Lenin was writing at a time when the
tendency in question had already clearly manifested itself with
the outbreak of the First World War, and when imperialism
was starting to assume a different significance from that which
Hobson had ascribed to it (L).
Lenin’s fundamental insight was precisely his stress on the
tendency of imperialism to generate national liberation move-
ments, and his perception that this tendency constituted the
limit, at the level of international relations, of the imperialism of
his epoch:
The imperialist war . . . contributed to the growth of the revolu-
tionary movement, because the European imperialists had to enlist
whole colonial regiments in their struggle. The imperialist war
aroused the East also and drew its peoples into international
politics. Britain and France armed colonial peoples and helped
them to familiarize themselves with military technique and up-to-
date machines. That knowledge they will use against the imperialist
gentry. The period of the awakening of the East in the contemporary.92
revolution is being succeeded by a period in which all the Eastern
peoples will participate in deciding the destiny of the whole world,
so as not to be simply objects of the enrichment of others. The
peoples of the East are becoming alive to the need for practical
action, for every nation to take part in shaping the destiny of all
mankind.53
Thus, both Hobson and Lenin spoke of the tendency to anarchy
and universal war (NS —r S+ ). But whereas the former referred
to it as a component of the ensemble L, that is as the outcome
of ongoing tendencies, the latter spoke of it as a component of
the ensemble 1,, that is as a premise of the development of
national liberation movements in the colonies.
15. In the same way as the outbreak of the First World War and
the events of the next thirty years demonstrated the importance
of Hobson’s concept of imperialism, yet surpassed its meaning,
so the new wave of nationalism released since the Second
World War demonstrated the enormous importance of Lenin’s
concept of imperialism, while by that very token transcending
its meaning. After the last war, in fact, the nature of the struggle
for hegemony among the great powers underwent radical
alteration; and this change has, in its turn, remoulded the
national liberation movements themselves.
As is well known, the Second World War not only unleashed
a new wave of nationalism, but also signalled the assertion of
almost total American economic and military predominance:
If before the war America’s economy was one among other great
economies, after the war it became the central economy in a rapidly
developing world economy. If before the war America’s military had
only sporadic significance in the world’s conflicts, after the war its
nuclear umbrella backed by high technology conventional forces
terrorized one part of the world and gave security to the other.
Above all, the once loosely jointed federal government of the US
became a powerful, wealthy, and stable state, the axis on which
much of the world’s politics, including those of America’s enemies,
revolved.“
’3 V. I. Lenin, 'Address to the Second All-Russia Congress of Communist
Organisations of the Peoples of the East’ (Nov. 1919), in Selected Works, op. cit.,
Vol. 3, p. 305.
5‘ F. Schumann, The Logic of World Power, New York 1974, p. XXX.The Reduplication 93
Like the new ‘colonial revolution’, this American pre-eminence
was in a certain sense the result of the previous thirty years of
world-wide anarchy and war. The 'domestic territorialism’ of
the first half of the 19th century, together with the industrial
revolution of the second half, had in reality allowed the United
States to become by the beginning of this century not only the
technologically most advanced, but also the most self-sufficient
national economy in the world. What for the other late-comers
was only a pervasive aspiration of their ideology and politics,
was for the USA a quite 'natural’ objective fact. The efforts of
these late-comers to redivide the world into self-sufficient
empires of a continental character could not but favour those
which already constituted such an 'empire’ — the United States
and, to a lesser extent, the Soviet Union.
During the previous phase of imperialism, the tendencies to
colonial revolution and affirmation of American hegemony had
developed in parallel, exhibiting in certain'respects common
objectives. In the situation existing at the end of the last cen-
tury, for example, the demand that China’s territorial and
administrative integrity be maintained (§13) was tantamount
to an act of support for the nationalist tendencies which were
gradually developing in that country, in opposition to the
policy of partition or annexation of the sub-continent preferred
by the European powers. An analogous role was played by the
United States in Latin America, where the application of the
Monroe Doctrine had effectively contained European expan-
sionist tendencies. It is true thats’American policy in this area
already prefigured, by its intimidating acts of intervention, the
limits of its support for national sovereignty. But that did not
stop the USA from presenting itself as an anti-colonialist power
faithful to its image of the 'first ex-colony’, or from being per-
ceived as such on the world arena.
The United States was thus able to pose during the Second
World War as the natural ally of the emergent nationalism in
the colonial empires, and as the guarantor of the promises of
self-determination and national independence through which
the colonial peoples were mobilized against the Axis powers.
Immediately after the war, the model of the 'Revolution of 1776’94
was not merely an American propaganda weapon for use in the
colonial world, but also a spontaneous source of inspiration for
the colonial peoples themselves. The Democratic Republic of
Vietnam, for instance, modelled its 1946 Declaration of Inde-
pendence on the American document of 1776. In reality, US
support, or at least neutrality, in the struggles of the national
liberation movements did acc‘e-lerate the tendency to de-
colonization in certain areas of particular economic and
strategic importance (the Middle-East, India, Indonesia).
Towards the end of the 1940’s, however, the nationalist ten-
dencies of the colonial world began to diverge from the expan-
sionist tendencies of the United States — a phenomenon that
was to characterize the international arena for more. than
twenty years. This divarication was to be just one aspect of the
form assumed by American hegemony during the period of the
so-called Cold War. As was stressed a little earlier, the United
States was not the only country to profit from the situation of
world-wide anarchy and war which had characterized the first
half of the century. To a lesser degree this was also true of
Russia - the other nation-state to have, in a certain sense,
anticipated and 'internalized’ the tendency to territorial
annexation of the late 19th century.
Hobson himself noted that Russian expansionism, while fall-
ing under the general phenomenon of 'New Imperialism’, exhi-
bited a number of specific features which differentiated it from
that of the other powers:
Russia . . . stood alone in the character of her imperial growth,
which differed from other Imperialisms in that it was principally
Asiatic in its achievements and proceeded by direct extension of
imperial boundaries, partaking to a larger extentthan 1n the other
cases of a regular colonial policy of settlement .for purposes of
agriculture and industry. It 13, however, evident that Russian ex-
pansion, though of a more normal and natural order than that'
which characterizes the new Imperialism, came definitely into
competition with the claims and aspirations of the latter in Asia,
and was advancing rapidly during the period which is the object of
our study.55
55 Hobson, op. cit., pp. 21—2.The Reduplication .95
Thus Russia had also unexpectedly attained those continental
dimensions which were to represent a decisive advantage in the
subsequent phase of nationalist imperialism. Unlike the USA,
however, Russia did not achieve, at the beginning of the phase
in question, those conditions of internal cultural homogeneity
and technological superiority which were equally crucial in
the assertion of American economic and military pre-eminence.
It also occupied a geographical position which exposed it to
direct attack from the two most warlike late- -comers (Japan to
the East, and Germany to the West). Russia was thus to rely
principally upon political revolution and ideology 1n defending
its territorial integrity and in creating a cordon sanitaire to
protect it from external attack.“6
In this case too, the distinction between nationalism and
expansionism is largely arbitrary. One thing is certain, how-
ever: at the end of the Second World War, the USSR could
represent itself, and be perceived, on the world arena as the
bearer of an alternative model of pacification/integration of
nationalism, both old and new. Having defeated the nationalist
imperialism of the Axis powers, the United States now found in
the formal order, of a predominantly political and continental
character, of which the Soviet Union was the bearer, a new
obstacle to that informal order, of a predominantly economic
and global character, of which the US had been the bearer since
the end of the 19th century.
This was perhaps the major reason, at the level of inter-
national relations, why American economic and military pre-
56 These brief allusions to the dynamic of Russian expansionism necessarily
disregard the break between the Tsarist state and the Soviet state — just as our
passing remarks on the dynamic of French expansionism after the Seven Years
War (§9) placed in the shade the disjuncture represented by the French Revolu-
tion of 1789. This is partially due to the fact that the present analysis is restric-
ted to those nation-states (England, Germany and the USA) which have
actually won a position of world hegemony during the last three hundred
years. The characteristic tendencies of the other nation-states, including the
r1vals of England and the USA, France and Russia, are only considered in so far
as they shed light upon the actions of the hegemonic powers. But even apart
from these limits, the plane we have chosen for analysis - that of expansionist
tendencies — is perhaps that least suitable for bringing out the medium to long
term disjunctures initiated by the social revolutions of 1789 and 1917.96
eminence did not lead in the short to medium term to the
realization of Wilson’s vision of an informal world order, in
which American hegemony would be guaranteed by economic
superiority and only secondaril by political and military
mechanisms. Instead it was Fran lin D. Roosevelt’s vision,
which attached decisive weight to political mediation, which
prevailed:
What Roosevelt wanted was to remake the entire world in the
American image, and particularly to repeat for the world what the
Americans had done for themselves a century and a half before — to
create one out of the many, as the official American motto goes. . . .
What died with Roosevelt was the hope that Russia could be
woven into the new order, and, eventually, what came into being
was a containment policy directed against Russia. But the kind of
policies that containment dictated for the free world were essen-
tially those already sketched out in Roosevelt’s vision: American
military power strategically placed throughout the world, a new
monetary system based on the dollar, economic assistance to the
destroyed countries, political linkages realized through the UN
and other international agencies. By the end of the 1940s, a new
American world order had clearly emerged.57
The American federal government thus extended the role it had
assumed of ”state above states’ in relations between the States of
the Union, to the whole of the so-called Free World. The formal
character of this order found expression not only in the grow-
ing centralization of principal political, military and financial
functions in the hands of the American government, but also in
the creation of a stable hierarchy of states operating within the
various international bodies created in order to reconstruct
the political and economic unity of the Free World. In this
hierarchy, the existence of which was often explicitly ack-
nowledged, the summit was invariably occuped by the United
States; the intermediary positions by the old and new powers
of West Europe and Japan, whose conflicts with one another
had dominated the first half of the century and whose respec-
tive ranks had been drastically reshaped by the Second World
’7 Schurmann, op. cit., pp. 4—5.The Reduplication .97
War; and the bottom positions by the peripheral countries of
the old formal or informal empires.
The practical and ideological justification of this formal
empire (which the American New Left has ironically called the
Free World Empire) was the threat to American hegemony
posed by the formation of the so-called Communist World under
Soviet hegemony. The reality of the danger was quite rapidly
demonstrated by the success of the Chinese Revolution and
therewith the adherence to the Soviet camp of China — the
favoured site of American expansionist designs since the second
half of the 19th century.
However, this is not the question that interests us here. For
our purposes, it is enough to stress the no less, if not more,
hierarchical nature of the internal order of the Communist
world. For the coexistence of the two hierarchies (and their
politico-ideological counterposition) was to prove 'functional’
to world peace. In this sense there is no doubt that the-specific
and dominant characteristic of the Cold War was its super-
session of the international anarchy that had dominated the
previous thirty years: despite the radical and violent counter-
position of the two 'worlds’ on the ideological and cultural
levels, inter-state relations were effectively put upon a peaceful
footing.
Beyond the substantive differences which we shall have
occasion to emphasize below, there was a certain broad analogy
between this first phase of the Pax Americana and the first
phase of the Pax Britannica. As England had tried, in the half-
century following the Seven Years’ War, to formalize the pre-
eminence which it had gained during the preceding century of
world-wide warfare into an imperial system (§9), so did the
United States pursue much the same goal at the end of the
Second World War. To the Franco-English 'imperial’ dualism
corresponded now a Russo-American dualism. Each phase
exhibited a tendency for a hierarchical order among states to
emerge, conducive to a universal peace. The modes and tempos
of its realization differed, but there was no mistaking the trend
that found expression during the early 60’s in the so-called
:haw and the doctrine of peaceful coexistence..98 f
The evidence then seems to warrant the ascription of a
formal-imperialist character (12), as defined in the last chapter,
to post-war American imperialism. To be more precise, the
rise of the United States to a hegemonic power ought to be
designated by means of an arc NS —» S" within the quadrant 12,
like that dotted in Fig. 11. Confirmation that this designation
is the most satisfactory of those possible within our grid is
provided by the fact that, in this case too, the attempt to instal
a hierarchical order among states serving to foster universal
peace ended by detonating nationalist tendencies within the
imperial world (S‘ —> NS), as a result of which these attempts
were themselves surpassed. I am referring to the fresh wave of
nationalism, whose epicentre was in South-East Asia, which,
from the early 60’s onwards, threw into crisis Russo-American
efforts to formalize a co-dominion over the world.
Cuba’s break with the American empire and the withdrawal
of China from the Soviet bloc constituted the decisive moments
in the formation of a Third World, comprising the nations
which had occupied the lower rungs of the two opposing
hierarchies. But it was only in the late 60’s, when-the inability
of the USA to sustain its imperial functions became increas-
ingly evident that the epoch finally came to an end and another
one started. As Goran Therborn acutely observed when com-
menting upon the Tet Offensive:
The Cold War was a fundamentally unequal conflict, that was
presented and experienced on both sides as being equal. . . . Fought
out as a competitive conflict between the USSR and the USA in
Europe, it resulted in the massive political and ideological con-
solidation of capitalism in the West. An unequal conflict fought as
equal redoubles the inequality. . . . The contemporary conflict
between imperialism and national liberation, of which the war in
Vietnam is the principal aspect today, is totally different in struc-
ture. It is a conflict between unequal forces presented and lived as
unequal. . . . The Cold War was a struggle on the same plane between
two forces at different levels. The protracted war of a guerrilla army
against an imperialist military expedition is the armed expression
of a conflict where the inequality of the parties is matched by a
struggle on disparate planes - each party fighting on differentThe Reduplication .99
terrain. . . . an unequal struggle waged as unequal equalizes the
inequality.58
16. At the end of the 60’s, then, the international system
entered a new phase, which is characterized precisely by the
tendency to decomposition of the formal empires constructed
during the previous twenty years (8' —+,NS) and by the attempt
of the USA to maintain its own hegemonic position on the basis
of an informal dominion (S‘ —> N" ). The victory of the Viet-
namese Revolution accelerated the transformation of the
national sovereignty of Third World states from a purely for-
mal autonomy into real political independence — demonstrated
at the level of economic relations by more aggressive interven-
tion in the commodity markets and assertions of control over
their natural resources:
I
For once, countries in the Third World are actively controlling the
terms of their trade with the industrialized world and the returns
they get from the powerful multinational corporations, instead of
the other way round. . . . Nor does the new economic nationalism
stop at attempts to control the prices upon which depend the export
incomes and through that the economic livelihood of Third World
nations. Action on prices is seen only as one component of a general
strategy of securing control over marketing and ultimately pro-
duction in the resource industries which sustain Third World
economies.59 '
It is obviously too early to evaluate the chances of success of
such a ‘broader’ strategy. But it seems hard to dispute that the
relationship of forces between the Third World and metropoli-
tanstates has changed decisively, undermining the structure
of past relations of 'unequal exchange’.
The shift is even more evident at the political level, where the
new independence of Third World countries is manifested above
58 G. Therborn, 'From Petrograd to Saigon’, New Left Review, 48, March—
April 1968, pp. 4—6. Emphasis in the original.
_ 5° Girvan, 'Economic Nationalists vs. Multinational Corporations: Revolu-
tionary or Evolutionary Change?’ (IDEP duplicated paper), Dakar 1974.100
all in their greater promptitude and capacity to resort to war to
regulate their mutual relations and consolidate their fragile
national unity. Some may question the autonomy of the mili-
tary decisions taken by these states and argue that the wars
which have broken out in the Third World since 1968 are an
expression of the Cold War between East and West. But each of
these wars — from Biafra to Bangla Desh, from the Middle East
to the Horn of Africa — has generated more intense contradic-
tions within the two empires than between them.
Furthermore, latent contradictions had long since existed
between the summits and the intermediary rungs of each
hierarchy, and they were continuing to develop pari passu with
those between the summits and the Third World. In the 1960’s,
after an ebb associated with the Cold War, nationalist tenden-
cies forcefully re-emerged within each zone. In Eastern Europe,
the nationalist revival seemed to be linked with a shift in the
balance of forces between the Free World Empire and the
Soviet bloc to the advantage of the former. In Western Europe,
by contrast, the resurgence of nationalism, centred on Gaullist
France, appears to have been associated principally with the
enfeeblement of the United States as a state above states. In
fact, the escalation of intervention in Vietnam, while dis-
closing the strategic vulnerability of American technological
supremacy, exacerbated the financial weakness of the United
States in relation to Europe, which had started to set in for-
other reasons during the late 50’s (§23).
In any case, the crisis of American formal imperialism came
to a head between 1968 and 1971 and was in practice ack-
nowledged by the US government itself with its announcement
of the inconvertibility of the dollar into gold, its theory of the
'five poles’ of the international system, and its military with-
drawal from Vietnam. The Watergate scandal and the tem-
porary paralysis of the CIA as an 'imperial’ police force have
subsequently consolidated this turn in foreign policy and
modified the powers of the Executive in US internal affairs.
This is not to say, of course, that the United States has given
up world hegemony. On the contrary, the sudden abandonment
of formal imperialism in favour of informal imperialism seemsThe Reduplication 101
to have given a new lease of life to American paramountcy.
From this point of view, the United States has a decisive ad-
vantage over the USSR. The Soviet formal ‘empire’ was from
the outset, and remains today, based upOn mechanisms of an
overtly political (i.e. ideological and military) nature. Ameri-
can formal imperialism, by contrast, represented a tactical
modification, which never repudiated but rather exalted the
informal imperialist vocation which had characterized the
USA since the beginning of the 20th century. Its financial,
military and ideological dominion was actually oriented in the
immediate post-war period towards the reconstruction of
the economic unity of the Free World, as the sole long-term
guarantee of the reproduction of American hegemony.
With the Bretton Woods Agreement, the various national
currencies once again became convertible into a universally
accepted monetary measure on the basis of a gold-dollar-
standard, that is, a gold standard mediated by the dollar. The
Marshall Plan and other forms of aid, token of the role of the
US federal government as a state above states (i.e. an imperial
state), effected a considerable redistribution of monetary and
financial resources from the United States to Europe between
1946 and 1958, by means of which the major national currencies
became more and more freely convertible — with respect not
only to current payments but also to capital accounts.
In the general process of commercial liberalization, priority
was given to intra-European trade, which by 1956 was free of
all quantitative limits. Subsequently, while two broad free-
trade areas emerged in Europe with US support (the EEC in
1957, EFTA in 1959), the member-countries of which pledged
themselves to abolish tariff restrictions, the elimination of
physical quotas was extended to trade between Europe and the
dollar zone. Finally, in 1962, the so-called Dillon Round was
successfully concluded with a 20% reduction in customs duties
on industrial products; further negotiations (the Kennedy
Round) centred on the reduction of US customs duties in ex-
change for greater liberalization of European agricultural
imports.
Over the following decade, as has already been said, the main-102
tenance by the USA of a formal-imperialist hierarchy aroused
nationalist reactions within Europe itself, endangering what
economic unification had actually been achieved in the Free
World. Resistance to liberalization of EEC agricultural im-
ports stalled the Kennedy Round for a good four years; there
was growing opposition to extension of the EEC to the coun-
tries of North-Western Europe, advocated by the USA. Instead,
the Community accepted the association of ex-colonial (or, at
any rate, peripheral) countries of Africa and the Mediterranean
basin, in a manner which discriminated in practice against the
other metropolitan countries of the Free World. Above all, the
dollar’s function as an international monetary measure —
acquired as a result of the Bretton Woods Agreement — was
subjected to renewed discussion and then openly contested.
However, the economic unification of the Western world was
henceforth an established reality, which transcended the
political will of nation-states. This was particularly evident in
the currency realm. At the end of 1967, after four years of nego-
tions within the Group of Ten over the creation of a new and
really international monetary instrument to supersede both
the dollar and gold, an agreement was finally reached on
Special Drawing Rights (SDRs). The 'impersonal laws’ of the
market thereafter asserted themselves'with a vengeance. The
attempts of nation-states to regain control over liquidity at a
national and international level — either through imposing
further restrictions on international trade, or through limiting
the convertibility of their own currencies, or through com-
petitive raising of interest rates — now merely resulted in a fur-
ther expansion of the margin of national and international
liquidity which escaped their control.
Only by accepting the 'laws’ of the market and by sub-
ordinating its own economic policy to them, could the United
States of America reassert its hegemony over Europe and extend
it to the rest of the world. Of major importance in this process
were the official devaluation of the dollar against gold in 1971;
the inauguration of the system of flexible exchange rates; and
the withdrawal of troops from Vietnam. The United States
thereby freed itself from the shackles of formal imperialism,The Reduplication 103
which had ended by cramping its military and financial
supremacy, in order to exercise its hegemony through market
forces. Therewith the Pax Americana has entered a second
phase, in which the relationship between hegemonic nation-
state and the world market is reversed: whereas in the first
twenty years after the Second World War American hegemony
was the agency whereby the unity of the world market was,
albeit partially, reconstituted, during the last decade this unity
has been, and still is today, the medium of the reassertion of US
world hegemony.
In the 70’s, then, we have re-entered a phase of informal
imperialism which is, so to speak, the double of 19th-century
British informal imperialism. In order to avoid ambiguity, it is
as well to anticipate a substantive difference between the Pax
Americana of today and the Pax Britannica of the last century.
Although both cases involve an informal empire, which may be
designated by the ensemble I3, the specific characteristic of the
contemporary phenomenon is not free trade but free enterprise.
As a matter of fact, we have already noted (§10) that US
policy was never rigidly free-tradist. Even though the 30’s wit-
nessed an inversion of the roles of England and America - the
former giving up every inclination for free trade, the latter
moderating its protectionist ideology — the United States never
became a free-trade power in the sense that England had been
one at the height of its hegemony. As Michael Barratt Brown
among others has pointed out, although the United States
assumed the role of a great free-market power, tending to
eliminate areas of exploitation to which one power had exclu-
sive access, it never actually applied free-trade principles to its
own national market.60 Even in the 60’s, first with the Dillon
Round then with the Kennedy Round, the United States en-
tered into negotiations to liberalize its foreign trade, but did not
take unilateral measures such as England had done in the
1840’s when it repealed the Corn Laws and the Navigation Acts.
The dominant preoccupation of US foreign policy, above all
since the Second World War, has been to guarantee the freest
6° Barratt Brown, op. cit. (1963), pp. 205—6.104
possible international circulation of both commodities and
entrepreneurial activity. Of course, as we shall see in the next
chapter, once free international circulation of entrepreneurial
activity reaches a given threshold, it needs a certain degree of
free trade. But the relationship between the two 'freedoms’ is
not a rigid one, and the development of international circula-
tion of entrepreneurial activity may be, and in fact has been,
furthered by protectionist measures of one kind or another
(9'22)-
In any case, the empire of free enterprise corresponds, like
that of free trade, to the essential characteristics of Hobson’s
image of informal internationalism/imperialism. Quite apart
from the fact that, in the medium to long term, free international
circulation of entrepreneurial activity develops solid bases for
free trade, it promotes in the short term, to a much greater
extent than free trade, that expansion through the 'crossing’ of
various nationalities, and that strengthening of their economic
interdependence and cultural homogeneity, which Hobson
regarded as the very essence of internationalism (§5).
17. In little mOre than half a century (from the outbreak of the
First World War to the end of the 60’s) the significance of im-
perialism has thus 'traversed’ a conceptual space (1, +13), the
passage of which had in other times (from the passing of the
Navigation Acts to the 1820’s) taken more than a century and a
half. For slightly less than a decade, then, imperialism has been
gradually reassuming the guise of informal imperialism (I3);
and given the speed at which events now seem to unfold, it is
tempting to conclude that we are now rapidly heading for a
new phase of imperialism — in the specific sense (I4) that Hobson
attached to the term — destined in its turn to result in a period of
world-wide anarchy and war.
It is no accident that recent years have witnessed a revival,
at times critical and at times apologetic, of early 20th-century
theories of imperialism. In its most fanciful form, the re-
duplication of Hobson’s and Lenin’s theory of imperialism pre-
dicts the approach of the fateful ‘1984’, described by George
Orwell in the novel of the same name. Thus, Samir Amin, in aThe Reduplication 105
recent work, has argued that the centralization of capital 'will
abolish the modalities of competition that we still know - i.e.,
monopolistic competition — in order toreplace them by direct
conflict between states. The phenomenon already discernible
and described as the military-monopoly complex would become
essential to economic life.’61
The projection is usually associated with the decline of US
world supremacy and the rise of a certain Soviet hegemony
('In 1984 . . . we shall be drawing closer to the Soviet mode’) — an
outlook which conflicts with the apparent recovery of the
United States after the crisis of the late 60’s. Amin does not
actually deny that American hegemony has recently been re-
affirmed; but he attributes a purely contingent significance to
this, linked to the weakness of those who called it into question:
\
The successes achieved by the United States . . . in the last few
months, both in the Near East and in Europe, should not give rise
to any illusions. Neither Gaullism in Europe, nor Nasserism in the
Near East represented a serious challenge to the US hegemony
over the world system of the last twenty-five years; they were only
the first signs of such a challenge, significant at the level of verbal
declarations, but insignificant in actuality..The American successes
therefore testify more to the weakness and inconsistency of these
verbal adversaries than to the real power of the United States. We
are convinced that inter-imperialist contradictions will sharpen in
the future and that, for this reason, the present international order
is doomed.62
According to this picture, as American hegemony declines, so
will international rivalry grow more acute and shift once
again from the level of economic relations among firms of
different nationalities to that of political relations among
states. The imperialism of the hegemonic power will come to
assume the significance L, and the 'circle’ S+ —> N+ —> S‘ —> N’
will for the second time close at the point of convergence 8*.
This view seems to me rather hurried. Not that I could rule
out the eventuality that the system will move, in the next ten or
6‘ S. Amin. 'Une crise structurelle’, in Amin et al., La Crise de l’Imperialisme,
Paris 1975, pp. 25—6.
“2 Ibid., pp. 32—3.106
twenty years, towards a period of politicization of international
relations, heading in the direction of anarchy in inter-state
relations and a new world war. On the contrary, that is cer-
tainly possible — and, if we are sufficiently determined, we may
also find harbingers of this trend among everyday events. But
if we simply take into account the major processes of our age —
those which are often neglected precisely because of their
general character — and if we attempt to order them by means
of the grid we have been elaborating, then we shall soon realize ‘
that imperialism is for the moment firmly 'anchored’ in the
significance 13.63
Among these crucial processes, the most important seems to
be one mentioned a number of times in previous sections:
namely, the renewed domination of so-called market forces
over the international system. Beginning in 1968, the year of
the uncontrolled explosion of the monetary crisis, the market
has reasserted itself as the necessary mediation of interestate
relations, thus marking a 180° turn in comparison with the
30’s, when every form of international circulation of money,
goods and capital required the mediation of inter-state rela-
tions, which were mostly bilateral. In the last few years it has
been precisely by exploiting the mediation of the market and
adapting it to their own needs that certain nation-states have
strengthened themselves at the expense of others: not only the
USA, which has reinforced its hegemonic position by largely
marginalizing the Soviet Union in the Third World; but also
West Germany, which seems to be taking its revenge on Eng-
land, the great free-trade power that obstructed Teutonic
aspirations to European hegemony at the beginning of 'the
century; and, above all, that dense cluster of nation-states
which, endowed with reserves of industrial raw materials, now
seeks to supplant their one-time 'colonizers’ in economic and
political power.
This all-round convulsion of the relationship of forces
between states is itself conducive to the development of ten-
sions in those areas where nationalism has a weak political
63 The advent of the 'Carter era’ seems to confirm our evaluation.The Reduplication 107
base, and inter-state conflict may thus play an important role
in forging the internal cohesion of new nations. The wars
issuing from such Clashes belong, however, not to the processes
of imperialism, but to those of nationalism. In the same way as
the golden age of the informal empire of free trade was, in cer-
tain areas, dominated by wars of unification and national
independence (in Germany and Italy, as well as in America
during the Civil War) so it is quite likely that the golden age of
the informal empire of free enterprise will continue to be
dominated, in areas such as Africa and the Arab world, by wars
for the consolidation or formation of new national units.
The search in every case of local warfare for a clash ‘by proxy’
between opposing empires may serve a political purpose, but it
seems to me to have very limited scientific validity. These wars
are rather an expression of the progressive disintegration
(S— —+ NS) of the hierarchical inter-state structures which
characterized the world system for over twenty years; and in all
probability their effects will tend to converge with the con-
solidation of the informal empire of free enterprise inscribed in
the policy of the hegemonic power (8' —> N‘).
18. Paraphrasing Hegel, Marx remarked that all the great
events and personages of world history occur, so to speak,
twice: the first time as tragedy, the second as farce.64 It may
be true that Nazi-fascist imperialism was a parody — or, if it
is preferred, a ghost — of English nationalist imperialism; that
Soviet internationalism was a caricature of Napoleonic inter-
nationalism; and that the current Pax Americana parodies the
Pax Britannica. So far as the present analysis is concerned, it is
enough to have shown that a certain analogy can be estab-
lished between the first three phases of English imperialism
distinguished in the last chapter, and the three phases which
imperialism has passed through during the last sixty years.
Once English world hegemony had declined for ever, imperial-
ism again assumed successively a formal and informal national-
“ K. Marx, 'The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte’, in Surveys from
Exile, Pelican/NLR, London 1973, p. 146.108
ist cast. History would thereafter seem to have confirmed the
judgment implicit in Hobson’s grid, according to which the
imperialism of the powers emerging at the end of the last cen-
tury would issue, in the last analysis, into an 'internationalism’
(§13).
It remains to be seen whether the position 13, currently
occupied by US imperialism, will somehow become 'stable’, or
whether the reduplication of English imperialism will move
inexorably towards the conclusion 14. The question may be
posed in a different way: is Hobson’s concept of imperialism
(that is, precisely 14) of purely historiographical interest, or
may it rather gain fresh topicality in the future?
In order to solve this problem, we must make quite clear the
limits of the analogical exercise which allowed us to discern a
reduplication of the English imperialism of bygone times in the
expansionist tendencies of the last sixty years. First, it is evi-
dent that the analogies are somewhat forced. It is as if we had
asked ourselves: given that imperialism has these four mean-
ings, and these alone, which corresponds best to the charac-
teristic tendencies of this or that epoch? Restricted in this way,
we were virtually compelled to make the choice we did and to
attach the same significance to ensembles of tendencies which
are, in many respects, extremely diverse. The purpose of the
undertaking was to show that when we speak today of im-
perialism, referring to the major processes of our epoch, we are
talking of something completely different from the object of
Hobson’s discourse — and antithetical to that of Lenin. ‘
However, by ascribing an identical significance to different
ensembles, the operation has inevitably cancelled the differen-
ces between them. Some of these have already been mentioned
in the course of the exposition — for example, the distinction
between the two colonial revolutions which closed the two
phases of nationalist imperialism (§14) or that between the
'content’ (free trade or free enterprise) of the two phases of
informal imperialism (§16). It is almost as if our grid were
incapable of clarifying simultaneously the images of the first and
the second cycle of imperialism; and since we defined the grid
with reference to the characteristic tendencies of the firstThe Reduplication 109
cycle (that of English hegemony) the images which relate to the
second emerge a little blurred.
In reality, Hobson’s grid has certain very precise temporal
limits. In order to grasp these, it suffices to point out that the
grid, defined as the ensemble of expansionist tendencies of the
nation-state, has no meaning before the rise of English world
hegemony. Since its (analytical) origin lies in the nation-state
(NS) it is in no position to represent either the imperialism of
ancient Rome, for example, or even that of Holland in the first
half of the 17th century: only with the English Navigation
Acts did the nation-state become a dominant force on the world
arena and only two hundred years later did it become the basic
'cell’ of the international system. '
The grid is at one and the same time the image and the ‘pro-
duct’ of the historical process which structured the world in
nation-states: it has no existence apart from the tendencies it
seeks to represent. Hobson, who was active as a theoretician
at the close of the first cycle of imperialism, could define the
grid and thereby demonstrate the meaning of events at that
historical moment; and it is only in relation to that precise
point in time that the grid is in perfect 'focus’. Any attempt to
project it backwards or forwards cannot but produce images
which are to some extent blurred: before that point, the nation-
state, which was the analytical origin of the representation,
had not yet been fully constituted as the cell of the inter-
national system; while later, the cell itself underwent altera-
tions which are reflected in the object of the representation.
These were complex mutations, investigation of which is
beyond the scope of this essay. Their nature may, however, be
surmised by comparing the 'imperial dualism’ characteristic of
the first cycle of imperialism with that which has marked the
second cycle. In both instances, a given power (France in the
first, the USSR in the second), unable to attain a position of
absolute hegemony, attempted to oppose a more strictly politi-
cal empire of a continental character to the universalistic
tendency of the imperialism of the hegemonic power (England
and the United States, respectively). But whereas in the former
case France and England were true and proper nation-states,110
in the latter case, the USA and the USSR are nation-states with
quite novel and specific features. The difference lies not only in
their continental dimension, but also in the fact that the
'internalization’ of territorial expansionism produced, on the
one hand, a nation structured in a plurality of states, the
United States of America, and on the other hand, a multi-
national state in the USSR. In both countries, the coincidence
of state and nation, which lies at the origin of Hobson’s grid, is
much fainter than it was in France or England. What is the
significance of this change, which has been intentionally dis-
regarded in our schema of the reduplication of English im-
perialism? Could it not imply that the second cycle of imperial-
ism converges at N“ as well as at 9‘, or, worse still, that the
whole representation based on the expansion of NS loses
significance, that is, relevance?
The current crisis of the nation-state, which is manifested
both in the tendency to multinational and/or multistate
aggregations and in the parallel process of internal decomposi-
tion of nation-states into ethnically more or less homogeneous
regional entities, does indeed tend to diminish the significance
of the above representation, and thus of any attempt to predict
future trends on the basis of it. But quite apart from this, it is
necessary to keep in mind a third limit of Hobson’s grid, such
as we have so far represented it — namely, its two-dimensional
character.
The circular and repetitive movement attributed to expan-
sionist phenomena actually depends on the assumption of a
two-dimensional space with which to represent them. If we
confined ourselves to a single dimension, the movement would
be linear in type (§6): S‘ -> S —> S+ could thus indicate the
tendency of state expansionism to pass from a factor of order
and peace into a factor of anarchy and war; and N+ —> N —> N" ,
the tendency of the expansionism of peoples and nations to
change, according to Schumpeter’s picture,65 from an anta-
gonistic phenomenon into a non-antagonistic one, at least at
65 For Schumpeter, imperialism is an irrationalist residue from the past,
which tends to disappear with the progressive rationalization of peoples’ wayThe Reduplication 111
the level of political relations. Evidently, if we introduced a
third dimension, the movement would no longer be either linear
or circular, but would assume a form corresponding to the
nature of this third dimension. Any judgment on the actual
convergence of the tendencies will therefore have to await a
three-dimensional redefinition of them. This is what we shall
undertake in the next chapter.
of life and thinking: 'We must expect to see [the imperialist] impulse, which rests
on the primitive contingencies of physical combat, gradually disappear, washed
away by new exigencies of daily life . . . The competitive system absorbs the full
energies of most of the people at all economic levels. Constant application,
attention, and concentration of energy are the conditions of survival within
it . . . There is much less excess energy to be vented in war and conquest than in
any precapitalist society.’ Op. cit., p. 69.4.
The Dissolution
From Finance Capital
to Multinational Enterprises
19. At this point, the reader may ask the reason for our delay
in introducing that association between imperialism and
capitalism which, after all, constitutes the kernel of Hobson’s
Study. In fact, we have so far been concerned to explain what
was for Hobson so obvious that it could be passed over in
silence or condensed into a few introductory pages and scat-
tered remarks. But now that the conceptual grid within which
Hobson reasoned has been explicated, we are in a position to
summarize his economic analysis without serious risk of being
misunderstood.- ‘
It should be noted at the outset that the representation of
capitalism cannot be reduced to the space defined by the various
forms of expansion of the nation-state. Capitalist phenomena
have since their origin had a supranational character which
cannot be designated by any of the arrows or arcs defined so
far. These arrows and arcs can at the most denote phenomena
of a mercantile nature which form part of, but by no means
exhaust, the ensemble of capitalist processes.
There is, in fact, a substantive identity between the tendency
towards a single world market and the rise of the nation-state
to the position of a dominant reality of the international system.
Thus, an eminent academic of the Bismarck era, Schmoller,
could assert that mercantilism 'in its inmost kernel is nothing
but state-making — not state-making in a narrow sense, but
state-making and national-economy-making at the same
time’.‘56 More recently, Immanuel Wallerstein has argued that:
‘56 Quoted in C. Wilson, Mercantilism, London 1958, p. 6.
112The Dissolution 113
Capital has never allowed its aspirations to be determined by
national boundaries in a capitalist world-economy, and . . . the
creation of 'national’ barriers — generically, mercantilism — has
historically been a defensive mechanism of capitalists located in
states which are one level below the high point of strength in the
system. Such was the case of England vis-c‘t-vis the Netherlands in
1660—1715, France vis-(‘z-vis Britain in 1715—1815, Germany vis-c‘z-vis
Britain in the nineteenth century, the Soviet Union vis-c‘z-vis the
US in the twentieth. In the process a large number of countries
create national economic barriers whose consequences often last
beyond their initial objectives. At this later point in the process the
very same capitalists who pressed their national governments to
impose the restrictions now find these restrictions constraining?
It is obviously difl‘icult to represent this vision in the terms
defined by Hobson’s grid. But if we bear in mind the association
established above (§10) between nationalism and protection-
ism, it is possible to reinterpret the diagram of Fig. 8 in terms of
tendencies towards the break-up and recomposition of the unity
of the world market. Thus, the arcs S+ —> N+, N+ —> S’, S‘ —> N‘,
and N‘ —> S+ could represent the tendency of the hegemonic
power to pass from one form to another of integration of the
world market (or to vary the form according to the concrete
situation); the arrows N+ —-> NS and S- ——» NS, the tendencies
generated in peripheral or semi-peripheral countries to separate
off national markets for relative protection from foreign mar-
ket competition; and lastly, the arrows NS —> N" and NS —> S+
could represent the tendency of these countries to outgrow the
dimensions of the national market, whether by openly accept-
ing competition on the world market or by encompassing other
peoples and nations within the protective barriers erected by
the state.
Below (§22) we shall make more precise the possibility of
such isomorphism between the plane defined by expansion of
the nation-state and that defined by expansion of commodity-
capital. For the moment, we will seek to show that for Hobson
67 I. Wallerstein, 'The Rise and Future Demise of the World Capitalist
System: Concepts for Comparative Analysis’, Comparative Studies in Society
and History, XVI, 4, September 1974, p. 402.114
the dimension 'capitalism’ is not reducible to the level of mar-
ket relations, nor even to the plane defined by expansion of the
nation-state. For this purpose, it will suflice to examine briefly
his explicit theory of imperialism, that is to say, the nature of
the tendencies to which he attributed the transformation of
England from a free-trade power to an imperialist power tout
court. _
Hobson ruled out from the start the possibility that such a
transformation corresponded to the interests of the nation as
a whole:
A completely socialist State which kept good books and presented
regular balance-sheets of expenditure and assets would soon dis-
card Imperialism; an intelligent laissez-faire democracy which gave
duly proportionate weight in its policy to all economic interests
alike would do the same."8
Of course, the fact that imperialism was a bad business for the
nation did not mean that it could not be very good business for
certain groups within it. Among these groups Hobson‘mentions
in the first place the producers of armaments and means of mari-
time transport, shipping companies and other rather un-
competitive sectors of export industry."9
Dealing next with the necessarily protectionist effects of
imperialism, Hobson also speaks of the support which such a
policy could obtain from all those productive sectors that felt
threatened by growing foreign competition.70 These sectors,
however, were not actively imperialist and, with the aim of
strengthening their medium-term competitiveness, they could
well have supported a policy of intensive development of the
nation, of the kind envisaged by Hobson (cf. §12).
It would seem then that, in Hobson’s view of things, the
general interest of the nation indubitably lay with free trade;
but that particular interests, endowed with higher 'specific
weight’ because of the greater concentration and cohesion of
6” Hobson, op. cit., p. 47.
69 Ibid., pp. 47—50.
7° Ibid., pp. 102—5.The Dissolution 115
the groups which were their bearers, could thwart a choice
between free trade and imperialism. The resultant political
indeterminacy corresponds to the indeterminacy of Hobson’s
judgment on the nature of nationalism (§6); and it may thus also
be designated by the divarication of NS —+ N’ and NS —+ S+ —
that is, the circumstance that the internal economic forces of
the nation-state generate divergent tendencies: one towards
free trade, the other towards imperialism. It is true that the
worsening of the competitive position of such forces on the
world market would tend to draw the compass-needle towards
8*. Yet such a deterioration was not an inevitable fact: it
depended upon which of the two paths had been entered by the
nation-state. If it set out to develop intensively the resources
of the nation, the competitive sectors of the economy — and with
them the free-trade tendencies — would be strengthened as a
result; but if it took the course of squandering resources by
competing with other states in territorial expansion and
armaments, then the competitiveness of the national economy
would decline and the tendency to imperialism increase.
But which of the forces internal to the nation corresponds to
the arc N’ —> S+ , which in previous representations determined
the convergence of the system at S+ ? The answer would seem to
be: that heterogeneous ensemble of forces which Hobson
defined as ‘imperialist by conviction and by professional
interest’,71 in other words those sectors of the unproductive
middle classes for whom the new imperialism opened up broad
and prestigious vistas — professional soldiers, explorers, adven-
turers, missionaries, colonial administrators, and in general
all those who had a material as well as ideal interest in the world
hegemony of their own mother-country. For Hobson, however,
these forces provided only 'the motor-power’ of imperialism.
Left to themselves, they were in no position to impress a clear
direction on state policy: 'The enthusiasm for expansion which
issues from these sources, though strong and genuine, is irregu-
lar and blind.’ The 'imperial engine’ needed a governor to direct
its operation.72
7‘ Ibid., p. 50.
72 Ibid., p. 59.116' The Dissolution
20. For Hobson, then, it was not the economic and social forces
considered so far which determined the direction of contem-
porary change. It was rather an ensemble of forces which he
variously designated by the terms: finance, money-lending
classes, financial plutocracy, and so on, and which we shall
term, according to current usage, finance capital or finance
capitalism.
In defining this ensemble of forces Hobson, even before he
mentions his well-known theory of underconsumption, speaks
of another tendency which some of his rather careless critics,
such as Emmanuel, have accused him of ignoring:73
It appears that the period of energetic Imperialism coincided with
a remarkable growth in the income for foreign investment. . . . To a
larger extent every year Great Britain has been becoming a nation
living upon tribute from abroad, and classes who enjoy this tribute
have had an ever-increasing incentive to employ the public policy,
the public purse, and the public force to extend the field of their
private investments, and to safeguard and improve their existing
investments.74
This group of 'investors’, who absorbed the rising flow of
dividends and interest on funds invested abroad, constitute the
first component of Hobson’s concept of Finance Capital. How-
ever, as was the case with the economic and social forces just
examined, such investors lacked the concentration and unity
of purpose necessary to impose a direction on imperialist
trends. Both politically and economically, they in general
formed only 'the cat’s-paws of the great financial houses, who
use stocks and shares not so much as investments to yield them
interest, but as material for speculation in the money market’.75
These great finance houses, which we shall term high finance,
represent the second component of finance capital, to which
Hobson attributed the role of 'governor of the imperial engine’.
They had all the qualities required to manipulate the political
life of nations:
73 A. Emmanuel, op. cit.
7‘ Hobson, op. cit., pp. 52—4.
75 Ibid., p. 56.The Dissolution 11 7
These great businesses — banking, broking, bill-discounting, loan-
floating, company-promoting — form the central ganglion of inter-
national capitalism. United by the strongest bands of organisation,
always in closest and quickest touch with one another, situated in
the very heart of the business capital of every State, controlled, so
far as Europe is concerned, chiefly by men of a single and peculiar
race, who have behind them many centuries of financial experience,
they are in a unique position to manipulate the policy of nations. . . .
(sic). These men, holding their realised wealth and their business
capital, as they must, chiefly in stocks and bonds, have a double
stake, first as investors, but secondly and chiefly as financial dealers.
As investors, their political influence does not differ essentially from
that of the smaller investors, except that they usually possess a prac-
tical control of the businesses in which they invest. As speculators or
financial dealers they constitute, however, the gravest single factor
in the economics of Imperialism. To create new public debts, to float
new companies and cause constant considerable fluctuations of
values are three conditions of their profitable business. Each con-
dition carries them into politics and throws them on the side of
imperialism.76
In Hobson’s view, then, high finance presents two main charac-
teristics. In the first place, it is a supranational entity lying out-
side the plane defined by the expansion of the nation-state.
Secondly, while not belonging to this plane, it nevertheless
influences it in a critical manner. For in so far as it is a specula-
tive intermediary on the monetary market, high finance tends to
transform the excess liquidity present on the market into
demand for new investment opportunities, that is, principally
for state loans and territorial expansion.
A diagrammatic representation may assist an understanding
of Hobson’s concept of finance capital. In Fig. 12, this concept
is designated by the ensemble N‘ —> F, F —> Sr and NS —> F,
linking the plane defined by the expansion of NS to the point F
(finance capital). The first two arrows of this ensemble corres-
pond to the two components of finance capital which we have
already defined. N’ —’ F designates the tendency of excess
liquidity formation, resulting from the inflow of profits and
dividends on money-capital invested abroad. Its origin at N-
76 Ibid., pp. 56-7. Emphasis added.118
signifies that the tendency in question was based upon the
hegemonic position occupied by England within the informal
empire of free trade, while its 'divergence’ from the plane
defined by the expansion of the nation-state signifies that it
nurtured, both economically and politically, the supranational
entity of high finance. The arrow F —> S“ designates precisely
the characteristic tendency of this second component of finance
capital — that is, the tendency of high finance to press for terri-
torial expansion by the state as a way of opening up new areas
of financial intermediation and speculation, whether through
investment of money-capital outside the national boundaries,
or through financing of the public debt of the expansionist
nation-state.
Fig. 12 F


NS A?;/8*
N-—-+"
Before we consider the third component of finance capital
(that designated by NS —> F in Fig. 12) we should underline the
significance which the arc N’ —> 8* comes to assume in this
new representation. In the analysis developed in previous
chapters, this are designated the policy of the hegemonic
power, which played a determining role in the convergence of
the international system at 8*. In the analysis developed in the
last section, however, it designated those social forces, 'im-
perialist by conviction and by profession’, to which Hobson did
not attribute a determining role in shifting the internal
equilibria of the nation-state in the direction of an imperialist
policy, in the strict sense of the term. That is why, in Fig. 12, theThe Dissolution 11.9
arc in question has been represented by means of a broken,
rather than continuous, line. It thereby indicates the fact that,
in Hobson’s conception, English world hegemony did no more
than reflect the domination of finance capital over mercantile
capital — or money-capital over commodity-capital; that, in
other words, the direction assumed by the imperialist social
forces of the nation was simply a reflection of the tendencies
proper to finance capital; and, in the final instance, that
N‘ —’ S+ was a reflection, on the plane defined by the expan-
sion of NS, of the trajectory N" —> F —+ 8*.
Figure 12 also brings out the 'centrality’ of the third com-
ponent of finance capital (considered as an ensemble of ten-
dencies dominating the plane defined by the expansion of NS,
although not belonging to it) — the component designated by
NS —> F. It seems to me that NS —> F should designate that
tendency to underconsumption, overproduction or excess
savings (terms used interchangeably by Hobson) which he
takes to be the 'tap-root’ of imperialism.
Hobson defined this tendency with the help of concepts that
were to become commonplace forty years later:
All saving for investment does not imply slackness of production;
quite the contrary. Saving is economically justified, from the social
standpoint, when the capital in which it takes material shape finds
full employment in helping to produce commodities which, when
produced, will be consumed. It is saving in excess of this amount
that causes mischief, taking shape in surplus capital which is not
needed to assist current consumption, and which either lies idle, or
tries to oust existing capital from its employment, or else seeks
speculative use abroad under the protection of the Government.77
Thus, the excess liquidity which provided the economic and
political sustenance of high finance did not originate solely, or
even principally, in the inflow of interest and dividends on
money-capital invested abroad. Of much greater importance
was the very manner in which wealth was produced and dis-
tributed within the nation:
77 Ibid., p. 82.120
If a tendency to distribute income or consuming power according
to needs were operative, it is evident that consumption would rise
with every rise of producing power, for human needs are illimitable,
and there could be no excess of saving. But it is quite otherwise in a
state of economic society where distribution has no fixed relation
to needs, but is determined by other conditions which assign to
some people a consuming power vastly in excess of needs or possible
uses, while others are destitute of consuming power enough to
satisfy even the full demands of physical efficiency.78
The character of these 'other conditions’ is straightaway
clarified when Hobson, quoting The Significance of the Trust
by H. G. Wilshire, explains the inelasticity of consumption
relative to the social product by reference to the fact that com-
petition among labourers tends to keep wages tied to the cost
of living, preventing them from rising at the same rate as pro-
ductivity. From this he concludes:
It is not industrial progress that demands the opening up of new
markets and areas of investment, but mal-distribution of consuming
power which prevents the absorption of commodities and capital
within the country. The over-saving which is the economic root of
Imperialism is found by analysis to consist of rents, monopoly
profits, and other excessive elements of income, which, not being
earned by labour of head or hand, have no legitimate raison d’étre.
. . . They form a surplus wealth, which, having no proper place in
the normal economy of production and consumption, tends to
accumulate as excessive savings. Let any turn in the tide of politico-
economic forces divert from these owners their excess of income
and make it flow, either to the workers in higher wages, or to the
community in taxes, so that it will be spent instead of being saved,
serving in either of these ways to swell the tide of consumption —
there will be no need to fight for foreign markets or foreign areas of
investment.79
For Hobson, then, a reversal of the tendency to underconsump-
tion would be enough to restrain any trend for England to
become transformed from a free-trade power into an imperialist
one tout court. In the terms of the diagram of Fig. 12, the direc-
78 Ibid., p. 83.
79 Ibid., pp. 85—6.The Dissolution 121
tion of the arrow NS —» F would have only to be reversed to
weaken the 'circuit’ N" —> F —> 8*, of which N’ -+ S+ is simply
a reflection on the plane defined by the expansion of the nation-
state. As we shall see in a moment, it was not long before such a
reversal was accomplished in reality — not at the tempo or in
the mode envisaged by Hobson, but through just those events
that he sought to avoid.
21. Our task is now to show how, in the first half of this cen-
tury, the thirty-year period of world-wide anarchy and war
produced an irreversible mutation in that ensemble of tenden-
cies with reference to which Hobson defined the imperialism of
his epoch. But we should first extend the three-dimensional
representation beyond the quadrant I4 (to which we tem-
porarily limited it) to cover the whole plane defined by the
expansion of the nation-state. With this purpose in mind, we
shall take as our starting-point an image of high finance which
is in certain respects identical, and in others opposite, to that
of Hobson.
I am referring to Polanyi’s authoritative account which
stresses, like Hobson’s Study, the supranational character of
high finance, but at the same time defines it as the principal
factor of peace operating among the great powers in the second
half of the 19th century:
The Concert of Europe, which succeeded [the Holy Alliance] lacked
the feudal as well as the clerical tentacles. . . . And yet what the
Holy Alliance, with its complete unity of thought and purpose,
could achieve in Europe only with the help of frequent armed inter~
ventions was here accomplished on a world scale by the shadowy
entity called the Concert of Europe with the help of a very much
less frequent and oppressive use of force. For an explanation of this
amazing feat, we must seek for some undisclosed powerful social
instrumentality at work in the new setting, which could play the
role of dynasties and episcopacies under the old and make the peace
interest effective. This anonymous factor was haute finance. . . .
Both the personnel and the motives of this singular body invested
it with a status the roots of which were securely grounded in the
private sphere of strictly business interest. The Rothschilds were
subject to no one government; as a family they embodied the122
abstract principle of internationalism; their loyalty was to a firm,
the credit of which had become the only supranational link between
political government and industrial effort in a swiftly growing
world economy. In the last resort, their independence sprang from
the needs of the time which demanded a sovereign agent command-
ing the confidence of national statesmen and of the international
investors alike; it was to this vital need that the metaphysical
extraterritoriality of a Jewish bankers’ dynasty domiciled in the
capitals of Europe provided an almost perfect solution. They were
anything but pacifist; they had made their fortune in the financing
of wars; they were impervious to moral consideration; they had no
objection to any number of minor, short, or localized wars. But their
business would be impaired if a general war between the Great
Powers should interfere with the monetary foundations of the
system. By the logic of fact it fell to them to maintain the requisites
of general peace in the midst of the revolutionary transformation to
which the peoples of the planet were subject.80
Although this assessment of high finance is diametrically
opposed to that of Hobson, their incompatibility is less radical
than it may appear at first sight. Hobson himself acknowledged
that the policies of high finance did not, in each and every
situation, point in the direction of war, and even that 'where
war would bring about too great and too permanent a damage
to the substantial fabric of industry, which is the ultimate and
essential basis of speculation, their influence is cast for
peace’.81 Polanyi, for his part, acknowledged that high finance
was compelled by the nature of its activities 'to tie itself to
those governments whose objective was power and conquest’82
— an objective which inevitably aroused rivalry among states.
In reality, the contradiction between these two points of
view reflected an effective contradiction within high finance
itself. As an embodiment of money-capital, high finance had no
specific competitive position of its own, and it thus depended on
expansion of the political power of one or more states beyond
their national boundaries — both in order to protect its past
investments and to create new opportunities for financial
8° Polanyi, op. cit., pp. 9—11.
3‘ Hobson, op. cit., p. 58.
82 Polanyi, op. cit., p. 11.The Dissolution 123
intermediation and speculation. At the same time, however, it
had to try to prevent the inter-state rivalry fuelled by such
expansion from resulting in a world war and therewith in the
evaporation of its own patrimonial assets.
In Fig. 13, which extends the dimension 'finance capital’ to
the whole plane defined by the expansion of the nation-state,
we designate by means of the two arrows F —> S+ and F —> 8‘
this tendency of high finance to promote expansion of the
political power of one or more states beyond their national
boundaries. Compared with the representation of Fig. 12, this
has the advantage of demonstrating how the tendencies activa-
ted by high finance produce an effect of war or peace, according
to the international situation in which they are inserted. Thus,
in the circumstances prevailing in the early 19th century, the
tendency of high finance to sustain English formal imperialism
contributed to the realization of a hierarchical order among
states serving to foster universal peace (F -> S— ); in the context
marking the end of the century, the same tendency came to
assume an altogether opposite significance (F —> 8*) — namely,
that of a tendency towards universal war.
Fig. 13124
Figure 13 further shows that high finance may not only
activate tendencies of opposite significance, but also itself be
furthered by tendencies (N‘ —> F and N+ —’ F) whose matrices
are of opposite significance. We saw in the last section how
N‘ —+ F designates the tendency of high finance to be sus-
tained from the influx of interest and dividends on money-
capital which English investors had placed abroad. The very
existence of this flow evidently depended upon the achievement
of a wide sphere of freedom for the international circulation of
money, goods and capital; indeed, that is why we have designa-
ted the tendency in question by means of an arrow 'originating’
at N". The arrow N+ —> F which is now introduced designates
instead the tendency of high finance to be sustained by money
flows, just as ‘parasitic’ as those mentioned above, but with an
opposite mercantile basis — that is, profits 'originating’ in the
monopolistic control exercised by the colonialist nation-state
over the territory and resources of the colonies.83
The limited aims of the present investigation do not allow us
to specify by means of a synchronic-diachronic analysis similar
to that deve10ped in previous chapters, the significance of these
tendencies and of their various combinations in three-dimen-
sional space. For our purposes, two brief specifications will
suffice. It should be noted first of all that, despite Hobson’s
hypothesis, not all transmutations of hegemony may be defined
as 'reflections’ of tendencies proper to finance capital: only the
two arcs drawn in Fig. 13 (i.e., N+ —> S" and N“ —+ 8*) can be
defined in this way — the first as a reflection of N+ —> F —-> S‘,
the second of N” —’ F —+ S“. These two arcs correspond to those
we employed in order to define synchronically the imperialism
of the hegemonic power at the end of the 19th century — that is,
the specific object of Hobson’s study (§7) — which may therefore
33 The connection between monopoly and colonialism was the kernel of
mercantilist theory and practice. As Dobb has pointed out (Studies in the
Development of Capitalism, London 1963, p. 204), this policy 'chiefly depended
for its success on its application to a system of colonial trade, where political
influence could be brought to bear to ensure to the parent country some ele-
ment of monopoly; and it is essentially as applied to the exploitation of a depen-
dent colonial system that mercantilist trade-theories acquired a meaning’.The Dissolution 125
be comprehensively designated by the expression 'finance
imperialism’. Such a definition cannot, however, be given of
the two arcs S+ —> N+ and S’ —* N‘, the specific tendencies of
nationalist imperialism and informal imflerialism.
We shall see shortly that this impossibility can be validated
at the historico-empirical level and that, nevertheless, it does
not prevent us from defining the whole course of English
imperialism within the system represented in Fig. 13. But it is
first necessary to proceed to a second specification. What, we
must ask ourselves, is the significance in a diachronic analysis
of the fact that the three-dimensional spaces of Fig. 13 (1’1, 1’2,
1'3 and 1;) have the arrow NS —» F in common? It naturally does
not mean that the two-and-a-halfcenturies between the passing
of the Navigation Acts and the outbreak of the First World War
were uniformly characterized by a tendency to underconsump-
tion (which is the precise meaning we attached to NS —> F in
section 20). It rather signifies that, beyond cyclical fluctuations
and short-to-medium-term countertendencies, it was in just this
period that an alternation of mechanisms, now compulsory
(political) now spontaneous (economic), transformed the bases
of production and consumption within the hegemonic nation-
state in the direction of capitalism. Whereas in the England of
the first half of the 17th century the vast majority of income
from labour was tied to the progress of productivity, in the
two-and-a-half centuries that followed, a growing proportion of
such income did not advance in step with a sharply rising
productivity, but tended to be equated with 'the cost of living’ -
or, to be more precise, with the reproduction costs of labour-
power.
According to Hobson’s hypothesis, this tendency of itself
possessed strong underconsumptionist implications (§20),
which were then intensified by another long-term trend — that
of the state to pass from a generally inflationary policy, typical
of the late middle ages and the first century of the modern era,
to a generally deflationary policy.“ These considerations sug-
8‘ Mercantilist policies were also, in my opinion, ultimately deflationist,
because of the crucial role they attached to state thesaurization of precious
metals.126'
gest the hypothesis that the tendency to underconsumption
defined by Hobson, while only revealing itself over considerable
periods of time, may in a certain sense be regarded not only as
the 'tap-root’ of late 18th century English imperialism, but also
as the underlying trend of its two-and-a-half centuries of his-
torical development.
However, the 'limit’ of this tendency lay precisely in the
system of tendencies of which it was the specific and principal
feature. In fact, the system represented in Fig. 13 has its point
of convergence at S“ in a state of universal anarchy and war.85
Now, leaving aside the destructive effects of such a state on the
international monetary system, war is the most effective
counter-tendency to underconsumption known in history.
Moreover, the actual attainment of position S+ signifies the
reversal of the direction of NS —> F and, thus a progressive
'dissolution’ of the whole system represented in Fig. 13.
As we shall see in the next section, such a scenario is essen-
tially what occurred in the period encompassing the Two
World Wars — and in such a manner that the end of English
imperialism coincided with the end of the domination of
money-capital cver commodity-capital. The reversal of NS —+ F,
envisaged by Hobson as the antidote to imperialism (§20), was
thereby realized with a quite different tempo and modality:
Hobson expected the reversal to be achieved in time to avert
convergence at 8*, and in such a way that the circuit
N’ —> F —+ 8* would be weakened and the circuit N‘ —> F —>
NS —* N" unleashed; in reality, the reversal took place pre-
cisely by passing through convergence at 8*.
22. The nationalist imperialism of the first half of this century
35 We could of course consider the transition from one form of hegemony to
another as autonomous tendencies, rather than as reflections of tendencies
proper to finance capital. But we should then have to trace the unbroken arcs
S” —> N+, N —> S’, S' —> N" and N' —+ S+ even in the three—dimensional
representation. In that way, an element of overdetermination would be intro-
duced into the system of tendencies represented in Fig. 13, and convergence at
8" would become relative rather than absolute. The argument would thus
become more complex without changing anything of substance in the con-
clusions.The Dissolution 127
can no longer be understood in the terms defined by the en-
semble of tendencies represented by Fig. 13, which we shall
henceforth term 'finance imperialism’. Militarism and war
gave an extraordinary impetus to self-financing of industrial
firms and to public expenditure — a process which spelt the
definitive eclipse of the domination of money-capital over
commodity-capital.
The victory of internal financing over the borrowing from banks,
savings banks, and insurance institutions indicates the decline of
the role of banking capital. That decline is a universal trend and is
as operative in the United States as it is in Germany. This trend
seems to be determined by the decline in the pace of economic
expansion; by the monopolistic and cartel structure, which, by
granting differential rents, facilitates the internal accumulation of
capital; by the growth of institutional investments, government
spending and financing.86
German imperialism, which dominated the period encompas-
sing the two world wars, neither initially possessed nor
ultimately acquired a supranational capitalist dimension: it
functioned entirely on the plane defined by the expansion of
the nation-state, which, as will be recalled (§19), may also
designate the various expansionist tendencies of the national
market.
Since the world market is divided among powerful contending
states, it can no longer be conquered by trade and investment but
only by political means. And since trade between industrial states
is the essence of foreign trade, the political conquest of the world is
and must be the aim of National Socialist Germany if she wants to
survive as a highly industrialized nation. . . . It is the high pro-
ductivity of the industrial apparatus, the pressure for foreign
markets, and the need for satisfying the vital material interests of
her masses that have driven Germany into a policy of conquest and
will continue to drive her to still further expansion until she is
defeated or has fulfilled her aim. It is the dynamics of a fairly young,
aggressive, monopolized country that is the prime mover of Ger-
many’s expansion.87
3" F. Neumann, Behemoth, London 1942, pp. 261—2.
87 Ibid., pp. 275-6.128
German nationalist imperialism, in other words, could in no
way be defined as a 'refiection’ of tendencies mediated by a
supranational entity, such as high finance. It must rather be
represented as the ensemble of tendencies autonomously
generated on the plane of relations between nation-states and
commodity-capitals. Thus, the representation given in sections
13 and 14 has need of no further elaboration, except for a re-
definition of its various component images in terms of the
expansion of commodity-capitals rather than nation-states. In
particular, it is necessary to reconsider the image of 'living
space’, which somewhat mysteriously always recurred among
the principal motivations of nationalist imperialism. The
passage from Neumann just quoted suggests that something
was indeed concealed behind this image: not so much the
abstract goal of territory to ensure the nation’s survival, but
the concrete need for new sources and outlets of production
experienced by a sharply expanding national industry - one
which, as a late-comer, found itself constricted by the narrow
boundaries ofthe nation-state and the already existing interests
of the other national markets.
From this point of view, German nationalist imperialism did
not differ substantively from that which developed in England
two-and-a-half centuries earlier. Then, too, the expansionism
of the young English nation could in no way be defined as a
reflection of tendencies inherent in a supranational entity.
Indeed, the great commercial firms, which were in certain res-
pects the progenitors of high finance, seem to have opposed,
rather than promoted, the development of English nationalism
in an imperialist direction:
The Navigation Act of 1651 represented the victory of a national
trading interest over the separate interests and privileges of the
companies. It was naturally disliked by some members of the old
companies, though the Levant and Eastland Companies favoured
it. It contributed to the victory of the English New Draperies over
their Dutch rivals. The navigation system also benefited England’s
artisans by protecting the home market from Dutch competition
and by increasing colonial and overseas markets, at the same timeThe Dissolution 129
that any colonial industrial development which would compete
with England’s was prohibited.“
The difference between the two cases” consists in the fact that
English imperialism succeeded in converting its own political
hegemony into a financial supremacy tending to become supra-
national: the century of world-wide anarchy and war that
followed the Navigation Acts not only gave England domina-
tion of the seas, but also made it the centre of international
finance, thereby creating the premises of the later phases of
formal and informal imperialism. In the terms of our three-
dimensional grid, this path may be designated, as in Fig. 11, by
means of an arc NS —> N+ (§14) — but with the difference that
the arc now 'releases’ not only the arrow N+ —> NS, but also the
arrow N“ —-> F, which in its turn issues in the tendency designa-
ted by F —> S“ (as indicated in Fig. 14).90
Owing to the different historical situation in which it
emerged, the nationalist imperialism of Germany did not release
any tendency to supranationality from its own capitalist dimen-
sion. Far from evolving in a supranational direction, German
finance capitalism was subordinated to, and subsumed under,
the nation-state and industrial capital. In other words, National-
Socialist imperialism remained anchored in the plane defined
by the expansion of the nation-state (and of commodity-capital),
and its trajectory can still be designated, as in the two-dimen-
sional representation of Fig. 11, by means of a circle inscribed
in the quadrant 11 (cf. §14).
8” C. Hill, Reformation to Industrial Revolution, London 1967, p. 125. Emphasis
in the original.
39 I am, of course, referring exclusively to our conceptual grid: from other
points of view the differences are still more striking.
9° It follows that, besides N‘ —> 3*, the characteristic transformation of
formal imperialism (N+ —> S") may also be conceived as a reflection of ten-
dencies proper to finance capital. That is why the are that designates it in
Fig. 14 has been represented as a broken line. By contrast, the characteristic
transformations of the nationalist and informal phases of English imperialism
(NS —+ N+ and S' —+ N‘) cannot be pictured in the same way. They 'release’,
but are not determined by, tendencies peculiar to finance capital. Indeed, the
latter would in themselves imply transformations with opposite values
(N+ —> S+ and N" —> 8'). Thus, in Fig. 14, the arcs which designate them have130
Fig. 14



N:____._,--‘V’//
The outbreak of the First World War signalled the first
fundamental break with the system of tendencies within which
Hobson had defined the imperialism of the close of the 19th
century. Lenin’s perception of this break represents his second
great insight. (The first, it will be recalled, was his realization
that the nationalism of the colonial areas defined, at the level
of international relations, the limits of the imperialism of his
epoch.) In fact, Lenin, like Hobson, put the concept of 'finance
capital’ at the centre of his analysis of imperialism; he differed
from Hobson in stressing its mercantilist aspects and, above
all, its tendency to pass into 'state capitalism’.
However, Lenin did not concern himself with the fact that the
newly-emerging powers were bearers of diverse models of
expansionism, and that consequently shifts in the relationship
of forces between nation-states — correlated to phenomena of
uneven development - would not necessarily strengthen the
model of imperialism which he analysed. This is what we shall
been dotted, precisely in order to indicate that they refer to historical trajec-
tories, whose determination has to be sought at various levels of the financial-
economic order — for example, at the political-mercantile level to which I am
now referring in the text.The Dissolution 131
now attempt to demonstrate by developing the analysis of
American imperialism sketched in the last chapter.
23. In analysing the association between imperialism and
American capitalism, we should first note that, as in the Ger-
man case, the domination of finance capital over industrial
capital proved to be an altogether transient phenomenon. As
Sweezy has pointed out with specific reference to the USA:
With . . . internal sources of additional capital at their disposal,
corporate managements are to a greater or less degree freed from
dependence on the market for new securities as a source of capital,
and by the same token they are freed from their dependence on
bankers. To be sure, where the influence of banks is firmly en-
trenched this does not mean an immediate decline in their power.
But in the long run, economic power which is related to no econo-
mic function is bound to weaken and eventually disappear. This is
exactly what happens to the power of the banks in so far as it is
based on control over the issuance of new securities. The function
itself atrophies and the power to which it gave rise declines, leaving
the banks in a secondary position.91
From the point of view that directly interests us, more recent
historiography has since demonstrated that, even in its golden
age, US high finance did not dominate American foreign policy
as much as has generally been thought: 'except in Asia . . . the
industrial corporation was the key element in the political
economy of American foreign poliCy after 1895 — and even there
the Open Door Policy was ultimately interpreted from their
point of view’."2 In any case, the inter-war period witnessed the
definitive subordination of finance capital to industrial capital
in the process of their expansion:
9‘ Sweezy, op. cit. (1946), pp. 267—8. Sweezy has recently reaffirmed this posi-
tion in a polemic with a series of articles by Fitch and Oppenheimer published
by the review Socialist Revolution. His reply seems to me quite exhaustive. But
just for that reason, I cannot agree with the conclusion that present-day
multinationals correspond perfectly to Lenin’s concept of 'finance capital’.
('The Resurgence of Financial Control: Fact or Fancy?’ Monthly Review,
XXIII, 6, November 1971, esp. p. 31).
92 W. A. Williams, 'The Large Corporation and American Foreign Policy’ in
D. Horowitz (ed.) Corporations and the Cold War, New York and London 1969,
p. 84.132
The bankers naturally stressed operations which would provide
them with a steady return on investment. Ideally, and for that
reason, they favoured direct ties with foreign governments in
preference to subordinate collaboration with industrial corpora-
tions. Until the Great Depression therefore, they seldom cooperated
directly in the program of overseas industrial expansion. But the
crash forced them to accept such an approach, and after the mid-
19305 they worked ever more closely with the industrialists, and
with the government which pushed an industrial policy.93
In those same years, the launching of Roosevelt’s New Deal
seemed to detonate in America that tendency to state capitalism
which we have seen to be the specific characteristic of German
imperialism. Even if this tendency did not go so far as it had
done in Germany, it served as the prelude to changes in econo-
mic policy which, after the Second World War, would render
the decline of finance capital as a supranational economic
entity dominating inter-state relations irreversible. I am
referring to the so-called Keynesian revolution which, as it
concerns us here, essentially consisted in the institutionaliza-
tion in peacetime conditions of certain characteristic policies
of a war economy, such as deficit spending and state control of
liquidity, whether directly or through the central banks. It is
well known that these practices effectively prevented the re-
appearance of major tendencies towards underconsumption or
systematic formation of excess liquidity, which had tradition-
ally fuelled finance capital in time of peace. Thus, the super-
session under US hegemony of the state of universal anarchy
and war did not reactivate the domination of finance capital,
but consolidated the reversal of the tendency to underconsump-
tion, and with it the progressive 'dissolution’ of the entire
system represented in Fig. 13. If, from this point of View, US
imperialism completed and consolidated the work of German
imperialism, in other respects it clearly distanced itself from
the latter. The differences between the two were in effect, much
more important than their similarities. American, unlike Ger-
man, imperialism was evolving in a supranational direction
even before the USA succeeded in asserting its world hegemony.
93 Ibid., p. 82.The Dissolution 133
More precisely, the rise of US hegemony and the acquisition by
US capitalism of a supranational dimension were co-extensive
phenomena, virtually two sides of the same coin.
This supranational dimension may appear at first sight as a
simple external projection of large national firms, which had
already acquired continental dimensions within the USA:
US corporations began to move to foreign countries almost as soon
as they had completed their continent-wide integration. . . . In
becoming national firms, US corporations learned how to become
international. Also, their large size and oligopolistic position gave
them an incentive. Direct investment became a new weapon in their
arsenal of oligopolistic rivalry. Instead of joining a cartel (pro-
hibited under US law), they invested in foreign customers, suppliers,
and competitors.94
We shall see shortly that this expansion must be sharply dis-
tinguished both from mercantile (export/import of commodity-
capital) and from financial (export/import of money-capital)
expansion, and that it represents an altogether novel pheno-
menon. For the moment, let us simply note that it was initially
propelled by the breakdown of those protectionist barriers
which, about the end of the century, were more and more ham-
pering the international movement of commodity-capital, and
which, after the outbreak of the First World War, dealt a sharp
blow to exporters of money-capital. The reasons for this are
quite evident. Direct investment was often the only way for the
large firm to circumvent, or rather transform into a competitive
advantage, those obstacles which had been gradually erected
in the path of its expansion through import and export of
commodity-capital. The war subsequently accelerated the ten-
dency in question, giving a fresh impetus to concentration of
capital, developing transport and international communica-
tions technology, financially strengthening the United States
in relation to the traditional centres of money-capital accumu-
lation (§12) and, within the country itself, reinforcing the large
9“ S. Hymer, 'The Multinational Corporation and the Law of Uneven Develop-
ment’ in J. N. Bhagwati (ed.) Economics and World Order, World Law Fund,
New York 1970.134
corporation vis-c‘z-vis high finance.
At the turn of the century and above all during the First
World War, there were thus two main waves of 'emigration’ of
US big industry: towards Europe and towards Latin America.
In the 1930’s, however, concomitantly with the complete break-
down of the unity of the world market, the phenomenon
registered a certain ebb, which indicated that it had reached
the limits of its possibility in a world dominated by nationalism.
The nature of these limits may easily be discerned from a brief
examination of the genesis of the multinational firm in the first
half of this century.
In the first stages of a firm’s multinational expansion, when,
for example, it is concerned simply to capture a new national
market by establishing a plant there, direct investment is
attracted by state protection of that market — provided, of
course, that the latter is of suflicient size to allow the employ-
ment of the techniques of production and distribution which
secure the competitive advantage of the expanding firm. After
that stage has been reached, however, the protected markets
may become too narrow, whether because the overseas sub-
sidiary’s production has reached the limits of ‘simple expan-
sion’ , or because the parent company’s techniques of production
or distribution, or both, have evolved in such a way that they
need a larger scale of production.
At this point, it becomes necessary to export to other national
economies the commodities or, still better, the profits which
have been produced by the subsidiary. In fact, any attempt to
organize production on a multinational scale is pointless unless
it is possible, without incurring excessive risks on the ex-
change, to convert the profits of the various subsidiaries into a
means of payment that is universally accepted (or, at the very
least, accepted in the country of the parent-company), and to
repatriate them or transfer them from one country to another.
This limit becomes 'absolute’ when the multinational expan-
sion of the firm does not have a purely 'extensive’ character
(multiplication of branches with a similar structure) but
acquires an ‘intensive’ character, creating a more or less ad-
vanced division of labour between the parent-company and theThe Dissolution 135
subsidiaries themselves. In this third phase, international
movements of commodities and money are nothing other than
movements internal to the multinational company (and essen-
tial to its reproduction).
In the 1930’s, few large American firms had entered this third
phase of multinationalization, but many were already emerging
from the first. In those same years, however, the tendency to
disintegration of the world market was aggravated as a result
of the collapse of the gold-standard and the international
generalization of currency inconvertibility (§12). Thus, at the
very moment when multinationalization of American big in-
dustry was beginning to make necessary a certain liberalization
of international movements of commodity-capital and money-
capital, the precondition of the former (i.e. convertibility of
currencies) was actually lapsing.
A further obstacle was represented by the other characteristic
tendency of modern nationalist imperialism — that is, the ten-
dency of the capitalism of certain newly-emerging powers to be
transformed into state capitalism (§22). In Russia the national
economy was subtracted from the orbit of capitalism altogether
by the October Revolution. The general process gradually
spread, albeit in less radical forms and on diverse social bases,
not only in Germany, but in some degree throughout Europe.
The obstacles which state capitalism placed in the way of multi-
national expansion of the large American company were even
more rigid than those connected with the growing restrictions
on the international movement of commodity-capital and
money-capital. But even without the explicitly hostile be-
haviour which at times marked the nationalism of certain
European countries, the development of the big multinational
companies encountered serious problems. In general, centrali-
zed state co-ordination of the different productive sectors of
each national economy was strengthening structural inter-
dependence within the nation-state and its colonial appen-
dages, reducing or quite simply eliminating the field of penetra-
tion by foreign companies.
The Second World War sharpened this contradiction by
aggravating the tendencies towards autarchy and state capi-136'
talism. At the same time, however, it ripened the conditions for
a new wave of 'emigration’ by US big industry, which in the
space of twenty years would transform it into multinational
capital proper. The impulses leading to multinationalization
were similar to those of the epoch of the First World War. But
they were of far greater intensity and scope: virtually all the
world’s gold reserves were concentrated in the United States;
finance capital was all but incorporated into the large multi-
branch firms; concentration of capital, and, even more,
technology developed in such a way that even the vast territory
of the North American nation became too narrow, and new
outlets had to be sought in a unified world economy.
This was the politico-economic context that was formative
for Roosevelt’s vision, of which we spoke in the last chapter
(§15). Without a political mediation — without, that is to say,
formalization of US economic and military supremacy in a
hierarchical inter-state order, serving to' guarantee world peace
— it would have been extremely difficult to create the conditions
for such a rapid and relatively painless internationalization of
US capital. As we know, this hierarchical order led, within little
more than a decade, to the restoration of international currency
convertibility, to the de facto overcoming of state capitalism in
Western Europe, and to the formation, also in Europe, of multi-
national markets of sufficient size to allow the establishment of
the mass production and distribution techniques characteristic
of the large American company.
The effect was immediate and imposing. The emigration of
US capital, which recommenced immediately after the Second
World War in the direction of the colonial and semi-colonial
world, made a great leap forward in the 1950’s, more and more
taking the road to Europe and other parts of the world which
were either already industrialized or in the process of indus-
trialization. Direct US foreign investment, which had contrac-
ted from $7.5 billion in 1929 to 37.2 billion in 1946, reached a
level of $34.7 bn. in 1961 and $86.0 bn. in 1971. These quantita-
tive data conceal an even more important change. In the
immediate post-war period, according to the well-known
characterization of Business Week, the vast majority of theThe Dissolution 137
large firms dominating the American economy were 'domestic-
ally oriented enterprises with international operations’ rather
than 'truly world-oriented corporations’.95 Only in the 1960’s
did the dynamic component of US capitalism actually acquire
a supranational dimension, escaping the control of every
nation-state, including that of its country of origin which had
prepared and actively supported its post-war expansion.
In the course of expanding their foreign assets and operations in
this spectacular way most of the corporate giants which dominate
the US economy . . . have become, in Business Week ’3 terminology,
multinational corporations. It is not enough that a multinational
corporation should have a base of operation abroad; its true
differentia specifica is that ‘its management makes fundamental
decisions on marketing, production and research in terms of alter-
natives that are available to it anywhere in the world’. . . . One
cannot say of the giant multinational company of today that it is
primarily interested, like the industrialist of the 19th century, in
the export of commodities, or, like the banker of the early 20th cen-
tury, in the export of capital. . . . The only valid generalization one
can make is that in every case they will seek a solution which
maximizes the (long-run) profits of the enterprise as a whole. This
of course means that whenever necessary to the furtherance of this
goal, the interests of particular subsidiaries and countries will be
ruthlessly sacrificed.96
It is not only the national interests of weaker countries that
have been subordinated to the interests of the multinational
company:
These giant enterprises are [no] more concerned to promote the
national interests of the advanced countries, including even the
one in which their headquarters are situated. Quite apart from
individual actions — like the Ford Motor Company’s remittance
abroad of several hundred million dollars to buy out the minority
interest of Ford of Britain at a time when the US government was
expressing serious concern about the state of the country’s balance
95 P. A. Baran and P. M. Sweezy, 'Notes on the Theory of Imperialism’ in
Problems of Economic Dynamics and Planning: Essays in Honour of Michal
Kalecki, Warsaw 1966, p. 19.
9‘ Ibid., pp. 20—1.138
of payments — a plausible argument could be made that in the last
fifteen years US corporations have developed their foreign opera-
tions at the expense of, and often in competition with, their domes-
tic operations and that these policies have constituted one of the
causes of the lagging growth rate of the US economy.”
Such a conflict of interests between the large multinational
companies and the nation-states in which they originated has
been rather more than a mere theoretical possibility. Thus,
ever since the end of the 1950’s (that is, well before the escala-
tion of the war in Vietnam) the ‘emigration’ of the giant
corporations has thrown into crisis US financial supremacy
over Europe,98 thereby shaking one of the pillars on which the
American formal empire had been built (§16). It was already
too late when, at the end of 1967, Johnson tried to run for cover
in a sharply deteriorating financial situation — when, that is, be
limited capital investment abroad, effectively prohibiting any
such movements for 1968 to continental Europe and the indus-
trialized countries, and demanding repatriation of American
profits. Unleashed by the American imperial order, the supra-
national economic forces had at last won a certain degree of
autonomy, which would inevitably ricochet against any attempt
to tamper with them.
In fact, the profits of American firms operating abroad, far
from being repatriated, precipitated those speculative pres-
sures on the dollar and other currencies Which, within three
years, would explode the monetary system established at
Bretton Woods. Of course, the crisis was not the work only of
the speculative-financial manoeuvres of the US-based multi-
nationals. In fact, the Pax Americana had provoked, above all
in the 1960’s, a competitive reaction to the emigration of the
US corporations, causing similar tendencies to appear in
Europe and other industrialized regions. At the end of the
decade, the mass of capital which had acquired the character
of supranationality and which 'behaved’ accordingly was much
larger than that suggested by the already huge figures relating
97 Ibid., p. 23.
9" Cf. R. F. Harrod, Money, London 1969, pp. 274—5.The Dissolution 13.9
to direct US foreign investment and comparative profit flows.
Released in the economic-monetary field by the activities of
the multinationals, the tendencies working to disintegrate the
old formal order later interacted with those released in the
politico-military field by the nationalism of the imperialized
areas (§16). I am referring, of course, to the increased income of
countries producing industrial raw materials, as a result of the
shift in the relationship of forces between the Third World and
the imperial states. A by no means negligible part of this income
has served as a 'sounding-board’ for the tendencies released by
the multinationals, and thus forced the pace at which the
formal Free World empire has passed into the informal empire
of free enterprise.
24. The following question arises naturally at this point. How
can we represent these diverse tendencies - which define the
supranational character of the large contemporary capitalist
firm — in the terms of the three-dimensional grid of Fig. 13?
From what hasbeen said in the last section, it is immediately
apparent that such a representation is not in fact possible.
We have seen first of all that the Keynesian revolution in-
volved the assumption by American imperialism of certain
characteristic trends of the preceding phase of nationalist
imperialism — that is, principally, reversal of the tendency to
underconsumption, and more rigid state control over the supply
and demand of money-capital. It follows that the 'dissolution’
of the space defined by NS —+ F — a process set off by the situa-
tion of world-wide anarchy and war (§21) — did not come to a
halt when that situation was overcome after World War Two.
It is not possible, then, to show the characteristic tendencies of
multinational capitalism within the space defined by NS —> F,
for the simple reason that the tendencies designated by this
arrow are no longer empirically observable.
Furthermore, we have seen that the rise of multinational
capitalism was fuelled on the one hand by the tendency to
anarchy and war which marked inter-state relations in the
first half of this century, and on the other by the tendency to
hierarchical order and peace among states which characterizedM
the period after the Second World War. Unlike finance capital-
ism, then, multinational capitalism must be designated not by
means of arrows converging at S+ and S— (Fig. 13), but by means
of arrows diverging from these same points. This is expressed
in Fig. 15, where S+ —§ M and S’ —> M designate precisely those
two tendencies which fuelled the rise of multinational capital-
ism (M). The two arrows M —> N‘ and M —> N+ may be assumed
to represent two tendencies which have been fostered by the
multinationals themselves: the former, the tendency to pro-
mote the formation-of wide free-trade areas and, above all,
maximum international freedom of circulation of entre-
preneurial activity; the latter, a tendency to which we have
made only passing allusion in previous sections, but which
occupied an important place in Marxist and radical literature
of the 60’s. I refer to the image of 'neo-colonialism’, according
to which the multinational expansion of the giant capitalist
corporation has tended to consolidate, or to re-create, the typi-
cal structures of colonial exploitation — even in situations
where, formally speaking, they have long since ceased to exist.
In the 19503 the international monopoly corporation went beyond
the simple installation of foreign industry inside Latin AmericanThe Dissolution 141
protective tariff walls, which guarantee high prices and profits.
First, the foreign assembly plant and merchandizing organization
set up a sort of a putting-out system, in which Latin American
medium and small manufacturers produce parts for local assembly
by the metropolitan monopoly, who prescribes their industrial
processes, determines their output, is their only buyer of the same,
reduces its own capital expenditure by relying on the investment
and credit of its Latin American contractors and sub-contractors,
and shift the costs and losses of . . . excess capacity on these Latin
American manufacturers, while keeping the lion’s share of the
profit from this arrangement to itself for re-investment and expan-
sion in Latin America or for remission to the metropolis and other
parts of its world-wide operation.
In recent years, the metropolitan monopolies have carried this
process of metropolitan-satellite integration a step further by
associating themselves with Latin American industrial and/or
financial groups or even public institutions in so-called mixed
enterprises. . . . The metropolitan corporation’s main contribution
to the joint enterprise . . . is a technological package of patents,
designs, industrial processes, high-salaries technicians and, last
but not least, trademarks and salesmanship. . . . The international
monopoly corporation then proceeds to take full advantage of its
technological monopoly, its financial reserve, and its direct or
indirect political power, to draw increasingly more profits than its
Latin American partners out of the common enterprise, sector,
economy, and country of Latin America in which it operates. . . .
Everywhere — in the capitalist world, that is — American technology
is becoming the new source of monopoly power and the new basis
of economic colonialism and political neo-colonialism.99
Multinational capitalism is thus designated in Fig. 15 by means
of an ensemble of tendencies which bring into relief its 'contra-
dictory’ character (in the sense that it originates in tendencies
of an opposite matrix — S- —> M and S+ —» M — and that it in
turn fosters opposite tendencies — M —> N+ and M —» N‘).
There is a certain formal similarity between this contradictory
character and that which marked finance capitalism in our
analysis above. But, as a comparison of Figs. 13 and 15 shows
at once, the analogy conceals a substantive difference —
whereas high finance, not being intrinsically endowed with
99 A. G. Frank, Capitalism and Underdevelopment in Latin America, New
York and London 1969, pp. 299—304.142
competitive capacity, tended to promote expansion of the state
(F —> S” and F —> S") the big multinational company, which is
so endowed, tends instead to foster expansion of the nation
(M —’ N“ and M —> N‘), in the widest meaning of the nation as
a 'culture’ embodied in goods and ideas.
In his way, Hobson himself seemed to be aware of this dif-
ference. For, towards the end of his study, he warned the reader
of a possible confusion between the concept of international
finance (with which he had dealt) and the phenomenon of direct
investment which was beginning to develop at the very time
when he was writing:
The forces of international finance are commonly described as
capitalistic, but the gravest danger arises not from genuine indus-
trial investments in foreign lands, but from the handling of stocks
and shares based upon these investments by financiers. Those who
own a genuine state in the natural sources or the industry of a
foreign land have at least some substantial interest in the peace
and good government of that land; but the stock speculator has no
such stake; his interest lies in the oscillations of paper values, which
require fluctuation and insecurity of political conditions as their
instrument”.0
However, finance capitalism and multinational capitalism are
not only distinct concepts; they are also opposites. Of course,
large firms operating on a multinational scale are nothing new
in the history of capitalism. The big merchant companies, for
example, may even be considered as, in certain respects, the
progenitors of high finance (§22). But neither these firms nor the
great mining companies and plantations which made possible
their commerce may be regarded as the forerunners of the
present-day multinational companies. As Hymer has pointed
out:
They were like dinosaurs, large in bulk, but small in brain, feeding
on the lush vegetation of the new worlds (the planters and miners
in America were literally Tyrannosaurus re:x:).‘°l
'00 Hobson, op. cit., p. 359.
‘01 Hymer, op. cit.The Dissolution 143
To be more precise, the fundamental difference between the
great merchant companies of the past and high finance on the
one hand, and the multinational companies on the other, lies
in their respective relationships to the international division of
labour: while the former influenced it in a mediated and in-
direct manner, the latter do so in an immediate and direct way.
This differential relationship corresponds grosso modo to the
distinction between market and company (or workplace) as
opposite modes of co-ordination of the division of labour: on the
market, this co-ordination occurs 'anarchically’ and inform-
ally; in the company, ‘hierarchically’ and formally.
Above all, once it enters the phase of 'intensive’ expansion
(§23), the big multinational company promotes its own more or
less advanced internal division of labour, which tends to cut
across the territorial division of the world into states and
nations. High finance and its progenitors (the big merchant
companies), far from developing within themselves an inter-
national division of labour, owed their very existence to the
division of the world into separate national entities, each with
its internal division of labour. They thereby had an influence
upon the way in which the various productive activities were
distributed among the nations; but it was an indirect influence,
exerted through market forces and mediated, to a greater or
lesser extent, by inter-state relations. Finance capitalism and
multinational capitalism are thus antithetical concepts, in
that the former represents an 'anarchic-informal’ mode, and
the latter a 'hierarchical-formal’ mode, of co-ordination of the
international division of labour.102
The above distinction becomes more precise once we define
the significance of the arrow NS —> M. Because of its central
position within the system represented by Fig. 15, this arrow
should be given the role of 'tap-root’ of multinational capital-
ism. It will be recalled (§20) that the tendency to underconsump-
‘02 This does not imply that the former lacks any 'order’ while the latter is
perfectly endowed with it. It simply means that, in the first case, order is pro-
duced outside the firm by impersonal forces (Adam Smith’s 'invisible hand’)
while in the second case, it is an objective consciously pursued, but not neces-
sarily attained, within the firm itself.144 The Dissolution
tion, which was the tap-root of finance imperialism, was
attributed by Hobson to the fact that competition tended to
keep wages tied to the cost of living, preventing them from
rising in step with productivity. While correct, this judgment
is limited to one of the two aspects of the relationship between
capitalist accumulation and distribution of the social product.
If we consider the relationship from the side of the ownership,
or rather control, of the means of production, and the market
balance of forces between Capital and Labour, then capitalist
accumulation undoubtedly appears as a process whereby such
control is progressively concentrated in the hands of ‘a few’
and the bargaining power of Labour is correspondingly
weakened. But if we look at this same relationship from
another side — that of the relations between Capital and Labour
within the firm or workplace — then we are led to draw opposite
conclusions. Indeed, it is becoming more and more evident that
capitalist accumulation, by depersonalizing and draining of all
professional content a growing proportion of ‘factory labour’,
tends to increase the 'unruliness’ of the labour force to the very
extent that it makes such unruliness more costly, owing to the
intensified diVision of labour and the greater quantity of capital
invested in the productive process.
Now, it seems to me that it is precisely this second tendency
which constitutes the ‘tap-root’ of multinational capitalism.
For what could more effectively restore company profit mar-
gins, lowered by the unruliness of the labour force, than the
decentralization of production? Indeed once its dimensions,
internal division of labour, and capital investment have
reached a certain level, a company can only re-establish the
internal hierarchical order so necessary for its functioning by
organizing its productive and distributive operations at a
world level. NS —> M designates precisely this tendency of the
large company to expand on a multinational scale, in order to
escape the decline of the rate of profit in the 'mother-country’.
That this is not the only root of the phenomenon should be
clear from what was said above and from the very representa-
tion of Fig. 15, where NS —> M converges at M with S+ —> M
and S“ —> M. It is perhaps worth explaining, however, that theThe Dissolution 145
opposition between the two characteristic tendencies of capital-
ist accumulation — that of underconsumption/overproduction
and that of the falling rate of profit — does not rule out the
possibility of their coexistence and interaction. Quite the
contrary. In a certain sense, each of the two actually implies
the other: the tendency to underconsumption, by impeding the
transformation of commodity-capital into money-capital, al-
ways involves a fall in the rate of profit; while the tendency of
company profit margins to be squeezed, by discouraging invest-
ment, always involves a reduction of effective demand and the
appearance of phenomena of overproduction. From this point
of view, the two tendencies may have identical external mani-
festations: a fall in the rate of profit and a rise in unutilized
productive capacity. This accounts for the difficulties generally
encountered in distinguishing between the two types of ten-
dency on the basis of an estimation of the level of the rate of
profit and of productive capacity employed. As a matter of fact,
it is impossible to draw a distinction on that basis: only by
assessing the actual relationship of forces between Labour and
Capital in the firm (or workplace), and its 'imperviousness’ to
market fluctuations, is it possible to determine which of the
two tendencies should be considered the 'cause’ and which the
‘effect’.
My own estimate is as follows. Up to the end of the last cen-
tury, the principal tendency was that of underconsumption —
which substantially confirms Hobson’s judgment designated
by NS —> F in Fig. 13. But since then the relationship between
the two has been progressively reversed, so that the tendency
of company profit margins to be squeezed has finally become
the predominant one. The shift of the epicentre of world
accumulation from England to the United States, the sharp rise
in capitalist accumulation connected to this shift and to the
thirty years of war economy which accompanied it, the imple-
mentation of so-called scientific management or Taylorism,
and the Keynesian revolution mentioned above — these have
been the principal phenomena contributing to the reversal.103
“’31 realize that, unlike previous evaluations, this conjecture cannot be146' The Dissolution
We have now completed our definition of multinational
capitalism as an ensemble of tendencies antithetical to the
ensemble in terms of which we defined finance imperialism. The
two ensembles are represented together in Fig. 16 in order to
provide a visual image of their opposition and to facilitate
analysis of their differences. The reader is free at this point to
use his own imagination in drawing a synchronic and dia-
chronic specification of the various sub-ensembles which make
up multinational capitalism. These would show that the
analogies made in the last chapter were simply the result of the
attempt to flatten in a two-dimensional plane a number of ten-
dencies which, in a three-dimensional analysis, are located in
quite distinct ensembles.
So far as the aims of this essay are concerned, two observa-
tions should be sufficient. First, it should be noted that 18th and
19th century English imperialism, and American imperialism
after the Second World War (represented in Fig 16 by the paths
NS —+ N” —> S— and NS —* S" —> N’ respectively), not only have
diverse origins (one in quadrant Il , the other in quadrant 12, as
we saw in previous chapters) but, more fundamentally, move in
distinct spaces. They differ in respect both of the 'field of forces’
to which they belong — if I may be permitted the metaphor — and
of their point of convergence. As the reader may easily ascer-
tain from either Fig. 15 or Fig. 16, the definition we have given
of multinational capitalism actually produces convergence at
N‘ , rather than at the point 8*, implied by Hobson’s definition
of finance imperialism. If these definitions are judicious, it fol-
lows that whereas 19th century English formal imperialism
was an unstable phenomenon destined to pass into a state of
universal anarchy and war, the informal American imperialism
taken as a generally accepted fact. It is not even, indeed perhaps least of all,
acknowledged among Marxist scholars. It is introduced here solely to under-
line the opposition between the ideal types of 'finance capitalism’ and 'multi-
national capitalism’: that is, to indicate the direction of hypotheses which will
illuminate, rather than occlude, the anomalous character of multinational
capitalism with respect to Hobson’s concept of imperialism. Although it has
been scarcely explored, this field of research has already been broached by a
number of scholars. (Cf. F. Gambino, 'Composizione di classe e investimenti
diretti statunitensi all’estero’ in Ferrari Bravo (ed.) op. cit.)The Dissolution 147
Fig. 16148
which has asserted itself in the last decade represents a rela-
tively stable tendency.
I say 'relatively’ because the grid within which the present
tendencies of American imperialism are defined does not itself
have much assurance of stability. This is, in fact, the second
observation I should like to make. We know that the con-
vergence of finance imperialism at 8" involved a reversal of the
tendency to underconsumption (NS —> F) and, consequently,
'dissolution’ of the entire ensemble of tendencies which defined
finance capitalism itself (§21—23). What is the implication of
convergence at N’ for the stability of the grid? It should be
noted at once that convergence of the system at N‘ does not
involve a reversal of the tendency of company profit margins to
be squeezed (NS —> M), to which we have attributed the role of
'tap-root’ of multinational capitalism. It is true that, in the
short term, freer international circulation of entrepreneurial
activity may determine a relative weakening of Labour against
Capital in those countries and areas where the drive to multi-
nationalism has its origin. It is also true, however, that, in the
medium to long term, fulfilment of this drive cannot but in-
crease capitalist concentration and the division of labour on a
global scale, thereby ultimately shifting the relationship of
forces between Labour and Capital to the advantage of the
former.
Although convergence at N' does not imply a reversal of the
tendency of company profit margins to be squeezed, or of the
resultant 'dissolution’ of the ensemble of tendencies which
define multinational capitalism, nevertheless it does involve a
weakening of the nation-state as the primary structure of the
international system. Growing freedom of the international
circulation of entrepreneurial activity, together with its
corollary, freer circulation of goods and ideas, increases the
homogeneity and interdependence of nations — a phenomenon
which in the end overshadows their character as separate and
mutually exclusive realities (§5). The entire conceptual plane
defined by expansion of the nation-state (that is, by the co-
ordinates N+ —+ NS —-> N’ and S+ —> NS —> S") on which Hob-
son’s definition of imperialism was based, thus tends to lose all
relevance and, in that sense, 'dissolves away’.Concluding Remarks
In conclusion, let us reconsider the quotation from Imperialism:
A Study with which we began this essay. To define an 'ism’ has
proved an extremely arduous, although not impossible, task.
The kind of problem which, in the natural sciences, presents
itself with full clarity only at the level of 'the infinitely large’
or ‘the infinitely small’, arises immediately in the social sciences
whatever the object of investigation. The impalpability of a
phenomenon like imperialism to the world of our senses
heightens the dependence of our definition on the type of con-
ceptual grid by means of which we attempt to order both his-
torical events and the tendencies normally associated with
them.
The very signifier ‘imperialism’ has been, and still is, used to
designate diverse, and in certain respects antithetical, en-
sembles of tendencies. Identification of these discrete meanings
presupposes that we have defined, by means of a series of
distinctions and oppositions, a conceptual grid capable of
synchronically and diachronically ordering the more general
facts to which the term refers. In Chapter 1, we saw that super-
imposition of a one-dimensional grid on the empirical data
makes it possible to attribute a linear order to them, but that
this order varies according to the grid employed. If two are
combined in a single two-dimensional grid, the order becomes
circular, and the four significations II, 12, I3 and I4 may be
attributed to imperialism either simultaneously or successively
(Chapter 2). In Chapter 3, we showed that by the usage of a
series of analogies we can assign a recurrent, as well as circular,
order to the tendencies of imperialism. But this recurrence and
14.9150
circularity depend entirely on the two-dimensional character
of the grid in question. If a third dimension is introduced, as in
Chapter 4, then the recurrence is dissolved and the four
significations II , 12, I 3 and L, are separated into ensembles with
opposite meanings.
By proceeding in this way, we can introduce new dimensions
or articulations, define ever more complex orders, and multiply
at will the number of significations which are, or can be, attri-
buted to the term 'imperialism’. It is not necessary to do this,
however, in order to become aware of the two-fold relativity of
every definition of imperialism. As a matter of fact, any defini-
tion will always depend on a two-fold choice: that of an ideo-
typical grid or structure, and that of a position (for example,
I4) within the grid itself.
For anyone who places himself on the terrain of scientific
research, the respective options actually taken must be
answerable to the criterion of empirical relevance — that is to
say, they must be able to give a univocal representation of
factual data which are generally held to be relevant. Every
definition, then, has to be repeatedly subjected to empirical
control, that is, not only constant observation of the real
world, of a more or less 'participatory’ character according to
the field of observation, but also and especially continual
specification and articulation of the conceptual apparatus for
alerting the observer to the appearance of anomalies.
The importance of such alertness to the appearance of
anomalies is still greater in the social sciences than it normally
is in the natural sciences. In fact, the former are not only
characterized by their relative lack of genuine paradigms — that
is scientific achievements which, at a given moment, provide
everyone involved in a certain research field with a model of the
range of acceptable problems and solutions. Even those of their
theoretical constructs which come closest to the status of
paradigm have a greater degree of transience. As Weber
pointed out: 'There are sciences to which eternal youth is
granted - all those to which the eternally onward flowing
stream of culture perpetually brings new problems. At the very
heart of their task lies not only the transiency of all ideal types,Concluding Remarks 151
but also at the same time the inevitability of new ones. The
intellectual apparatus which the past has developed through
the analysis, or more truthfully, the analytical rearrangement
of the immediately given reality, and through the latter’s
integration by concepts which correspond to the state of its
knowledge and the focus of its interest, is in constant tension
with the new knowledge which we can and desire to wrest‘from
reality. The progress of cultural science occurs through this
conflict. Its result is the perpetual reconstruction of those con-
cepts through which we seek to comprehend reality. The his-
tory of the social sciences is and remains a continuous process
passing from the attempt to order reality analytically through
the construction of concepts — the dissolution of the analytical
constructs so constructed through the expansion and shift of
the scientific horizon — and the reformulation anew of concepts
on the foundations thus transformed’.104
Analysis of Hobson’s ideo-typical structure has demonstra-
ted the validity of these observations. Thus, we have seen how
rigidly circumscribed in time is the capacity of such a structure
to order expansionist phenomena synchronically and dia-
chronically. This capacity is zero for phenomena prior to the
second half of the 17th century — that is, before the nation-state
began to exercise a decisive influence over the international
system; it is maximal for phenomena of the late 19th century,
when the nation-state had finally become the basic structure of
the international system; while its very application is dubious
to times of crisis of the nation-state, such as those in which we
seem to live.
The limits of Hobson’s 'paradigm’ become still more apparent
once we scrutinize the relationship of sufl‘icient causation it
postulated between imperialism and capitalism. We have
already seen that the so-called multinationalization of capital
represents an anomaly of such radical proportions for Hobson’s
ideo-typical structure that it strikes at its foundations. On the
one hand, that structure cannot comprehend (that is, order
within its own field) the empirical development which is
1°“ Weber, op. cit., pp. 104—5.152
generally considered to be one of the most significant features
of post-war capitalism. On the other hand, if we redefine the
tendencies to which Hobson referred when he spoke of 'im-
perialism’ to cover this anomaly, we discover that the point of
convergence of the system so defined not only diverges from
that hypothesized by Hobson, but also represents a transcen-
dence of that division of the world into nation-states which
formed the analytical origin of Hobson’s entire construction.
I am not denying, of course, that expansionist forces are at
work today and that they may issue in a new world war. But
although such tendencies are present in reality, they fall out-
side Hobson’s schema of interpretation — that is to say, they are
extraneous to the connection between 'imperialism’ and
'capitalism’ that characterized the schema in an original and
specific manner. It is precisely in this sense that Hobson’s ideo-
typical structure 'dissolves’ or loses relevance as an interpreta-
tive schema of the phenomena termed imperialist.
It is thus anachronistic for a scientific investigation to
attempt to ground a theory of contemporary imperialism in
historically determinate definitions which relate to processes
and ideologies of the first decades of this century. If our intro-
ductory remarks on the relationship between Hobson and
Lenin are borne in mind, it should be perfectly clear that this
conclusion, which is based on an examination of the theory of
the former, is a fortiori valid for those of its definitions which
are preserved in the theory of the latter. However, at the risk of
introducing new misunderstandings, one last point may profit-
ably be specified.
It is true that this essay has not furnished an exhaustive and
univocal representation of Lenin’s concept of imperialism. In
fact, this concept is erected on two theoretical constructions —
that of Hobson and that of Hilferding - which are not only dis-
tinct, but even incommensurable, in that they cannot be reduced
to a single ideo-typical structure. In our introduction, we
alluded to the fact that the concepts of 'finance capital’ em-
ployed by Hilferding and Hobson, while designated by means
of the same signifier, have virtually nothing to do with each
other (cf. p. 25). We may now add that the primary types whichConcluding Remarks 153
define Hilferding’s ideo-typical structure concern not the forms
of expansion of state, nation and capital beyond the boundaries
of the nation-state, but the forms of property and competition
present within it.”5 In other words, Hilferding’s ideo-typical
structure represents what appears in Hobson’s structure as a
point (NS) which forms the analytical origin of the entire
structure, but which in itself has neither 'form’ nor ‘content’.
It is in this sense, then, that the two structures are incommen-
surable.
It follows that our attempt (§§14, 22) to represent Lenin’s
concept of imperialism within Hobson’s 'ideo-typical’ structure
was necessarily partial and equivocal, since it omitted those
components of Lenin’s theory that he had derived from Hilferd-
ing. Whoever wishes to construct an exhaustive and univocal
representation of Lenin’s concept of imperialism must therefore
first reconstruct the ideo-typical structure presupposed by
Hilferding’s theory of finance capital. That is not necessary,
however, if we intend, more modestly to show only the his-
torical relativity of that concept. It will then be sufficient to
show, as I have tried to do in this essay, that at least one of its
two theoretical presuppositions has no significance (that is,
relevance) for the contemporary world.
The potential incommensurability of different theories of
imperialism is a reminder that this essay is only a first step
along a wholly unexplored path. For example, the incommen-
surability of the theories of Hobson and Hilferding is such that
if we had explicated the ideo-typical structure presupposed by
the latter, we would have obtained a representation of im-
perialism quite different from that expounded in this essay.
Moreover, other representations, partially or completely dis-
tinct from either of these, would be obtained by a reconstruction
of the ideo-typical structures implicit in the theories of Luxem-
burg, Bukharin or Schumpeter — to mention only those which
have exercised a major influence, directly or indirectly, on
modern theories of imperialism.
The reconstruction of a plurality of ideo-typical structures
'05 See R. Hilferding, Das Finanzkapital, Vienna 1923.154
would indeed perhaps be the best remedy to the lacunae of the
schematic representation contained in this essay — so long as it
is not further complicated by the insertion of new dimensions
or articulations. I said at the end of the introduction that the
omissions and schematisms of my study were due not only to the
need to keep the puzzle within the limits of my solving power.
They also expressed my assessment of how best to construct a
univocal representation of Hobson’s ideo-typical structure
without at the same time 'doing violence to reality’. Thus when
I decided, in Chapters 2 and 3, to limit my analysis to the im-
perialism of the hegemonic powers, I did so on the grounds that
such a restriction would render the representation more pre-
cise and univocal. By contrast when I decided, in Chapter 4, to
abandon the representation of the socio-economic forces present
within the hegemonic nation-state, immediately after intro-
ducing it, I did so on the grounds that the three co-ordinates
which correspond to the expansion of the state, nation (or
ethnicity) and capital, exhaustively define Hobson’s ideo-
typical structure; and that all the other components of the
imperialist phenomenon either were accessory and negligible
elements of that structure, or else could be represented in the
space defined by these three co-ordinates and their articulation
(§§19—20).
In short, my View is that integration of the social dimension
(or any other that I have not examined) into a representation of
imperialism, without formalism and without 'doing violence to
reality’, demands that we leave Hobson’s ideo-typical structure,
to reconstruct or construct ex novo other conceptual spaces that
correspond to other points of view. But such an ulterior pro-
cedure will itself never be able to remedy all lacunae and
eliminate all schematism in an attempt to reconstruct 'the
real’. A construction of that kind would be so complicated that
it could never be utilized. The only meaningful goal of such an
endeavour will be the creation of a symbolic order within which
it may finally be possible to inter-relate diverse theoretical
positions and perhaps even to render them commensurable.Bibliography
A. Aguilar, Pan-Americanism from Monroe to the Present,
New York 1965.
S. Amin, 'Une crise structurelle’ in Amin et al., La crise de
l’imperialisme, Paris 1975.
P. A. Baran and P. M. Sweezy, 'Notes on the Theory of
Imperialism’ in Problems of Economics and Planning:
Essays in Honor 0f.Michal Kalcchi, Warsaw 1966.
M. Barratt Brown, After Imperialism, London 1963.
. M. Barratt Brown, The Economics of Imperialism,
Harmondsworth 1974.
G. Deleuze, 'Par quoi se reconnait 1e structuralisme?’ in
F. Chatelet (ed.) Histoire de la philosophie, Vol. 8, Le XX
siécle, Paris 1973.
M. Dobb, Political Economy and Capitalism, London 1940.
M. Dobb, Studies in the Development of Capitalism, London
1963.
A. Emmanuel, 'White Settler Colonialism and the Myth of
Investment Imperialism’, New Left Review 73, May—June
1972.
L. Ferrari Bravo, 'Vecchie e nuove questioni nella teoria
dell’ imperialismo’, Introduction to idem. (ed.) Imperialismo
e classe operaia multinazionale, Milan 1975.
D. K. Fieldhouse, ”'Imperialism”: An Historiographical
Revision’, Econ. Hist. Rev., XIV, 2, 1961.
A. G. Frank, Capitalism and Underdevelopment in Latin
America, New York 1967.
J. Gallagher and R. Robinson, 'The Imperialism of Free
Trade’, Econ. Hist. Rev., VI, 1, August 1953.
F. Gambino, 'Composizione di classe e investimenti diretti
statunitensi all’ estero’, in Ferrari Bravo (ed.),
156Bibliography 15 7
Imperialismo e classe operaia multinazionale,
N. Girvan, ‘Economic Nationalists vs. Multinational
Corporations: Revolutionary or Evolutionary Change?’
IDEP, Dakar 1974.
R. F. Harrod, Money, London 1969.
K. Hayashi, 'Japan and Germany in the Inter-war Period’, in
J. W. Morley (ed.), Dilemmas of Growth jn Prewar Japan,
Princeton 1971.
R. Hilferding, Des Finanzkapital, Vienna 1923.
C. Hill, Reformation to Industrial Revolution, London 1967.
E. J. Hobsbawm, Industry and Empire, London 1968.
J. A. Hobson, Imperialism: A Study, London 1938.
S. Hymer, 'The Multinational Corporation and the Law of
Uneven Development’ in J. N. Bhagwati (ed.) Economics
and World Order, New York 1970.
K. E. Knorr, British Colonial Theories 1570—1850, Toronto
1944.
T. S. Kuhn, The Structure of Scientific Revolutions, in
International Encyclopaedia of Social Sciences, Vol. II No. 1,
Chicago 1962.
V. I. Lenin, Imperialism, the Highest Stage of Capitalism, in
Selected Works Vol. 1, Moscow 1972.
V. I. Lenin, 'Preface’ to N. Bukharin, Imperialism and World
Economy, London 1925. _
V. I. Lenin, 'Address to the Second All-Russian Congress of
Communist Organizations of the Peoples of the East’, in
Selected Works Vol. 3, Moscow 1972.
G. Lichtheim, Imperialism, Harmondsworth 1974.
H. Magdofi', The Age of Imperialism, New York 1969.
W. Markov, Sistemi coloniali e movimenti di liberazione,
Rome 1961.
K. Marx, ‘The Eighteenth Brumaire of Louis Bonaparte’, in
Surveys from Exile, Penguin/NLR 1973.
R. Murray, ‘The Internationalization of Capital and the
Nation State’, New Left Review 67, May—June 1971.
F. Neumann, Behemoth, London 1942.158
J,. O’Connor, 'The Economic Meaning of Imperialism’, in
Farm and Odges (eds.) Readings in US Imperialism, Boston
1971.
J. Piaget, Le structuralisme, Paris 1968.
K. Polanyi, The Great Transformation, Boston 1957.
M. M. Postan, An Economic History of Western Europe
1945—1964, London 1967.
J. Schumpeter, Imperialism — Social Classes, New York 1955.
F. Schurmann, The Logic of World Power, New York 1974.
G. Stedman Jones, 'The History of US Imperialism’, in
R. Blackburn (ed.) Ideology in Social Science, London 1972.
J. Strachey, The End of Empire, London 1959.
H. Stretton, The Political Sciences, London 1969.
B. Sutcliffe, ‘Conclusions’, in Owen and Sutclifi’e (eds.)
Studies in the Theory of Imperialism, London 1972.
P. M. Sweezy, The Theory of Capitalist Development, London
1946.
P. M. Sweezy, 'The Resurgence of Financial Control: Fact or
Fancy?’ Monthly Review, XXIII, 6, November 1971.
G. Therborn, 'From Petrograd to Saigon’, New Left! Review 48,
March—April 1968.
R. W. van Alstyne, The American Empire: Its Historical
Pattern and Evolution, London 1960.
I. Wallerstein, 'The Rise and Future Demise of the World
Capitalist System: Concepts for Comparative Analysis’,
Comparative Studies in Society and History, XVI, 4,
September 1974.
I. Wallerstein, The Modern World System, New York 1974.
M. Weber, 0n the Methodology of the Social Sciences, New
York 1949.
W. A. Williams, The Contours of World History,
W. A. Williams, 'The Large Corporation and American
Foreign Policy’, in D. Horowitz (ed.) Corporations and the
Cold War, New York 1969.
C. Wilson, Mercantilism, London 1958.Africa, 40, 53, 100, 102, 107
Aguilar, A., 6411
Alaska, 83, 84
Alsace-Lorraine, 81
American Civil War, 67, 83, 107
Amin, Samir, 104—5
Arab World, 107
Australasia, 36, 46, 49, 61, 65
Bacon, Francis, 34
Balkans, the, 81
Bangla Desh, 100
Baran, Paul A., 137n
Barratt Brown, Michael, 9n, 66n,
7311, 103
Belgium, 72
Biafra, 100
Bismarck, Otto von, 112
Boer War, 46, 71
Bravo, Ferrari, 26
Brazil, 57
Bretton Woods Agreement, 101, 102,
138
Britain, 11, 24, 28, 40, 46, 49—79, 80-1,
82, 84, 85, 87-8, 89, 91, 95n, 97, 103,
107—10, 113, 114, 116, 118—21, 123—6,
129, 145, 146
British Columbia, 83
Bukharin, Nikolai, 15
California, 84
Canada, 49, 61, 65, 82, 83; see also
North America
Canning, George, 64
Carter, James, 106n
Central Intelligence Agency, 100
Chamberlain, Joseph, 71
China, 38, 46, 49, 65, 85, 93, 97, 98
Concert of Europe, 121
Cornwallis, Lord Charles, 62
Cromwell, Oliver, 57, 80
Cuba, 82, 98
Curtis, P.,
Dante Aligheri, 38
Deleuze, G., 28n
Index
Della Volpe, Galvano, 32n
Denmark, 78
Dobb, Maurice, 19n, 124n
Emmanuel, Arghiri, 19n, 116
EEC, 101—2
EFTA, 101
Fieldhouse, D. K., 19n
France, 53, 54, 56, 57, 58, 60, 62—3, 64,
67, 72, 82, 88, 91, 95n, 97, 100,
109—10, 113
Frank, André Gunder, 141
Franklin, Benjamin, 81—2
Gallagher, J ., 19n, 50
Gambino, F., 146n
Gaullism, 100, 105
Germany, 25, 28, 46, 47, 49, 54, 72, 75,
80-1, 85-6, 88—9, 95, 106, 107, 113,
127-9, 131, 132, 135; see also
Prussia
Girvan, N ., 99n
Group of Ten, 102
Habsburg Empire, 39, 46
Harrod, R. F., 138n
Hawaii, 83, 84
Hayashi, K., 89n
Hegel, Georg Wilhelm Friedrich, 107
Hilferding, Rudolf, 23, 25, 34
Hill, Christopher, 129n
Hitler, Adolf, 81
Hobsbawm, Eric, 65n, 67n, 71n, 72n,
75n
Hobson, J. A., 9n, 23—9, 31—3, and
passim
Holy Alliance, 64, 121
Hymer, H., 133n, 140
India, 49, 50, 52, 53, 56, 57, 61, 65—6,
73, 94
Indonesia, 94
Ireland, 81
Italy, 89, 107
15.9160
Japan, 13, 46, 65, 73, 89, 95
Johnson, Lyndon, 138
Kant, Immanuel, 38
Kautsky, Karl, 12—13, 14, 24, 25
Kennedy Round, 101—2, 103
Knorr, K. E., 61n
Kuhn, Thomas, 18n
League of Nations, 75
Lenin, Vladimir Ilyich, 9n, 10—26,
91—2, 104, 108, 130, 13111
Lichtheim, George, 60, 62, 81
Machiavelli, Niccolo, 38
Magdofi', Harry, 17n
Marshall Plan, 101
Markov, W., 90n
Marx, Karl, 107
Middle East, 81, 94, 100
Midway Islands, 83
Mill, John Stuart, 36n, 68!!
Monroe Doctrine, 88, 93
Nadel, G. H., 57
Napoleon Bonaparte, 39, 60, 62, 63,
107 '
Nasserism, 105
Netherlands, 4411, 56, 57, 58, 81, 109,
113
Neumann, F., 127
New Zealand, 65; see also
Australasia
North America, 37, 42, 46, 56, 57, 58,
60, 61; see also Canada and USA
O’Connor, James, 17n
Orwell, George, 104
Ottoman Empire, 46
Panama, 84
Persia, 65
Philippines, 84—5
Piaget, Jean, 28n
Piedmont, 67
Polanyi, Karl, 75n, 88n, 121—2
Portugal, 57 , 58, 60
Prussia, 47, 67, 80, 81
Robinson, R., 19n, 50
Rodney, George Brydges, 62
Rome, 11, 38, 109
Roosevelt, Franklin D., 96, 132, 136
Rothschilds, the, 121—2
Russia, 46, 54, 81, 88, 94-5; see also
USSR
Schmoller, Gustav, 112
Schumpeter, Joseph, 110—11
Schumann, F., 92n, 96n
Seward, William Henry, 84
Smith, Adam, 61, 143n
South Africa, 38, 49, 65, 67, 90, 91;
see also Boer War
South America, 37, 60, 64, 72, 73, 76,
82, 93, 134, 141
Spain, 57, 58, 60, 82, 84
Stedman Jones, Gareth, 82n, 85n
Strachey, John, 18n
Stretton, H., 47
Sutclifl'e, Bob, 9n, 10, 17n, 23
Sweezy, Paul, 19n, 131, l37n
Switzerland, 78
Therbom, Goran, 98—9
Tirpitz, Alfred von, 81
Turkey, 65; see also Ottoman Empire
Ukraine, 81
Union of Soviet Socialist Republics,
15—16, 75, 93, 95—9, 100—1, 105, 106,
107, 109—10, 113, 135; see also
Russia
United States of America, 18, 28, 37,
40, 42, 46, 47, 49, 60—2, 63, 64, 66,
67-8, 72, 73, 75, 76, 81—8, 90,
92—107, 109-10, 113, 127, 131-40,
142, 145, 146, 147—8; see also
American Civil War, North
America
Van Alstyne, R., 83n
Vico, Giambattista, 38
Vietnam, Democratic Republic of, 94
Vietnam War, 98-9, 100, 102, 138
Wallerstein, Immanuel, 112—13
Watergate, 100
Weber, Max, 27, 29—32, 150-1
Williams, W. A., 84n, 131n
Wilson, Woodrow, 85, 96
